
                   One of the greatest professors ever!!! Decent grader, amazing feedback on papers and tests. Very little reading and homework, use sparknotes and understand the basics. If you know someone in that class who takes notes and know when the tests are, you can miss class. You will not want to miss this class though, he's so funny and has the best quotes.
                
                   Bowman is great! I am not a history person whatsoever and I really loved his class! He made the subject interesting and it was easy to pay attention in class. You do have a good amount of work but if you keep up with it you'll be fine!
                
                   Bowman's lectures are pretty interesting and to the point. A few major assignments, but nothing too hard if you're willing to put in a little effort. Did not use a textbook.
                
                   Very helpful teacher! Does grade hard on exams. Keeps every one interested and alert. Just show up to class and takes notes. 
                
                   Dr. Bowman is by far the best professor I've ever had. His lectures are interesting and he is definitely one of the easiest graders on campus. There is absolutely no reason you should fail his class. If you need a class he offers, take it!
                
                   I am taking Dr. Bowman for 1301. He has changed my view on history. I used to hatedespise the subject but he has completely changed that. He is a very good professor. Gives 15 writing assignments throughout the semester, you only have to do 5. 2 easy quizzes and 3 tests TOTAL.  Very pleased with this course.
                
                   Absolutely Loves this class! Super helpful and very fair. Willing to work with student's also. I would definitely recommend him to anyone
                
                   One of the coolest guys you could ever want for a professor. Gives out 15 writing assignments a semester but only 5 are mandatory. two easy quizzes and three tests that includes the final. Test are easy as long as you go to class and study your terms. He worked with me to get me caught up when I missed a lot due to family emergency this semester.
                
                   Best professor I've had so far. Extremely helpful, you learn a lot and he's an overall great guy! I would recommend him to anyone. Took two of his classes and was never disappointed. The only class I ever looked forward to.
                
                   He really likes his subject, and is willing to work with you. I would recommend his class. I will take another class of his next semester.
                
                   Best teacher I've had at wt. taking him again this semester
                
                   I absolutely love him. Really funny, smart, organized and he almost never even uses notes. Relatable (he's young) and TA is a fair grader. Take him!
                
                   Steve Rocks!!
                
                   Dr. Bogner is a great prof. He truly loves history and really extends his course to our local area. Very interesting course and not hard if you just study. Offers alot of extra credit that is more than just papers.
                
                   Taught well, he goes very fast during the notes though.  DO NOT SKIP AND DO THE EXTRA CREDIT.  STUDY STUDY STUDY.
                
                   He is super nice and tries his best to make class interesting. Notes are hard to take and tests are mildly hard, but I would recommend him as a teacher.
                
                   Nice guy. likes history and teaching, get some face time and the class will be a brezze, test can be hard if you don't study and offers a ton of extra credit
                
                   He is such an nice professor! You can tell he loves what he does! But get ready to read! All of his test are essay test and there are only 6 assignments, so you better know the material. I bombed one test and it set me back. But if you don't mind reading and want a passionate teacher, than he's the kind of teacher for you!
                
                   Favorite professor of all time, hands down. Read the material, go to the writing lab/answer the essay topics concisely for essays, and take in depth notes. Most of his tests are essay responses, so really know material and have opinions on it that are backed up. You will enjoy his lectures, and he will help if you ask! Love that guy!
                
                   Really requires and expects the best from you. Great lectures and is always willing to help you one-on-one Very concerned that the students are understanding and not just memorizing. Lectures are the best, makes you want to be a better student after you leave his class. Reading, papers, and tests are tough, but taking the class was worth it
                
                   This semester I am taking his Western Civ class. I also took his HIST 1301 class last spring. Brasington is by far the best lecturer WT has to offer. Not only is he extremely passionate about the content, but he is equally as passionate about wanting you to understand it. He is a tough grader, but only because he believes in your ability.
                
                   I am currently in Brasington's HIST 1301 class. He is so enjoyable to listen to and has totally changed my perspective on History. Read the textbook, go to class, and not only will you be fine but you will really enjoy yourself. He is funny, a little off the wall, but all in all 10 out of 10 times I would recommend him. Great guy.
                
                   Reading the book is a good idea. You can pass without ever opening it, but I wouldn't advise it. Also, he'll change his curriculum to better fit his classes. He got off topic some, but he's there if you need help.
                
                   I loved his Western Civ. course! He opened the semster with the Bubonic Plague and it just got better from there. Participate in class, sit in the front, and talk to him after class. The tests weren't easy but then again if you want easy tests go back to HS. 4 years later he remembers me and my major and he always says hello.
                
                   He's a good professor. Yes he is really high energy, but I would prefer that to someone who doesn't really seem passionate about the subject. He will keep your attention. No his classes aren't incredibly easy, but you have to work for a degree. Go to class, take notes/pay attention, and you will do fine. Lectures on all the info you need for tests.
                
                   Very very hard class; if you're not really into history (if you're planning to be a coach)don't take him. Very into the topic. Grades hard, but it's college history. Egocentric may be true, but that just means he's into it.
                
                   If your wondering wether or not to take his classes, take them. You will never regret it. An awesome professor that other professors and students talk highly about. His classes are work but its expected. Very very cool prof.
                
                   He is so passionate about History.  However, watch out with writing papers in his class.  I spent 3 weeks on a 10 page paper a he murdered it.  No matter how good it is or how long you worked he doesn't believe in getting A's or B's for his writing assignments.
                
                   Dr. Brasington is the best history professor I've ever had. The man can really bring history to life! Yes, he's a hard grader, but this is college, so he expects a lot out of his students.  He totally rocks. Take him!
                
                   One of the hardest teachers i've ever had, yet he is the best! I love his passion and enthusiasm. He is awesome
                
                   I took his Civ class in a fall semester then took Greco-Roman in the spring.  I just loved his classes.  Civ. was, for me, more difficult than Greco-Roman, but I learned pretty quick that he expects you to try, and he expects you to learn.  He doesn't teach bird courses, so don't expect an easy A.  You will work your butt off and be better for it!
                
                   He picks some students and they are his favorites if you dont get picked good luck. It is a hard class and you really have to study to pass tests. He is a dream killer if he dosent think your doing what you should be on your degree he will tell you.
                
                   He shamelessly watches adult swim, cheers like a bufoon, and throws objects in class. Yet he's one of the most intelligent people I've known. He is hard, but in a good way. You will learn in his class. Egocentrical yes. He does seem to pick and choose people - somehow I walked the middle road.
                
                   Brasington will rock your intellectual world! This is NOT high school history folks! This is college, history is hard, and you will be expected to STUDY and WORK! Expect this from all the history dept. He is VERY intelligent (some have called this egocentric&#63; guess they are trying on a new big word). He is awesome, exciting, and very approachable!
                
                   rrhh
                
                   I have taken several of Brasington's courses.  Overall my experience in his courses were well. Just take lots of notes and pay close attention.  However, he is very egocentric and conceited.  If you don't do what he thinks you should be doing with your life and career he will be very rude and uncaring.
                
                   He was a good teacher, but we never hit it off very well.
                
                   Read a chapter a week, do online timed quiz/test and every other week or so have an online assignment.  Very clear and to the point but you gotta pay attention to the reading other wise the big tests are HARD
                
                   Good course if you have good study habits, and want a challenge. If you have problems retaining information, and/or expect a free ride (like the poster below) skip it and find an easier Instructor.
                
                   This class is a very hard online class, there is no study guides.  You must do a very close reading, practically memorize the book and professor is not very helpful. He makes the tests hard where their could be more than one answer, and you have to pretty much choose the one you think is best. Way too hard for a basic history class!
                
                   Great professor; love his Star Wars and Family Guy references. You can tell he knows his stuff. He always rocks the sweater vests!
                
                   Awesome guy, very helpful and knowledgeable about his subject. Knows his students and will do what he can to help you be successful in this course. Highly recommend this guy!
                
                   Awesome instructor. Would definitely take his class again.
                
                   Incredible professor.  Funny and super helpful.  Will go out of his way to help you do well.
                
                   Very funny guy. Makes his lectures interesting and he's really laid back. Make sure you study for your tests and put forth alot of effort on your response papers and you should be fine!
                
                   Great guy, likes to crack jokes. but has a dead set view of what history is. Some teachers want you to express your view of why situations happened, not so much with Dr. Kuhlman, he wants you to basically quote the book. So take notes, and study and you'll do fine! Very hard Grader on essays. Beware of the essays! 
                
                   Long lectures, multiple 'debates' which are basically a couple page long essays. Tests are difficult because his lectures aren't super interesting or clear. Cool guy, would probably take the class again.
                
                   Dr. Kuhlman is my favorite teacher at WT. His tests are a little on the hard side because he has short-essay and long-essay questions but he is more than willing to help out and be there if you need it. He will crack jokes and make you feel at ease about learning history! I highly recommend taking him.
                
                   He's a really nice guy, just grades essays hard and it's easy to get distracted in his class but PAY ATTENTION! He asks a lot of questions throughout the class and interacts with his students a lot. but the assistant is only a help if you go to her group study sessions,which I couldn't always make because of work and she wouldnt help me another way
                
                   he was a great teacher, and pretty easy.
                
                   I enjoyed his class. He taught the second half after Dr Shaffer and I enjoyed Both.  He really wants to engage his students in Class.
                
                   I had to drop his class because he ended up loosing my essay which I received a 0 for and his assistant never helps during review sessions. She is always in a rush to leave.
                
                   Great professor!! So fun and engaging as a speaker.  Really wants the students to get the material and succeed.  I took the 3 hour class and still enjoyed it.
                
                   He was very clear about what he wanted, but also very picky when it comes to what you write. If you do all the work it is hard to fail, but you have to know what he wants to make a good grade.
                
                   VERY GOOD TEACHER!!! :)
                
                   Just be there for the notes and the review sheet. Do the 4 papers and you'll definetly pass.
                
                   Excellent professor, very personable. He is funny and knows his material. A++
                
                   great guy, very personable, genuinely cares about his students. knows his material, but generally follows a straight lecture format (can be boring). if you take notes and study for tests, his classes are pretty easy!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   great teacher, good guy
                
                   Dr. P is great! He really cares about his students and is super understanding when life happens as long as you're honest and don't try to make excuses. He has a genuine love for history which helps get you into learning. As long as you take really good notes and attend class you'll be fine. He is really particular about what he wants on tests.
                
                   Awesome professor! Made me interested in history
                
                   I was so nervous about taking history! Dr P was an absolutely wonderful professor and ended up being my favorite class this semester.  Make sure you take VERY good notes and write down the outline he writes at the beginning of class. Put effort in and pay attention. He likes to know his students care. Also gives a 20 point extra credit asst !
                
                   He is a very nice man that loves what he teaches. He is very passionate about what he teaches. He only gave a midterm and a final. If you attend class you and take good notes you can make an A. He expects good written essays on his midterm and final. All in all, he is an awesome teacher, there to help you always! 
                
                   Dr. P is the best history professor in this institution without a doubt. Pearson is flexible in deadlines, understands what your situation is and his exams are straight forward and he lets you use your own notes.
                
                   Excellent teacher! Cares for his students to the utmost! Highly recommend!
                
                   Just finished May intersession... best class and best professor at WT! His class is challenging but you will really enjoy it! I wish he taught more classes... well worth the money! I wish more professors cared as much as Dr. Pearson does. You can tell he is truly passionate about teaching and really enjoys his students!
                
                   Best prof I had in college (Amarillo College, WTAMU, TTU). His classes were hard, but in a good way. I felt like I was actually learning. He was very helpful and understanding. All around just a good person.
                
                   Great Teacher!
                
                   Great Teacher
                
                   Amazing, amazing teacher. Truly cares for his students and wants you to pass. If you want to pass, go to the extra study sessions. I will definitely take class from him agaim.
                
                   Really great professor. Keeps class interesting. Takes a lot of interest in his students...
                
                   Great professor!  One of the few professors at WT who knows what he's talking about!  Made even Environmental History something I wanted to learn about!  Took many classes with him...he's difficult but will go out of his way to help you with anything you might need!
                
                   This professor kept things lively even through 3 hour summer intersession courses.  He is passionate about what he teaches, and it shows in his lectures.  Professor Pearson, you get an A+
                
                   He is very helpfull and easy to approach. My interest in Environmental History has grown since taking this class. Very writing intensive and he expects a lot. He is a caring understanding prof.
                
                   Great professor.  Really cares about his students and genuinely enjoys what he teaches. An all over great guy,
                
                   Great professor, go to the extra study sessions if you want to pass
                
                   The best teacher on campus!!  Really, genuinely cares for the well-being and educations of his students, as well as their lives off campus...a great guy...will take as many classes with him as possible...A+
                
                   I had him online, and the tests were pretty difficult, but you can use your books and notes.  And he's pretty nice when it comes to late homework, etc.
                
                   Has a passion for history.  His upper level classes are fun if you participate
                
                   Dr. Reardon is an amazing teacher. His lectures are engaging and if you don't come to class you won't pass his tests. Simple as that. You do not use the book at all. So don't skip, guys. He's pretty handsome too, so it's not that bad going to class!
                
                   Reardon is an incredible teacher. His lectures are always super interesting and he does a great job of making history interesting, which can be hard to do. His class is very challenging but it's only because he wants to push his students to be their very best. All grades come from lecture so you can't skip but overall he's very passionate and fun.
                
                   Reardon is a great teacher. Interesting lectures, relates well to students and will know who you are by the end of the semester whether you participate or not. Tough grader but very clear in what to do to get the grade you want. Willing to look over papers and make corrections to them before they are do and encourages you to come to his office.
                
                   Would never take her again!
                
                   Be prepared to spend at least three to four days on this course because you have an initial discussion post and three different response posts to post three separate days.
                
                   Online class of British History - There are no instructor notes or power points to help you understand what is expected from you as a student as far as content or analysis of information. Feedback is not specific enough to help you know what to do on the following assignment. She know her stuff I guess but she doesn't share it with the students. 
                
                   Try to avoid this class if possible, she is such an inconsistent grader its ridiculous. Expect discussions due every week which will take up a lot of your time. One week I got a 50 and the next I got a 96 and then back to 60 the next week, and I have no clue what I did differently. 
                
                   Not sure where to start. First of all the syllabus quiz was set up for failure. Hard to understand rubics. This class will take up all your days and weekends and no matter how much you try, there is a high percentage you will fail. Tried to communicate with professor and was not helpful at all.
                
                   This is a course that will be sure and take up you'r weekends. There is a strict grading rubric that the professor goes by, which make this class extremely difficult for students that do not like grammar, writing, or comprehension. Overall this course was very unorganized and down right disappointing. 
                
                   This is the class where we have to learn how to be a historian, to pass the upper level majors courses. it was a lot of work to learn how to do each skill but now I will be able to do whatever the other professors require. A lot of work? Yes. You really need to be organized and not wait to the last minute to survive.  Slackers drop or fail.
                
                   She gave us multiple writing assignments every week. She also wanted a 10 page conference paper and a 20 page research paper. If you can get ANYONE else for historical methods do so. Our class started with 20 and ended with 6, 3 of whom did not pass. This is not a graduate class but she sure acts like it is. Bottom line AVOID AVOID AVOID.
                
                   Though this class requires a significant amount of dedication, it isn't impossible. My problem was with the professor, who I found to be aggressively rude; not just in a constructive criticism type of way, but in a curt and condescending type of way. I dropped this class - even though history is my passion - because I found her to be so hateful.
                
                   DO NOT TAKE THE CONDENSED HISTORY CLASS! She is not pleasant whatsoever! I did all the work, managed to ace her final and she still tried to fail me. I had to talk to many people about her class, and all they could do was apologize and say this wasn't the first time. SAVE YOURSELF THE TIME AND THE INSANITY!
                
                   I added this class because it was the only one that fit my schedule. I had heard Dr. Stuntz was hard but when I saw all the assignments, I thought I was going to die. The first few weeks were hard but she gave us rubrics and showed us how to do better. By the end of class I was really understanding everything and getting good grades.
                
                   What a great class! Learned so much that I never knew about women's history! Each week discuss the chapter and analyze documents, two book reports at middle and end of semester, and a final that you write as you go along. I had a great discussion group that made the class really interesting. We got rubrics for every assignment. Great class!
                
                   Class seems hard at the beginning with lots to do. But she will help you and there is lots of extra credit. We get days off to go to the museum for that assignment. We do activities in class, like debates or group presentations, or we just ask her questions about the material. Take home tests. We use the book all the time.
                
                   We had to print out at least 500 pages of stuff to read; it was awful. And she's crazy and hard to follow.
                
                   A very good professor who expects her students to seek their very best work. She can be brutally honest about poor work but no one should expect an easy ride in college. I learned a lot from her during her Historical Methods class. If you dont understand something in her class, just ask she is more than willing to help any student.
                
                   RUDE  Dr. Jean Stuntz:  If you were a house painter and a home owner asked you to paint her house yellow and you painted it green instead, would you get paid?  No. Learning to read and follow instructions is another important skill that we will be stressing in this class. From now on, please do the assignments as instructed so you can earn points.
                
                   She may have an understanding of history but you would never know it. She does not teach, simply she finds prerendered assignments online. I find that any history course that in the syllabus states that it is not a history course is a joke. It was more of a english/theater class and I will never take her again.
                
                   I took her online class&it was the worst mistake of my school career. I read her syll. thinking the class would be reasonable. I spent my entire s1 inside attempting to complete her assignments. Her essays would ask a certain thing, but she would dock points for not explaining something else. She grades brutal. Not run as a freshman level course.
                
                   Sets students up for failure.  If you do not follow instructions to a T she will fail you, but she'll never tell you that!  Surprise, here's your 0%.  Do not question her authority or call her out on mistakes, she will shoot you down and your grade will suffer for it.
                
                   I had her for Women's history, both semesters. she was an excellent teacher. If your not a good critical thinker, don't take her. You have to read he book, but its more like a story. Its all essays, no tests. This was my favorite class and I really enjoyed the way she made us think and evaluate history. Highly recommend!
                
                   Pretty new to this position but overall did a great job. Lecture can get pretty boring at times because everything is usually straight off the powerpoints, but don't ever skip!! He takes points off and is why I ended up with a B! Overall if you pay attention and come to class you should do fine!
                
                   Ian is an okay teacher. He goes really fast on slides and doesn't post them on the website so you can't print them out. You might end up not getting it all. But he does really care for you and will be very helpful. Super nice. His test are mostly from the notes in class.
                
                   Oh my god, do the reading. She provides key terms. Use those when studying for the midterm and be sure you understand them. Don't half ass your paper if she assigns one. Write your notes by hand, don't bother with iPad or Laptop. You need the freedom of a pen or pencil to follow the discussion.
                
                   Subject was American Women in Business. Dr. Alpern cares about her students but cares about the subject matter more. She can be intense and doesn't hide when she's disappointed. If you want to get on her good side, DO ALL THE READING & TAKE GOOD NOTES! She can tell if you aren't prepared and won't make any bones about not being pleased. Fair grader
                
                   Pretty much an awesome professor overall! His tests are fairly easy if you actually go to class and give sometime towards it.  The writing assignments are quick and simple, just have to give some effort! He does take attendance, but his class is worth showing up to!
                
                   Very fun professor! Keeps you entertained and tests are very easy!
                
                   Dr. Vizz is one of the best professors I've ever had. He's super knowledgeable and his lectures are very entertaining. You must be there for the lectures, but they're very engaging. Go to class, take notes, you'll do fine.
                
                   Best prof in the department
                
                   One of the best professors I've had.
                
                   Awesome!!!
                
                   Best professor at WTAMU.  he will work with you on anything and will take a generous interest in everything in your life to help out with you studies.  Highly recommended
                
                   Best class room experience i have ever had. Strongly Reccomend
                
                   THE BEST PROF IN THE WORLD.  Have never had a prof as good as Viz---knowledgeable, fun, and makes you think, but cares what you think!
                
                   Keeps you interested in what he is talking about.
                
                   Dr. Viz is a great teacher.  He is knowledgeable in his subject and is humbled enough to let you know when he doesn't know.  He's awesome
                
                   Every lecture is entertaining. Just be ready for a lot of note taking!
                
                   Very interesting class. Great lectures. Tests are hard. Go to the SI sessions to pass.
                
                   Any teacher who uses graphic novels as one of the texts has to be pretty cool. And if they like anime, so much the better.
                
                   He's nice...
                
                   Great prof. Really made the class interesting. Be prepared to be at class everyday, but you will be entertained and learn a lot.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   All of these people are crazy. Dr. Baum is amazing. He gets so into the material he teaches and his lectures are extremely interesting. There is a lot of outside reading, but for his upper level classes he curves the tests. He knows what he is talking about and makes his lectures really exciting with his passion for the subject.
                
                   I am a senior and he is the worst prof I've had by far. The lectures are boring, off-topic, scattered, and do not cover what is on the exam. The exam consists of small details from the textbook readings. I'll be lucky to finish with a C. I've never posted here but I feel compelled to warn others. Stay away.
                
                   Only take this class if youre a history His lectures are long and he doesn't use power points. He is enthusiastic though
                
                   He does not respond well to questions, and his lectures seem tangenty and dull.
                
                   If you don't agree with &quot;Baum history&quot;, then you won't do well in this class. Don't agree with what he teaches&#63; Don't expect a good grade in this course. The textbook is useless, because all he is looking for is HIS ideals outlined in your essays. EXTREMELY biased in his teaching. Very boring lectures. Don't expect much.
                
                   He thinks most students should fail freshman history to weed out college students. If you ask him a question he thinks it is a personal attack and will look for ways to slash your grade.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   By far one of the best professors in the University.  He cares what you take out of the class and teaches principles, among history.  Class requires a lot of studying, but is very good.
                
                   VERY GOOD but hard professor.  I was able to get an A without doing most of the reading by paying close attention in his class.  He makes the points he tries to emphasize very clear.  Also makes his passion for history very apparent to the students.  Highly recommended prof if you want to learn more than basic history.
                
                   I thought I liked history until I took his class.  He will not help students and doesn't care if we are trying or not.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   His class puts me to sleep and I have it at 5:45 in the evening.  I used to love history but after this professor, he took all the joy out of it.
                
                   Well, he sux....his class is the most boring thing on this planet for sure....hey calc I is more intersting!
                
                   I enjoyed his class on the Civil War.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   As a Graduate of the History Dept. I found Baum rather boring in his lower level classes with little ingenuity or excitement and lacking the humility to be respectfully questioned on points made in class.  This may be different in his upper level classes.
                
                   He is a wonderful teacher, but he makes you read a lot.  His exams have essays, and he usually has a teacher's aid who is incompetent grade them.  Regardless, his ability to teach is wonderful.
                
                   Argh. Baum is evil. There is a ton of reading involved in his class and the tests are impossible. The only good thing about this prof is that he doesn't take attendance.
                
                   awesome prof, made class very interesting. i really enjoyed his class.
                
                   He's awesome! Easy to understand.  Assigns to essays grades a lot tenses but he reminds you about it.  Tests are straight forward, just study.
                
                   By far my favorite professor! Exams come mostly from her lectures and she tells you what she wants you to know for the books. Gives exam reviews. Exams are fairly straightforward with just a few tricky questions. Hilarious sense of humor, great at teaching, I loved going to class every week.
                
                   One of the best professors you can take! Her test come straight from the power points and books with no tricks. You HAVE to go to lecture and take notes to make a good grade but the lectures cover everything. The books are great also I have this class at the end of the day and never got bored or sleepy. She is absolutely wonderful and informative.
                
                   Exams are fairly straightforward with a few tricky questions thrown in. I would suggest going to all classes as 90% of the exams are from lecture. Definitely at least skim the books though, it's a lot of reading but just reading a little bit each day will keep you on track and boost your grade. She wants students to do well, very helpful and funny.
                
                   She was very interesting and had a good sense of humor! She has 4 textbooks and honestly I hardly read any of them. If you read and listen in class, you could probably get an A. I am not a fan of history, but her lectures were not bad to listen to. I recommend her!
                
                   Awesome prof! She's not that hard if you listen and take good notes. Her exams can have some tricky questions here and there so prepared before exams!
                
                   I would recommend taking her. She has a sense of humor and is actually interesting to listen to. However, she doesn't put her powerpoint slides online, but she goes slow enough to copy and it isn't too much. Unfortunately, there are 4 books for her class, but to be honest I skimmed through them and would refer back to them while studying for exams.
                
                   I really did not enjoy her class. FOUR books too read which were terribly boring. Test questions were rarely straight from notes, and I took good ones. She refuses to curve. I ended up with 89 and she refused to curve me to an A. Her final is also very difficult.
                
                   Dr. Barr was great! She had this hilarious crazy-old-lady sarcastic sense of humor which made class very enjoyable!  There are four novel type required books for the class but the tests are mostly lecture based.  If you take good notes, study those, and then read the parts of the textbook that she mentions to focus on in class the tests are easy As
                
                   Lectures were super boring and the books we had to read weren't all that great. Don't take her class
                
                   Stay away. If you are in her class right now, get out. Her panties hang out of her jeans, she is boring, her tests are not based off of her lectures or book, so you are basically screwed for the tests unless you are a complete and absolute genious at history. Attendance is not mandatory, but it's completely pointless at the same time. Good luck.
                
                   monotone, no structure in her lectures, BORING, not a big history buff but she made me really hate it, rude, just really really BAD: STAY AWAY
                
                   She is not the best teacher. I would recommend looking for someone else. All she does is stand and talk about stuff that is often not even on the tests. Now granted I'm an engineer and took this class only because I have to, she really made me dislike going to history. She's also somewhat of a feminist and it really shows in her lectures. Bad prof.
                
                   she's kind of monotone.  lecture was boring. && I really like history, but not with her.  sometimes the way she pronounced words bothered me...it's like she tries super had to annunciate.  she's a little rude.
                
                   Her lecture follows pretty much straight from the book. So if you attend class regularly and write down a lot of what she says, there is really no need to buy the book. Her tests are around 60 multiple choice and not challenging if you pay attention. Overall, kind of a boring class but not difficult if you attend lecture.
                
                   She lectured from minimal PowerPoint and the rest straight up lecture which got extremely boring.  She was no help when I tried to talk with her in office hours and after I did poorly on my first test she basically told me there was nothing I could do quite rudely.
                
                   she does not reply to email; It's a history of american women course but she doesn't choose articles recently published nor does she include the articles about the experience of women of color in the US; Not specific of assignment grading; monotone; jumps around in lecture; not open to critique; lectures same info from txtbk
                
                   80% essay tests, 20% objective. the book follows her lectures almost exactly. Passionate about history but kind of a B*tch..
                
                   
                
                   Good professor. It kinda seems as if he took ecstacy right before class.
                
                   nmvm
                
                   Very excessive on reviews and in general. Wants you to memorize so many details and can be very daunting.
                
                   Only 5 grades for the class. 3 tests, 1 essay and 1 final. Gives you lots of notes in class. you need to like reading or good at looking through books.
                
                   nice guy, but a little over-excited about the beginning of America.
                
                   Take good notes and read the textbook if you can for exams. READ SUPPLEMENTAL BOOKS because he gives pop quizzes over them for extra pts on exams which help a lot. Pretty funny and interesting
                
                   Great prof! Lectures were kind of all over the place, but super interesting. Tests are mostly taken from the lecture, like his exact sentences. The supplemental reading was super useful. There are pop quizzes over them (which aren't so 'pop') that go for bonus points on the tests and the essays on the test were about them too. Highly recommend him!
                
                   He gets off topic a lot, and grades tough. I don't recommend taking him. There is A LOT of reading, and test are tough.
                
                   Not too easy but really nice.
                
                   By far one of the easiest classes I've ever taken. Going to class is pointless because he gets off topic frequently, unless it's the lecture right before the test because he gives you answers to at least 1/5 of the test questions. Read the textbook and you're guaranteed an A.
                
                   He really likes to be social and tell "funny" jokes, but I've never found them humorous. The things he talks about in class are related to the chapter, but for the exam your better off just reading the textbook. He never finishes the list of things on the board. I stayed an additional 15 minutes once.
                
                   Blanton is awesome. One of the best professors I have had. He is extremely flexible and offers tons of help to his students. He makes sure we learn and are understanding the materials. His upper level writing classes are interesting and he provides a lot of help in and outside class. he wants to see his students succeed.
                
                   Carlos is very ADD. He gets off topic mid-lecture and never really gets his points across. There were 3 exams consisting of about 25 multiple choice and an essay. The essay is over the extra reading and you have two essay options to choose from. The multiple choice questions are from lectures and the main textbook. This class could be MUCH easier!
                
                   Loves to hear himself talk. Had a hard time paying attention, because he would go off on another subject and then return to the lecture without warning. Definitely not my favorite.. Extra points for pop quizzes are nice though.
                
                   This is by far the best history professor I've ever had; his lectures weren't boring they were interesting in fact. Exams were difficult to those who didn't bother to read the books assigned, but if you get your reading done and attend his lectures then an A is easy to get. He was a really funny guy and I recommend him to everyone.
                
                   He was by far the hardest teacher I have had at Texas A&M. I understand Texas History is important, but that doesn't mean this professor has to make the tests as hard as possible. I am a Engineer major and honestly he was my only C. He knows his stuff, no doubt, but you really have to pay attention to details (which is barely relevant to topic.
                
                   Horrible at lecture!  I signed up for Texas history, not the history of the poor Mexican.  His test were awful and he was never available and worse, neither was the TA.  No one ever showed up at office hours.  My major is in history and I thought he was the worst history prof I had ever had!
                
                   I really enjoyed his lectures and the tests were not bad if you took good notes.
                
                   Made the class as hard as he could.  Less than 10 A's on every exam (out of 150+ students).  Take this prof ONLY if you are a History major.  Exams are very detailed and specific, even though multiple choice.
                
                   Very few people scored A's on the tests as they were extremely specific and unrelated to lecture.  The prof even stated he didn't care what his distribution was and was trying to purposely make the class hard for the &quot;prestige of the university.&quot;
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Super Cute!
                
                   Great job of lecturing discussion in class.  Probably the most entertaining class I've ever had.  Not that much work, either.  And, not too hard to make a good grade.
                
                   She is very energetic about history.  She takes attendence every day by having quizzes over articles and movies that are assigned for homework.  That being said, the textbook is not as important and I never opened mine.  There is a group project and a short letter to a politician.  The test are super easy, as long as you go to class and do homework
                
                   It is very doable to get an A in this class, but be prepared to work for it. 
                
                   She's great, awesome professor! She's always putting students first and is always there to help.
                
                   Favorite class. Great teacher. A bit of daily assignments, but nothing difficult.
                
                   She is very helpful in replying to emails with full, detailed answers to any problem you may have. A huge part of the grade is attendance and when you go, she has clicker questions at the beginning of each lecture that are very helpful for the tests. Final is half-cumulative but verbatim of the old tests for the first half.
                
                   She has a great structure to her class and is very engaging in her lectures. She really wants everyone to learn more about history and apply it.  Her class is made for you to be successful.
                
                   Super easy, made an A and really only studied for the final
                
                   Professor Bounds was a very informative and interesting lecturer. I would definitely recommend her to anyone who loves history.
                
                   She is an AMAZING professor with a bubbly personality! Lectures are fun and entertaining. She uses videos and films to help us understand history! Quizzes are taken every day & they are from readings and films. She also gives out points for participation. A clicker will be needed for this course! I would totally take another class with her!!!
                
                   Amazing professor. Literally considered changing to a History major just because her course was so influential. There really is no other professor to take HIST 106 with. If you want class to  feel like watching a movie this is the course for you. No reading from the textbook, only primary sources. Lots of assignments for poor test takers.
                
                   Very enthusiastic about her class and made it funny with the videos and pictures she included. I really enjoyed her random polling that showed the students' opinions. If you show up to class and readsparknote it's and easy A. Gained true respect for her by the end of the semester.
                
                   Really good, just be ready for quizzes that also show your attendance. 
                
                   She is not very nice in office hours. She seems approachable, but isn't very helpful or nice when you ask questions. She covers pretty much all the information in class but assigns a lot of reading. The tests aren't impossible but you definitely have to study.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Presents a very biased view of history...
                
                   bad attitude
                
                   Wonderful class, quite demanding but discussions were interesting and Prof. certainly knows the topic.
                
                   Wow, this class was insiteful and in general great. I wish that I had taken it honors so that it would've been a discussion class, because Bornstein's after class discussion were one of the best parts.
                
                   Expects a lot, but you will learn a lot.
                
                   Great class and great prof.  One of the best.
                
                   Not a good general elective, too in depth & mind-numbing for non history majors
                
                   He really does know what he's teaching. Problem is, he goes off on tirades about how the topic is tied to modern day or he gets completely off-topic. He also says, "This is covered in your book" a lot instead of actually covering the material.  Overall, I'd avoid taking the course with him if possible.
                
                   A modern day Santa Claus, James Bradford was an amiable instructor in every sense of the word. I would go to battle with him, TAKE THIS CLASS
                
                   Great guy. Knows a lot about history so be prepared to read. Hes good looking so that helps in class.
                
                   Be prepared to read, not only all of your text book but two other texts as well. Bradford is very knowledgeable but tends to get off topic. Multiple 4 page papers are due throughout the semester. Exams are long essay, writing 2 or 3 at a time. Good prof but be prepared to read quite a lot.
                
                   Extremely hard class, his tests are all essay with a very tough rubric, only take if you are willing to spend hours studying.
                
                   Did not enjoy his class. Attendance is mandatory...Lots of reading to do and the notes are hard to take because he goes off on tangents sometimes. Very knowledgeable of history though. Like 4 one page double spaced essays and quizzes throughout semester. Only a midterm and final all essay.
                
                   I hear he is a great upper level teacher, but as for 105, he is horrible.  Worst class, boring, hard, huge, complicated.  I took notes, studied and failed everthing.  This mainly depends on your TA, who grades everything.  Its alot of work.  I got some Horky guy as a TA. He sucked.
                
                   good class but a lot of reading that you have to do, but if you listen it's pretty easy to figure out what the quizzes/tests are on
                
                   If military history is your thing then Dr. Bradford is your man. I had the pleasure of having him teach a WWII history class in Normandy France during the Rudder Scholars program in the Summer of 1998.
                
                   Was a pretty good prof, kept the class fun and entertaining. Just dont fall asleep or have your cell phone on. Didn't take hardly any notes and have gotten a B and an A on the exams. Just need to know the key points for each essay
                
                   Great subject matter and a great class.
                
                   He wrote the books for this course, and his method of teaching is to say this is covered in your book 2-3 times per class.
                
                   Best teacher I've had at ATM. Never a boring class
                
                   he was horrible. His tests were a big mystery. He covered EVERY part of the world....don't take him
                
                   He's a great prof, so long as you take decent notes and pay attention during his lectures, his tests com easy, and you learn a thing or two you didnt know about some things you thought you knew
                
                   Dr. Broussard is a very good professor, but it's hard to cram 200 years of info into 14 weeks. You definitely have to read the extra books to pass, and reading the textbook will help you get an A. Go to every lecture because that's where he pulls almost all of his questions from. Essays on every test too, but they usually bring your grade up.
                
                   Dr. Broussard is fantastic. Knows his stuff, and really wants to teach it. He is an engaging lecturer, with a narrator like voice. Easy to pay attention. Tests half MC half essay. The essay is over an assigned reading. Read the book and study what he talked about in class and it's and easy A. Lastly, TALK TO HIM! If you engage, he will reward you.
                
                   Dr. Broussard is great. you must go to class and reading the book is recommend. There is two assigned novels, and each are manageable. The tests are half MC and half essay. The multiple choice are fair, if you study. Not too difficult. And the essay isn't bad as long as you know what you're talking about. He's a good lecturer and is engaging.
                
                   Dr. Broussard definitely knows his stuff, and it shows in his teaching. He is very friendly and helpful in class and office hours, and he is pretty funny in class. I definitely recommend taking him if you can. My only gripe is that I thought the tests were a little difficult for a required 100-level history class , otherwise it wasn't bad at all.
                
                   I haven't done any of the reading but I consistently go to class and I've been averaging B's on the tests. Pay attention, take good notes, and know what you're talking about on the essay portion of the test. He won't tell you when he's offering extra credit so you have to go to class if you're interested. 
                
                   Dr. Broussard is incredibly smart and can be very funny at times. If you do not attend his class, you will fail. His tests come straight from the lectures and then there is an essay over an assigned novel. Tests aren't bad but studying is necessary
                
                   Dr. Broussard is amazing! He is very knowledgeable in his field and really makes the class interesting!! He encourages class discussion so make sure you keep up with the readings. All exams are essay and he is a fairly easy grader. He doesn't care about "english junk", just spew out facts and he's happy! Take him if you can!!
                
                   If you're bored, we'll his funny looking hair will wake you up. He has only three tests but he gives a study guide that will most certainly be covered in the test. Easy and fun.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He's great and really intresting! He makes the material super easy to understand and he is very entertaining!
                
                   Wow wish all professors could be like this man. History is typically one of my least favorite classes. Until I took this course. He is an incredible lecturer and it's worth getting up at 8 AM for, no doubt. He is very clear in what he wants you to know and his grading criteria is clear. Not to mention a hilarious guy. 10/10.
                
                   I dreaded taking History which is why I waited til senior year, but he made the 8am classes fun and very enjoyable! I learned so much from this Viet Veteran and retired policeman, he appreciates life and all of his students. He shows history through movie excerpts (ex. Born of the 4th of July by Tom Cruise) and tells us really interesting stories!
                
                   Dr. Collopy is THE BEST! He genuinely cares about his students. I am not a history person but I really enjoyed this course because of him. His course consists of online quizzes and 3 tests, all non cumulative. I would recommend going to visit with him in office hours just because he is interesting to talk to. Hands down favorite professor.
                
                   The 8am history class for Collopy was worth it! He made lectures interesting and kept students awake. He truly cares about their well being and makes expectations clear throughout the course. All of the exams and online quizzes were very straightforward. Make sure you go to class because there are up to 3 bonus point for attendance!!
                
                   Tests are noncumulative and come straight from the lectures and videos. Multiple movies are watched in class. He is actually very good at lecturing over the material. I usually hate taking history, but this was my favorite class this semester. Definitely recommend him.
                
                   He's hilarious! I hate history, but I enjoyed going to class because of him. He tells awesome stories, and cares so much about students. The quizzes are online & he always suggested we should take them together so we would make 100s! His first test caught me by surprise, because I expected it to be really easy. Read the books & study your notes. 
                
                   I really like Collopy for 105, taking his 106 course next semester! Lectures can seem long and boring but he adds his own humor and makes it fun. Tests are 40 questions, mainly multiple choice and do not change much each semester. I had a friend that had taken the course already and gave me materials and that helped A TON. Quizzes mainly online!
                
                   Easy easy A. Just show up, pay attention, take good notes, and study what he tells you to study for exams and you're golden. He takes attendance for a grade and DO NOT be late or he will call you out and embarrass you. Best professor anyone could ask for. Lectures are worth going to even if it's an 8 am. TAKE COLLOPY IF YOU CAN. 
                
                   Class is filled with student-athletes! (including myself :) However, not as easy as everyone says. Still need to study. DONT COME TO CLASS LATE! HE WILL CALL YOU OUT! No cumulative final or any essays! Overall, an awesome experience! TAKE HIS CLASS! BEST HISTORY PROF AT TEXAS A&M! 
                
                   Professor Collopy is the best!  I had him for History 105 & am currently in his 106. He is hilarious and it's an extremely easy A.  I can honestly say that Dr. Collopy is the best teacher I have had and probably will ever have at A&M.   
                
                   Professor Collopy is great. He is hilarious during lecture but he gets the job done. He goes pretty fast, but the quizzes and tests come straight from the lecture and readings so if you manage to take notes you will be fine. You don't really need to read the textbook and he makes that known at the beginning of the semester. Easy A.
                
                   Dr. Collopy was the only person to make History pretty easy for me to remember and understand. I was never good at History or memorizing things, but it was easy to memorize what he said because he was so interesting. Attendance is mandatory, and if you have less than three unexcused absences, he'll add two points to your final grade.
                
                   I absolutely loved Dr. Collopy's class! He is hilarious! Tests are very straight forward and completely based on lecture. Attendance is mandatory and effects your grade. Take good notes and you will get all the information you need to ace exams and online quizzes. Easy and super enjoyable class! You don't even have to open the textbook
                
                   Collopy is an awesome professor!! Take him! Attendance is required He gives 3 test, no final and quite a few really easy online quizzes. I never opened the textbook. Everything is from his power points. He encourages you working together for all the quizzes. He cares about the students and is really funny. Show up for class, take notes.
                
                   I absolutely loved taking Collopy's class this semester. Very easy to listen and learn from. He plays music while everyone's taking their seat and the guy is super funny. He encourages working on quizzes together and his tests consist of mostly previous quiz questions. Classes of his fill up super super fast, however.
                
                   This prof is the best! I took him for both History 105 and 106, and would take him again if he taught anything else. Attendance is mandatory to pass, but he makes it completely worth it to come to class. I highly recommend him! His classes fill up fast so don't miss out!
                
                   BEST Professor! Truly cares for his students and wants everyone to succeed in his class. Recommends taking the online quizzes together and makes class interesting!! Easy A!
                
                   He's very funny and super entertaining. All you really have to do is go to class and take notes! The quizzes are fairly easy and he does encourage group work. Class is mandatory. Would highly recommend taking him!
                
                   Collopy is by far the BEST professor I've had at A&M. Lectures are always interesting, tests are easy if you go to class and all online quizzes are encouraged to be taken with others. He's so funny and very engaging. You can feel that he really cares about his students and loves his job. If you can get into his class, TAKE HIM.
                
                   The best prof I have ever had! He's hilarious and straight forward. I came in dreading taking history (not really my cup of tea), but he made me enjoy going to class. I made sure that I got him for next semester for HIST105. Highly recommend taking him.
                
                   Really Great Professor, really enthusiastic and interesting
                
                   I actually dropped this class.  It was a writing intensive class that was very demanding and didn't give you time to breathe.  In my opinion, Dr. Dawson was rude and tended to make students that weren't the smartest in the class feel inferior.  He would call students out that didn't have any idea what he was asking and make them feel dumb. 
                
                   Dr. Dawson is a great professor! His lectures are very entertaining and he keeps the class interesting! He has a book report, 3 test, and a couple extra credit chances. His test are not that hard if you study and listen in class. The test are short answer and essay. Fair grader and very possible to get an A in the class. Would take again! 
                
                   Dr. Dawson is very knowledgeable and his lectures give you a lot to think about. I have been looking for other classes to take of his. Course is set up really well and you learn a lot by the way he makes the lectures flow like a story. 
                
                   I strongly recommend this professor. He has a slide show with all the bullet points of what will be on the test to go along with his lecture. You do have to read 2 books but they are good reads and the textbook reading is unecessary, because he covers everything during lecture. Good, very interesting guy who knows what he's talking about.
                
                   He's a great prof. He grades the paper fairly and is always asking if the class is following the lecture. He puts up reviews for the tests ahead of time and if you miss one he'll let you make it up no problem.
                
                   Get the text book, read the outside readings, take notes based on key points (don't get bogged down in the details).  Not mandatory attendance, but does map quizzes.
                
                   Dr. Dunning is an inspirational, exceptional professor. Take him before he retires! You will not regret it. 
                
                   He is so brilliant! He's a great professor and is extremely knowledgeable about almost anything pertaining to history. He cares about grades, and helps you out if you need it. I love him!
                
                   Loved taking Dr. Dunning's class, but you'll have to work hard for a good grade. He writes down key terms on the board & just talks for the whole class, so you have to take awesome notes to do well. I didn't like a few political comments he snuck in at times, but hey, that's academia. Really knowledgeable guy & you'll definitely learn a lot! 
                
                   Professor Dunning, as a visiting professor, gave some lectures at my university in Aberdeen, Scotland, a few years ago. I remember approaching him after class with one question that became a thirty-minute discussion that not only broadened my knowledge of the subject but gave me new insight on my general studies. I will always remember that talk.
                
                   Very good professor, really knows his stuff. Willing to help you make better grades. A LOT OF INFORMATION! Make sure to study hard and have a good grasp of material.
                
                   Professor Dunning is absolutely brilliant. He's extremely helpful and always willing to answer questions. For an intro course the workload is a little heavy but you'll come out of the class having actually LEARNED something. One of the best professors I've ever had.
                
                   professor Dunning is one of the best teachers that I have ever known. Clear and mart in his class discurssions. Lots of interesting reading. He is always avalialbe. Take him if you have any interest in Russian or European history
                
                   The man is scary smart and he REALLY knows his stuff!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Awesome professor. Lots of reading but really interesting lectures and very fair grader. Always willing to help you improve your scores (like on papers).
                
                   Definely a hard class. You REALLY  have to be interested in the subject to enjoy the class. 
                
                   Dr. Emre is rude, antagonistic and enjoys humiliating her students in front of each other. She is unhelpful and her standards are too high for undergrad students. She doesn't grade based on how hard you work, she grades on what mood she's in that day. One day she tells you you're doing great, and the next day she will say she's going to fail you.
                
                   **DON'T TAKE. Emre = great academic, but BRUTAL prof with no limits on how much she will dump on students. She assumes that any uncertainty means you aren't studying hard enough ("Just drink more coffee!") or that you're partying. The makeup midterm she scheduled required 6 essays & delayed the completion of my 4000-word term paper. LOOK ELSEWHERE.
                
                   This class is DIFFICULT. The professor is MEAN. She seems nice at first but will deceive you by the end of the semester. She is not even willing to help those who have worked hard. Her exams will are immensely difficult. DO NOT TAKE ANY CLASS WITH HER WHATSOEVER!Save your gpa and your stress and take an easier way out. It's not fun dealing with it.
                
                   Really difficult and hard to understand. Would not recommend.
                
                   Before teaching history of Islam, Ms. Emre came straight from Turkey. She does not have the best grasp of the English language, and would rather her students know arabic before taking the class. Expect heavy amounts of reading, and her attendance policy is very draconian (3 absences = drop in letter grade). Would not recommend.
                
                   Dr. Engel is definitely a very interesting prof. I never missed a class because the tests are all essay and if you use some of the things in your essays that she said in lectures, she gives a lot of points. Overall her class is a good amount of work but if you are interested in what she has to say it won't be too bad.
                
                   
                
                   She's a really good proff. but if you're looking for a blow off class you might not want to take her. She requires that you read 3 books and for 2 of them you have to write short essays for. She's helpful if you come with questions and she makes class interesting.
                
                   At the start I was very worried about this class. There are no lecture notes or textbooks so you pretty much have to be at every class and listen to him closely. The tests are tricky with a lot of a&b b&c etc but he curves ALOT. The fist test I should have made a 69 on & ended up with a 90. One paper and he lets you rewrite for a better grade! 
                
                   Very nice professor but not very clear. He doesn't use a PowerPoint or anything for notes. He only talks theough notes. It's hard to pick upwhat he wants you to know. Tests are hard. There is a dates section on every quiz and test. There isn't a textbook to help and he focuaes on little details instead of the big events that happened in history.
                
                   His test are very hard. His lectures aren't bad to sit through, but he does not cover all of the material on the test in lecture and doesn't use a text book. Hard class.
                
                   Tests are hard and he mumbles into the mic which makes understanding him very hard. I didn't do well initially in the class but he curves everything so much that it doesn't matter. I would recommend it if you won't get bad anxiety from 60s on tests, it'll turn into an A at the end. It did with me.
                
                   hated this class. he doesn't teach the subject well. you don't learn about history, you learn his opinion. doesn't use a textbook, 4 novels. skipped over pretty much every important event in history and talked about tiny details. quizzes and tests were difficult, he curves. sometimes he'll give a negative curve. hard to understand, mumbles into mic
                
                   I took him for my senior seminar which I know are taught differently than a normal lecture. He was very friendly, yet the class was so confusing.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Lectures alright, jumps around a bit. Tests pretty easy all mulitple choice, some essays, but not difficult.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   This is a fun class, He uses a little bit of powerpoint to make class more interesting.  He is very approachable and willing to help.  There are like 2 writing assignments based on different books aside from the lecture.  Exams are straightforward multiple choice.
                
                   This professor is a low brow bias professor. He cannot stay on track with his lectures and goes off on so many tangents that he has to cram the required material in the last 5 minutes of class. I would highly recommend finding a different prof.
                
                   Awesome prof. HE Does make the class very interesting and fun.  I recommend this class to everyone.  Unfortunately, he does not curve.
                
                   Very easy class, especially if you're female.
                
                   Very fun lectures
                
                   He's a great prof and keeps the lectures interesting. Don't fall asleep though, he'll call you on it. The tests are all multiple choice and pretty straight forward. Just pay attention in class. It helps to read or at least skim through the book.
                
                   Leectures are fun and easy to follow
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He requires attendance, His tests are not based on lecture AT ALL! Be prepared to write like you're a student at an Ivy League.
                
                   Entertaining lectures. You have to read the books he assigns (there's 3). Tests are easy if you pay attention and show up to class.
                
                   Dr. Bob was fantastic!! He was an amazing teacher and his lectures are totally worth going to. You learn and are entertained at the same time. I never bought the official textbook but I took good notes during the class. You do however have to read the extra books he assigns, they are on the tests.
                
                   Dr. B was a pretty decent teacher. Just make sure you study for his tests and actually read the books and you'll do fine.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He's one of the best teacher's I've ever had.
                
                   Bob was an awesome teacher. He made class tons of fun. He expects a lot from his students and there isn't a curve, but if you work hard his class is a blast!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Dr. Hudson is the most passionate professor I've had at TAMU. Although the class was MWF, it was never a struggle to attend on Friday. She sparked my interest in the subject through her 258 class, and I actually wanted to go to class. 3 300 page books, 4 hours a week to read the required reading. Attendance/participation required. Not a blow off.
                
                   I took Hudson for a class of about 25 people. There were about 80-100 pages of reading every week with a homework assignment due on Fridays. She is extremely passionate and knowledgeable about Indian studies. Reading is MANDATORY if you want a good grade, but the readings are very interesting. She is also a great discussion facilitator. 
                
                   Honestly, I really enjoyed this class. I think she is a great professor who is pretty passionate about what she is teaching. She had 3 tests and then 12 pop quizzes (where she dropped your 2 lowest grades). She took attendance everyday.  It is so so so important to read all of the material in the textbook from start to finish.
                
                   Lectures are long and boring. The tests are alright but the essay part of the tests are graded very tough. They will count off for the smallest things.  I would avoid her as a prof. She takes attendance and there are pop quizzes. 
                
                   It is not impossible to make an A as long as you put forth the effort.
                
                   I think Ms. Hudson is a great professor. She is very knowledgable in the subject of indigenous history. I loved going to her class. As for the notes, take a lot of them. Also, read the book, (the chp. & documents) Clicker quizzes  weekly. Tests: 50% Multiple choice, 50% take home essay. I would recommend Hudson if you're interested in history. 
                
                   Hudson is a horrible prof, she speaks extremely fast, I normally only got about 75% of the information I intended to write down. There are three tests that are each 50 multiple choice questions & the other half of the test is a take home essay. Our take home essay for the second test was due Easter weekend. Rude & difficult. Would not take again. 
                
                   Has an English Major I believe so she expects perfect papers also they are usally due with in  2 days. Exams are not to bad but you do have to study over all a pretty intersitng class definatly the hardest history course I have ever taken. 
                
                   Dr. Hudson is great! Her tests are pretty easy. She does a 50 question multiple choice section and the she has you write an 700-900 word essay on a given topic. The reading is mandatory because she does clicker questions off the readings at least once a week. She made the class easy to understand.
                
                   Very, very boring. Wouldn't take again but i needed it. Very long and takes attendance everyday. Don't read the books wait until the review on book and read that. Must read the textbooks, it was almost if i didnt need to sit in lecture and wouldve gotten same grade. Anti-Christian and Anti-Conservative.
                
                   Don't base this professor off of his clarity and helpfulness ratings. Prof. Hudson's lectures come straight from the book, are boring, and attendance is mandatory, but he gives a review a week before the test, and the review is exactly like the test. I never paid attention in class, did the review, and got a B. Could have gotten an A if i studied.
                
                   Lectures are usually enjoyable, he knows his stuff and is pretty witty. Gave out reviews for the test that reflect the test (not word for word, but if you study the review you'll be golden). There are outside readings, a book per test that will have questions on it. Test isn't based on lectures, just the books. Great guy and teacher!
                
                   Really cool guy, attendance is mandatory but his lectures are pretty interesting. He gives out reviews about a week before the tests, and just about every test question comes from the reviews. There is one essay worth 20%, but it's graded fairly easily. Has an Irish accent and pretty funny
                
                   Good history prof. Has a British accent which is great and gives reviews for his tests.
                
                   Dr. Hudson is very clear in his lectures and at times quite funny. If you read the books he assigns and do the reading guides you'll be just fine.
                
                   Lectures are boring but PAY ATTENTION. Most of the multiple choice on the test come from his lectures. The other questions come from clicker quizzes given every class (which add up to 1 test in the end). GO TO HIS OFFICE HOURS. I should've gotten B but got an A because I was the only student who ever went to office hours. WOULD NOT TAKE AGAIN!!!!
                
                   He is very hard to understand at times and his lectures don't help, but he takes attendance so you cannot skip. Tests can be tough if you do not read. Pay attention to his opinions on subjects, it helps on the test and in essays.
                
                   Kamphoefner has the amazing ability to talk for what feels like an eternity without actually saying anything. His lectures are painful and his tests often ask questions about seemingly unimportant details. The outlines and charts he shows are very poorly formatted and are useless. If you aren't very good at history (like me), don't take his class.
                
                   Though he is a very sweet man, his lectures are the most boring thing I've ever had to sit through! He literally rambles on and on about who knows what. Nothing he ever really talks about is on the tests. I ended up q dropping but I'm sure the only thing that saved people was reading the whole textbook because he is no help. I would definently not 
                
                   Dr. Kamphoefner really rambles in his lectures. He provides a bare minimum outline during the lecture (not posted online) but he is so difficult to follow. His tests are difficult. 50 mc and 50 for an essay. Essay is easy usually but mc is extremely specific and down right ridiculous. Would not advise you to take him. Good luck if so. 
                
                   Dr. K is a very nice man and cares a lot about the material he teaches; however, he is nonspecific and throws a lot of information towards the students that is hard to decipher as to what's important. He can ramble for a full hour and 15 minutes twice a week with everything he knows the rest of his life, the problem is I don't know what's going on.
                
                   honestly... why did i take this class? why did i think it was a good idea? his lectures make literally no sense at all. every class feels like its seven hours long. Do you like being bored to death? maybe you should take this class. nOT
                
                   Most boring lectures ever, has an outline slide that doesn't go along with his tangents. Takes attendance every class thru clicker questions. Tests are half multiple choice, half essay, both parts are really difficult. TA is not helpful at all. Grades on a bell curve so your tests can be curved down. At least 300 pgs of reading per test.
                
                   Wow, hardest prof. ever! Don't take him- his lectures are so long and so boring, he rambles on about little details and then expects you to read several books simultaneously. His tests are near impossible with super hard multiple choice and a toughly graded essay plus clicker quizzes every day. PLEASE avoid this class.
                
                   Very boring lectures. His has an "outline" slide up drink class, but it is not helpful at all. His TA wasn't very helpful either. You're kind of on your own for learning in his class, unless you're AWESOME at paying attention to boring lectures... He's a very nice old man though!
                
                   If you want an A go to his office hours. The clicker questions will appear on the test. I never had to read the books still got an A because i just watched youtube.
                
                   This teacher takes attendance, so be sure to be there. He loves to ramble on about topics, and many of his lectures really do not make sense. I copied down the slides, but reading the books are what really helped me make better grades. The quiz questions are on the test, be sure to write them down.
                
                   Lectures are so boring, but necessary. He takes roll, so don't miss class. Be prepared to read multiple books, although he doesn't use a textbook. He uses &quot;outlines&quot; that don't even follow his lectures. I would be lost without his TA for test reviews.
                
                   The information he gives during lecture is important and needed during an exam, nevertheless, they are quite boring. I brought my laptop to class to keep up with his lectures because he talks fast and sometimes you can't understand what he's saying.  There were no quizzes and only three test, including the final.
                
                   We read 4 books simultaneously and then had to read two other books, plus do reports on those. He's fairly easy at grading. He takes roll, so don't miss class. Most of the time you can get by without reading but then the lectures won't make sense. Lectures are very dry and he rarely uses power point or any graphics. The average person can get a B.
                
                   Greatest college course I've ever taken. He's a walking textbook for Nazi German history and makes it incredibly interesting. I leave class knowing something new every time. He also brings in Nazi objects like passports, letters, magazines, Jewish stars and other incredible stuff so you're actually interacting with history. Take this course!
                
                   On top of him being a great professor you should take this class for the guest lecturers. Extremely interesting to hear history from someone who was actually apart of it, I think he has 3-4 guests a semester. BTWs gives two points on your final grade if you don't miss a class- reason I made an A
                
                   I have never been more interested in history than in his class. The essay part of the exams help the exam grade really. Just get this professor, read the book right before the tests and make an A. I actually look forward to his class...and that's saying something.
                
                   Awesome professor, very easy to understand, very interesting lecture. Makes funny jokes, has lots of interesting guest lecturers. I don't even like history and I enjoyed it. Easy A if you pay attention.
                
                   The best Prof EVER!  Clear, and extremely interesting.  Dr. Krammer was the most helpful instructor that I had my entire time at TAMU.
                
                   This is the best class I have ever taken! He is an amazing professor and really loves history. He brings in guest speakers that are so interesting. The tests can be hard but if you study you will do well. He also has an SI which really makes a difference when studying for the tests. I highly recommend taking this class!
                
                   Very interesting class. He gives 2 points extra credit to your overall grade if you attend every class. Test are multiple choice with a short essay.
                
                   I use to hate history, but in his class it was so interesting. He brings in great speakers, but he doesn't even need to because he is so interesting. I never got bored. I skip class alot, but I don't skip his because he has awesome stories that 90% of the time apply to the history topic. Tests aren't bad either...
                
                   he brings in some really cool guest speakers, and even when he doesn't he gives very interesting lectures and always has a story to tell.  worthwhile to take, you wont regret it
                
                   Professor is entertaining and educational.  He tells great personal stories to go along with the history.  You can catch the professor on the history channel if you watch the WWII stuff.  I thought he graded fairly easy, he doesn't put up any airs, and he is very approachable.  It has been 12 years since his class, but I still recall him well.
                
                   I've had a handful of really good teachers in my lifetime, but Dr. Krammer was simply extraordinary. History is not just his job, it's his passion. His enthusiasm was infectious. What an honor it was to attend his class. Wish I could do it again.
                
                   The greatest history prof at A&amp;M. His class helped inspire me to go to grad school to study history. He's interesting, and informative. His classes aren't cake walks, I had to bust my ass for the 'A' I got in his class. Be on time, participate in discussions and be original. He'll remember you.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   What can I say, one of the best classes I have ever taken and from one of hte most interesting professors.  You have to respect a German history scholar who teaches American history just so that he can never sit back and relax.  He told us that it keeps him honest.  Also, drinks beer at the Chicken.
                
                   Get to class on time, and don't fall asleep....he will call you out! I didn't have that problem, b/c he is so interesting, but for those of you thinking about snoozing in history....not in his class!
                
                   Amazing instructor... I had him for Freshman level history and took Nazi Germany as an elective, just to be in another of his classes... the only professor whose name I still remember, 5 years later.  Best teacher I ever had.
                
                   This will be the greatest and most interesting professor you will have at A&M. His stories are wonderful, his office and classes are interesting, and he is willing to spend time with students. The best I've had.
                
                   You have to put in work for class, but the quizzes and test are super easy if you do the work. You don't even have to study. Livesay is great because he has lived through all of the history that he teaches. He is super understanding and easy to talk to. Dry sense of humor and funny, but boring lectures if you are not interested in the topics. 
                
                   Just don't. Unless you learn by reading a book and discussing it in class the next day. It's hard to know what exactly you need to know for his class and he does not permit laptops.
                
                   Livesay was an interesting professor. The class is pretty difficult, though, due to the course load. There is a large amount of required reading, you read 7 novels in addition to the textbook and there are frequent quizzes. He takes attendance, so don't miss class.
                
                   Livesay was a good professor. LOTS of reading. Attendance = MANDATORY. He has a lot of experience but he did no grading - he had his t.a.s do EVERYTHING. I had a helpful discussion class where we reviewed for quizzes. If you don't like essays DO NOT take this class!!! otherwise he is great!! he offered some extra credit too
                
                   He was an interesting and easy professor. I enjoyed his class and learned a lot with an easy A.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He assigned 6 novels and a textbook, but if you read them, the class was very easy. He was pretty funny during class, but he got carried away with his far-left views sometimes during class. I would take him again if he was teaching 106.
                
                   He's funny and keeps class interesting. I've skipped a lot and still made a reasonable grade on exams. He puts notes online so you can print them and take them to class. I don't suggest relying on the notes completely. Follow his review and go through the history textbook and highlight. Tedious, but I actually scored higher on exams.
                
                   Just go to class, he makes it interesting. Real cool and funny guy, even at 8 am. Tests are reasonable just do the study guide.
                
                   awesome teacher. i love him. i was woke up so late on a test day that i didnt get to class until the very end. he let me take the test in his office no questions asked. totally cool about the whole thing! he really cares about his students and he gives reviews for the tests and goes over them before test day! TAKE FROM HIM. HE'S SO AWESOME.
                
                   Such a cool, down to earth guy. Loved going to his lectures! STRONGLY RECOMMEND taking him!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He is a great teacher, you have to read one novel during the class and write an essay over it, but it is graded relatively easy. The tests are straight forward and he is actually an interesting teacher! I wish he taught more than just 105
                
                   I LOVED Dr. McInnis. Bases the lectures off her own research. Is always helpful with questions, you'll get your answer the next lecture if she doesn't know it. Would recommend to go visit about learning styles during office hours. SAVED MY SEMESTER. She gets to personally know students if you make an effort. Would take again in a millisecond.
                
                   Her lectures are boring but that's exactly what her test are on so go to class. She will give you books to read and have a 10 question quiz. Exams will be over lecture including 10 question over book. If you just make flashcards of the lectures from day one up until exam and study them, you will ace the exam. She is very general on exam question.
                
                   While I loved Dr. McInnis as a person I found her class very long and boring. She is very kind and cares about you. She gets to know many of her students. On the down side I found my self watching the clock every class
                
                   I LOVED Dr. McInnis and would definitely take a class with her again!! She's an adorable English lady and her accent rocks ( you can still clearly understand her). Her lectures are very straight forward, but you don't want to miss any!! Her tests are based completely off of her lectures and are incredibly detail oriented so take good notes!
                
                   This teacher is awesome! Her lectures are great and explains very good. Her class is fairly easy, but never miss lectures, or you will miss a large portion of material. 4 books to read isn't bad either. I'm willing to take HIST 106 with her, she is just good teacher
                
                   She is a great professor! You can tell she cares about her students. For HIST 105 you have to read 4 books along with 4 quizzes. Not bad. Her lectures are pretty long. Her tests are straight from the lectures. They're not that hard, but you will have to study to get that A. Overall, she is such a nice lady and I would take another class with her. 
                
                   Very sweet woman who cares for each student. Grading is clear, 3 exams and 4 reading quizzes (10 Q's) over out of class books. The books are pretty interesting and she gives a reading guide to help and you need to read them to pass the quiz. Textbook not required, exam is all over lecture material.
                
                   Hands down one of the best professors I've ever had! Her lectures were always very organized, and it shows that she wants her students to not just pass the class but understand the material. If you ask a question and she doesn't know the answer, she will research it for you and give you an answer the next time! TAKE HER CLASS.
                
                   Dr. McInnis is such a sweet lady who really cares about her students! Her lectures may be hard to understand at times, but she does go slow to ensure good note taking. TAKE NOTES ON A LAPTOP AND MAKE YOUR LIFE SO MUCH EASIER! Overall great class! Tests are straight from lecture and are not cumulative and I've already signed up for her 106 class! 
                
                   Dr. McInnis is a great prof! She is very dedicated about history; especially when it comes to women's roles. She talks extremely fast, so be prepared to type... A LOT!! She has a British accent that can be hard to understand at times, but she will repeat anything if you ask her to! Overall wonderful person, I would take her class again!
                
                   You can not understand what she is saying half the time. She goes so fast. I would not reccomend taking her. If you look up her grades they are way lower than the other profs. I swear no exaggeration we have ten pages of notes every class. You zone out for 30 sec and your done. Her exams are hard. Allot of EXECPT questions. 
                
                   She is super nice and can hold your attention well! Her tests are very easy as long as you take good notes!
                
                   Just go to class. Tests are just a regurgitation of what she's lectured, even though she does cover a lot. 
                
                   Super nice lady.
                
                   This class was easier than most classes I took in high school.  Read your books (and take notes while reading), take good notes during lectures, and you're good. 
                
                   Dr. McInnis is a very sweet and down to earth lady. However, her British accent can be hard to hear, but if you ask, she will repeat. You definitely need to be in class because her lecture information is vital to passing the exams. A lot of books, which I still don't see the point in why she assigns them. Anyways, a cute and spunky woman.
                
                   Dr. McInnis is an incredible professor. She is deeply knowledgeable in her Texas History. She does talk fast however, but she will repeat if you ask. The 3 tests were Multiple ChoiceTrue-false 50 questions each. 4 books to read and a 10 question MC quiz for each one. 
                
                   sweet British lady! MUST ATTEND because she doesn't post her powerpoints and all of her tests pertain to info from them!!!! expects you to know a broad range of info because she gives detailed lectures and she could pull  any character or fact from them! good class- would take with her again. read 4 books-just used sparknotes and got AB's
                
                   This lady kicked my butt freshman year in Texas History. I just graduated and this class was the only C I ever made. I've lived in Texas my whole life. The problem is she accidentally focused on all of the women in Texas History. I didn't pay attention to that stuff. Also I slept through class a lot. 
                
                   She was a good professor, always stopped if anyone had questions over the lecture. The exams weren't so difficult.
                
                   Real easy course. Quizes are the easiest. Just study right before class.
                
                   Dead sexy and he knows it.  Just ask him.  Really likes Milwaukee's Best Light, but other than that, can teach really well.  Laugh at his jokes and keep up with the reading.
                
                   Someone take away his laser pen!!! seriously though I hated US Hist before I got his class adn now I love it! GO MORTY!!!
                
                   He makes the lectures very interesting and entertaining!
                
                   This guy is hilarious, and he can teach pretty well.
                
                   One of my best professors.  Makes lectures very interesting!  Wish I could have gotten him for history 105 also.
                
                   great prof makes the material interesting, and his tests are very reasonable, the class aveage is usually a high 'C' or low 'B'.
                
                   he is very interesting...makes history fun and exciting.
                
                   This class was AWESOME! i loved going to class and it was an 8oclock if that tells you about how he is as a prof! the tests werent hard you just need to go to the SIs! they really help! im taking his 105 in the fall because i loved 106 so much! well worth the effort!
                
                   Even though I despise history, Motl made it interesting and I actually wanted to go to class.
                
                   Awesome teacher!!  Take his class.  Take two of his classes.  Right now he's a grad student, but as long as he keeps his passion he'll still be a great prof.  Very energetic, funny, makes the information meaningful and entertaining.  Funny name
                
                   One of my favorite classes ever at A&M! If you go to class, take good notes, & read the assigned books, you'll be fine. Dr. Reese's lectures are great & I loved how straightforward & funny he was. I'd definitely recommend, but only if you actually like history- you'll have to know the specific content & actually go to class to do well. 
                
                   Attendance is mandatory in order for you to pass. He doesn't use any visual aid and just lectures straight through. As long as you take notes throughout the entire class, the time will go by fast. You will not pass the class if you don't take notes because his take home exams come straight through your notes. Easily passable if you put in effort.
                
                   He changes his exams every major exam from multiple choice, to essays, or both. He grades very harshly on essays. He is somewhat helpful. Skip class and you will fail though. The TA was more helpful than him and helped me get a good grade.
                
                   Dr. Reese's lecture are awesome! They are so entertaining and he offers incentives for attending. His tests are straight forward and with minimal brain power you can figure out what he is going to test you over. He is super picky about his term paper but its an easy rubric to follow.
                
                   His lectures were awesome and rather entertaining, but his tests were evil!
                
                   Professor Rosenheim is the kindest, most genuine individual that care deeply about each student. I took his 476 class as a freshman and he went out of his way to make sure I was doing well and understanding the material. Amazing guy and amazing prof!!!!
                
                   He's very sweet and his class is easy to do well in as long as you complete all of your assignments on time.
                
                   His lectures are very informative and he definitely makes sure that if something needs to be explained, that it is. However he doesn't use powerpoints and his lectures can go off on side-subjects that make you wonder if he is going to get back to the intended topic. It's not a bad thing and can be fun, but something to be prepared for.
                
                   By far the best professor I've taken at A&M. He offers some amazing insights into history, really makes sure you learn the material by makin class fun and exciting. No tests, just papers, but he's totally willing to edit yours a million times before it's due until you make an A. Truly an amazing guy!
                
                   Very sweet, very nice, grades everything fairly. The material was presented in a nice way that made writing the final paper a breeze.
                
                   Dr. Rosenheim is a super nice guy, he's funny and cool. The books he assigns to read are NOT interesting and are poorly written which makes them hard to follow. I feel that the info he discusses in class is VERY in depth and monotonous. He gives online quizzes and the midterm was a 4 page paper. Final is a 10-12 page research paper.
                
                   Dr. Schools was an AMAZING professor. She was always very energetic and interested in the material being taught, which made it way easier for me to learn. Take her take her take her!
                
                   Very helpful. Did a good job of covering the French Revolution period both at home in France and in the French colony of St.-Domingue (modern Haiti). Excellent use of visual teaching aids.
                
                   He great and really passionate about his classes. Class is mandatory because he doesn't use a textbook or have lecture slides online, so the notes are what he says in class. Always gives you a heads up about no classes or change of office hours.
                
                   Adam Seipp is on his way to becoming the premier military/german history professor at A&M. Always ready to receive questions, very available to help outside of class, passionate about what he teaches, presents history in ways that it is real and important to us; in essence, he brings humanity to history, with a dash of humor, and powerful emotions.
                
                   He talks very fast. NEED TO TAKE NOTES FOR EXAMS.  The exams cover a little section from the books he assigns
                
                   I found this class very confusing. He has power points, but they are one word slides and he forgets to change the slide. I never knew what was important to take notes on because he would always stray away from the subject. Tests are multiple choice and the second and last you can write an essay. Had to read 4 books that went with each test.
                
                   He's a great prophesor and gives very good lectures. You will read a book for each test (4 in all).
                
                   I really liked Professor Smith!! He is always willing to help and easy to approach. We had 4 tests in the class with 2 opportunities for extra credit, test questions are based completely off of his lectures and key terms (as well as a few questions over the outside reading book) so attendance is critical. He's also HILARIOUS, and very opinionated.
                
                   Get ready to read A LOT! Assigns pages out of the text book, 4 books to read, and random readings he posts on campus. His tests are hard and the questions can have multiple correct answers. If you read everything, take amazing notes, you will most likely only get a B. If he was the only prof left for this course I would take him.
                
                   By far one of my favorite professors! He really cares about his students and is willing to help. He has 4 test that are non cumulative. No papers and gives 2 extra credit opportunities. Textbook not required but you need to read supplemental books. Have to go to class because test are straight from the test. I'm taking him again for 226. 
                
                   I absolutely loved this class!  Dr. Smith is very passionate about what he teaches, and his lectures were always very interesting (and often funny).  Your class grade is made up of four exams; all are multiple choice, but for the midterm and final he gives you the option to write an essay instead.  As long as you show up to class its an easy A
                
                   Great Professor! Lectures are hilarious, more than happy to help, would definitely take his class again!
                
                   Super interesting guy. You need to go to class to pass, but his lectures are fun! Very clear grading and he's always happy to answer questions.
                
                   I LOVED Professor Smith. I took good notes in class and usually read the sparknotes for the assigned book for each test and I got high Bs or low As. I thought he was very entertaining and funny and it was easy for me to stay interested during his lectures. I went to his office hours once and he asked about my major and life plans. REALLY neat guy.
                
                   its hard to hear his lectures from the back because he mumbles sometimes. tests are from the lectures so you cant skip. he gives you the resources you need to get an A.
                
                   Smith is really nice and is passionate about history but it was hard to pass his class. All the key words and readings were easy to answer on the test but he liked to add his own little questions about small details that you didn't think mattered to the test. Cant read the book because he doesn't go off of it. 
                
                   Great teacher! Tests are only from lectures so if you go to class and take good notes, you're good! He's pretty funny in class and usually lets you out early. The textbook isn't necessary but it is helpful. He has four tests and they're relatively easy. Make sure you don't miss class though! You'll miss lots of info. 
                
                   Keeps lectures interesting. Can be soft spoken, and sometimes speaks quickly -  NEVER skip class and TAKE GOOD NOTES. Reading the textbook is not required. Pay attention in class, study the key terms he posts online before tests, and read the assigned novels and eCampus readings and you'll be fine. Tests are multiple choice, easy. Essays optional.
                
                   Very friendly and fun during lectures. Made the material very interesting and was very thorough. Takes LOTS of notes and DON'T skip class. Go over key terms he posts online before tests and you'll be fine. I highly recommend this professor. No real work outside class.
                
                   Professor Philip was great. Gives you the option of multiple choice or the essay test. He gives you the essay questions and week ahead of time and the test is just 2 essays. I did the essay test every time and didn't receive lower than a 95. 4 books with quizzes over them. Semi-difficult, I listened to all the books on tape. Made an A. 
                
                   Loved this professor! You could tell he was really passionate about history and his lectures were always really interesting. You have to go to class because the 3 tests are all strictly notes from his lectures, you don't need a textbook. 4 open note online reading quizzes, 3 tests, and 2 easy census assignments make up your semester grade. 
                
                   I loved this class! Amazing lectures and he really has a passion for history. You have to go to class even though he only takes attendance once in a while because the exams are all from lecture notes! The reading material and quizzes are a bit tough, I did better on the actual exams, but still, an enjoyable class overall. Take notes and listen!
                
                   LOVED this professor.  He made lectures so entertaining that it made me actually want to come to class each day.   He doesn't take class attendance regularly but his tests are 100% from the lecture so going to class is a must.
                
                   Professor Smith is very funny and is super nice. Our first exam was taken in class, but the other three were online. The "final" is just the 4th test and was not cumulative. The exam were open notes and we could take the tests with friends. There were also four book papers which seemed easy, but he did not grade them until the end of the semester
                
                   He's really a great Professor and is really funny too.
                
                   This guy thinks he's pretty smart. Pay attention to his lecture and really expand your notes.  It's not hard to pass, but it sure is boring.
                
                   Go to class and read the outside novels and you will get an easy &quot;A&quot;.
                
                   Springer rocks!  He's the funniest prof A&M has ever had.  He's pretty demanding in class, but he makes everything really clear and you'll never fall asleep.
                
                   He gives you the notes he reads from, so you don't have to take notes in class. The textbook is optional but helps. Make sure you at least read a summary of the additional books he suggests because he does put that on the tests. He assigned seats and took attendance every class. His reviews basically tell you what's on the test. It's an easy class.
                
                   Dr. Stranges definitely sparked my interest for history. His lectures can be long sometimes, but overall he is a great prof. If you miss 2 or less times, he adds on 4 bonus points to your final grade, but if you miss more than 4, your letter grade goes down. So just show up! Go to the review session, review that material, and you're garunteed an A!
                
                   Make sure you go to class!! He tacks on 4 extra points to your average overall grade just for you showing up to his class times. Does not like cell phones, definitely old school with the lectures. His review for tests are pretty much all I did to study.  Don't need a textbookextra books "required" he gives you all you need to know in the review
                
                   Stranges is such a cool guy. He loves his subject & loves teaching it. Dont freak out when he starts talking about irrelevant details he loves science & incorporates chemistry in his lectures lol. GO TO THE REVIEW SESSIONS. he literally stands there & reads off the test and you take notes. do that & study for an hour and you will get at least a B
                
                   Super old school. He wears a blazer & tie every day & does not allow food in class, at all. I had him for a senior seminar & we had to read 10 short books &answer questions over them in a class discussion and watch a short film. He is super picky about passive/active voice in the research paper, along with a lot of other things. Overall good prof.
                
                   I really enjoyed his History of Science class. He's a little monotonous but he makes the subject interesting. I'll be taking my senior seminar class with him.
                
                   Super cool guy anyone would want as their intellectually superior grandpa
                
                   Surprisingly liberal for tamu; I enjoyed the contrast, though. I never touched any of the books required and made a B. He's a good prof. but some can't stand his voice (too monotonous).
                
                   At the beginning of each unit she hands out a list of key terms that will be on the exam and then lectures off of them in order. If you go to class, take good notes, and then study then all you will get A's. There is three exams including the final and one paper! She is a great professor that is clear in the lectures and I would take again
                
                   the test are extremely easy if you take good notes at her lectures. only had to study for about 2 hours for every test
                
                   WONDERFUL!! absolutely loved her class! She explains things thoroughly and makes sure you know the test material, which may I say her tests are easy!
                
                   Tests are NOT essays! I love prof Unterman and would recommend taking her course! Class isn't mandatory, but tests are 100% based on notes from class. She doesn't assign a textbook, so you have to go to class for the notes, but you're saving money on a book you know you won't use. She is extremely helpful and understanding - go to her office hours!
                
                   A really cool professor that has a personal interest in both her students and her subject. The tests were all essays, which I personally find easier than multiple choice, but many don't. I would definitely take a class by her again and my only real regret is not taking the opportunity to get to know her better.
                
                   What else can I say about Dr. Unterman? She's simply wonderful! You'd have to be a fool to pass up the opportunity to take one of her classes.
                
                   His lectures are like if you're having a story-time type of thing read to you, and you just take notes of that. While you pretty much have to kill yourself for an A, the professor himself is a very nice guy and its hard to hate him. Went to office hours , didn't really help much, but he was really nice.  If youre looking to just pass, its  possible
                
                   Grading has BUILT-IN improvement. First test is 10%, second is 15% and final is 25%. 2 3-page papers over any 2 books out of the 6 you choose. You must read all books as they will be discussed in the 50min discussion group every week. Tests are taken in this discussion group and are composed of 30 multiple choice and an essay prompt. Good class!!
                
                   Exams are straight from the lecture, but sometimes he asks questions unconventionally so make sure you know the material thoroughly. All of the grading will be done by your TA, so get to know them well and go into their office hours (especially for your papers)! They are more than happy to help you; you just have to ask! Easy B, attainable A!
                
                   He's a great professor. The lectures are clear but he does talk kinda fast. If you miss something or miss a day there is no place to get the notes. There's no textbook but you do have to read 6 other books. The tests are pretty easy if you study. They're based entirely off of the class notes.
                
                   Dr. Vaught is a really interesting professor, and his lectures are very intriguing if you pay attention. Class is mandatory because test material comes from the lectures, and he makes you read 6 books, which are all not that bad. If you get an A in his class, you will have to earn it through hard work.  
                
                   Dr. Vaught is extremely enthusiastic about history. His lectures are more like stories and they follow directly along with the outline he posts online. That being said, the only way you'll get the information for the tests is if you're in class actively taking notes. Also, the two papers you write over the books are graded  hard. 
                
                   Dr. Vaught is very knowledgable and passionate about history. As soon as class begins, he starts a very enthusiastic lecture like he is a narrator telling a story and does not break his lecture or slow down for questions. You must go to class and take notes to benefit (but doesn't take attendance). Lots of books and really makes you work for an A. 
                
                   You have to read the books he assigns but if you do the work set out for you it is an easy A. Follows outline for lectures and they are very straight to the point and most of the time shorter than the block.
                
                   You must go to class. He makes you read 6 books and he is your main "text book" his tests are on a broad over view of the lectures he talks about. I am not good with history so I found them confusing. He is nice and willing to help. He weights the class in your favor.
                
                   
                
                   I loved this professor! He lectures were very interesting. He had 3 tests, all multiple choice and no essays. There was no final, however the 3rd test was during finals week (it wasn't comprehensive... just over the stuff learned in the last third of the class). If you go to class and read the book you should have no problem getting an A.
                
                   He is an OKAY teacher. His powerpoint notes are really good but he is very sarcastic when answering questions. When I had him last semester, his quizzes were clear and easy to find. This semester, he used a different program and there were hidden quizzes that he took for a grade.
                
                   The professor is great but he might be gone for weeks and the sub isn't that great. And your grade is 25% Test 1, 25% Test 2, 25% Exam, 25% Quiz Average. Which wouldn't be too bad if you did well on every exam. And the quizzes are online and this semester no one could find them. He is a very unforgiving professor when it comes to grades.
                
                   No essays, final is not cumulative. Excellent teacher, his only rule is that students keep their phones away. I would highly recommend him.
                
                   Awesome history teacher! Makes it interesting! Definitely recommend to anyone!
                
                   ok well I thought he was really funny and made history come alive..he adds jokes in his lectures and storys so hes not boring. His tests are hard you must study and take good notes and keep up with your reading. Remember read the questions carefully, but do not overanalyze. I enjoyed his class.
                
                   This guy is really annoying. He spends the entire time turning history into a stand-up comic routine. He's not funny and he's not entertaining. He's just a jerk with poor little freshmen forced to listen. I did fine in the class (attend and take decent notes) but this guy was a little too much to take.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Have to go to class and read all the reading assignments to pass. Tests are hard. Gives review for the multiple choice portion but there is also an essay portion which she grades really tough. Hard class. Hard professor. And she's really awkward. But she did bring us candy a couple of times. 
                
                   He gives three essay-based tests in which he posts all the possible essay questions online beforehand as well as numerous quizzes. Lectures are entertaining as he is very into the material. Go to class, read important parts in the book (parts that deal with the essay questions), and VISIT HIM! He is friendly and always eager to help students.
                
                   Attendance is not mandatory but its 10% of your grade so i advise going to class, don't miss too much then he'll be less inclined to help you because he doesn't see you putting an effort. If he see's effort in your work and your on a border line grade he will bump you, only if you show effort in assignments and in class.
                
                   One of the best teachers I ever had. I'm going to miss him. See u Dr. B
                
                   One of the best professors I've had. He completely lays out the class and everything you're covering and will be graded on, in the syllabus. You have to write papers that if you follow what he's asking for are decently easy, the one long paper is terrible to write, but not very hard. Only take quizzes and very short final.  
                
                   Great teacher. Do your work and you will pass. Interesting lectures, though he does like to talk off topic. He's hilarious and actually pretty sexy. ;) love his classes, highly recommend. 
                
                   Great professor!  Sometimes he would go off into tangents when teaching... but other than that... amazing and fun lecturer!  Had a blast in his graduate History classes! 
                
                   Dr. B is a great professor. I've taken a few classes with him, and they have always been pretty laid back. He is a fair grader and really personable.
                
                   When I entered the class I thought that it would help prepare me for teaching.  Dr. Bergman does not know what he is talking about when it comes to teaching.  He gets all his information off the internet.
                
                   Enjoyed this class. He has humor and a passion for teaching.  If you don't succeed in his class, you aren't really trying.  Very clear on what to expect and how to get a good grade.
                
                   The class was very relaxed with time for questions and answers. Some of the stuff we learned was easy but some I never was exposed to before. Fair tests and papers. Great teacher!
                
                   Class very enjoyable. He has a great sense of humor. People always disturb and never pay attention, never read, or are lazy; therefore the ones who say it is hard do not pass. Taking time to get to know this professor outside of class will be very beneficial to the class understanding! Will take one of his classes in the future!
                
                   great class. cool teacher. very helpful and alot of passion. tests are hard but fair. i guess some people just dont study.
                
                   He is very unfair in his grading status and he is a very difficult grader. I will never take another class that he teaches again.
                
                   The tests were extremely hard. The class was enjoyable but it seemed that there was MUCH more covered on the tests than was covered in class. He is from New York and an enjoyable individual but I won't take another class under his instruction.
                
                   He was awesome! He really understood what college kids are into but made class interesting.
                
                   Mr. Bredberg is probably one of the best history teachers I've ever had. He's so energetic about history. It's all lecture, but not a snooze fest, so I appreciate that since History can often times be dull. His tests are essay and short answer, and you must study for them, but I don't think they are ball-busters. Very minimal other work!
                
                   Dr. D. is an amazing professor. He knows his history, teaches because of his love for the subject and goes out of his way to help you understand. If you're struggling, he's the first to open his office door. He's busy, but he's always available to help in the best way possible. He's hilarious and you will never be bored in his class.
                
                   This guy is a great teacher and very willing to go the extra mile to help you; however, if history is not something you find interesting and you can't afford to lose a lot of time on this class then take a different professor. He almost never gives A's on papers so you'll have to work extremely hard for your grade.
                
                   awesome.
                
                   very funny, dry humor, extremley intellegent, know his history, and genuinley cares about the students progress in the class, always willing to take time to explain stuff,
                
                   He's the best teacher I've ever had...and &quot;I know fertilizer when I see it.&quot;  He was my history prof at SBU and we missed him a lot when he left.  My advice: attend the review sessions, use a tape recorder, write until your hand is numb, and make sure you can either write well, or have someone who CAN write edit everything you expect him to read.
                
                   this is one of the best teachers I have had at this school
                
                   great history teacher- definitely knew his stuff...tests were bamboozlers though and it was almost impossible to get an A on any papers
                
                   I don't understand why most people complain about his classes being difficult.  If you want to pay for your grade, go to community college (not that commerce is much more than one).  There's an obvious point in his courses being challenging, but in the same respect you'll learn a whole hell of a lot more than most of the other &quot;professors&quot; here who teach like it's highschool part 2.  He's also pretty damn funny.
                
                   before this class i was dreading still more civil war stuff, but i'm loving it.  dr. dobbs is one of the best lecturers i've heard and i'm finding out things about the time period i never knew, even gossip about the key players.  i also agree with others that have noticed how handsome he is.  at times it is rather distracting.
                
                   He is my favorite history teacher. He tells the information like a story. He is also very handsome.
                
                   Very funny and interesting, be sure to go to every class, its hard to catch up if you miss a lacture. HIs class was challenging, but in a good way, the tests were very hard but the workload isn't too bad. He makes you want to learn history, and isn't he so cute&#63;
                
                   I really loved his class, and he is easily one of the top five best teachers on campus. I left the classroom thoroughly gratified. He is hard, but you feel better as a student having worked so hard, and learning so much.
                
                   He is a little hard, but if you show up to class and keep up with him you'll pass and also learn a few things.   He is a fun professor.
                
                   He thaught the class as if it was for History majors.
                
                   He knows a lot about the subject he is teaching. He requires a lot of work and a lot of attention in class. He is a good teacher, but a tough one.
                
                   I had this man his first semester on campus. I made a 'B' but it was through my own efforts ONLY. All he did was talk about FDR and belittle those who disagreed with him. I couldn't wait to get out of his class. A real jerk!!
                
                   I, too, hated (all) history until I took this course. Yes, there's alot of reading req'd, but the material isn't as bad as some of the things I've been tortured with. Dr. Dobbs makes the history revelant, humorous, & forthright. Highly Recommended!
                
                   Great instructor, everyone should have him.
                
                   This teacher sucks...really!  You dont have to be a smart ass to get the point across. And you dont have to give months worth of notes for one test. Thats insane!  The people who like him are females...wonder why&#63;!
                
                   Too much to read, but all in all I really like his style of teaching. Great smart ass sense of humor too.
                
                   Polly is the best professor that I have EVER had. She encourages free thinking and for students to draw their own conclusions. It seems that the people on here that are bashing her y do not possess the ability to engage in creative thinking and are quick to shoot down non-traditional teaching methods. I have taken her numerous times & LOVE HER!
                
                   What a terrible professor. What a pointless class.  I learned absolutely nothing.  The class was easy, but after the first half of the semester I had to force myself to go.  Absolute torture.  She's a moron and she hates men so watch out.  She almost single handedly caused me to drop out of school.  Thank God most prof's aren't like her.
                
                   dont take her unless you enjoy witing essays.  All of the tests are in class essays, but she does help you come up with ideas for them.
                
                   great teacher to get you thinking. some thought her confused and unfocused probably because she doesn't give straight answers...you come up with what feels right to you and prove it.  not much written down to study from the time period so you take what is available and create your idea on you own.  not a class for high school type learners.
                
                   Loved every moment of class. Helped out a lot. The tests were in class essays that had weeks to prepare for and had a take home final. Great personality, lots of knowledge....slight reading though.
                
                   Take it with a load since there isn't much work.
                
                   She taught me how to write a history paper and for that I am grateful. She is an excellent teacher.
                
                   Not much structure or point to the course. Lots of busiwork, more like elementary school or daycare.
                
                   she is slightly disorganized... class is fairly easy... she allows makeups for tests... almost all tests are in-class essays in which you've had over a week to prep for and you get to bring in a sheet of notes... humorous and intelligent...
                
                   Great, great teacher. She demands students to be informed, but not to any insane degree. Very helpful  - this prof really wants to see her students excel. Encourages free-thinking and interpretation. Great sense of humor, and easily the best I've had this semester.
                
                   Polly is very disorganized
                
                   Her classes are very demanding, but she is a great teacher.  This class is a challenge and forces students to think outside the box.  Mostly essay tests, but you receive the topic in advance and you are allowed to bring in a page of notes.
                
                   world civilizations part one-- confusing as all get out
                
                   I would rather have a sharp object stuck into my eye than take another class from her. She is unfocused and confusing. When I asked for help, she did not show up for the appointment. Really bad. Loves to shove opea down your throat.
                
                   Run screaming from any class she's teaching.  Her desire to teach &quot;intellectual history&quot; is as confusing as it sounds.  Take a real history class, unless you love philosophy.
                
                   The class was crap.  I took it during the summer and she did not realize that it was a summer class.  Don't take this class if you can help it.
                
                   some of her assignments are a little confusing, but overall it was a great class.
                
                   Hated the class.  Learned nothing.  Boring.  Turned history into a sociological/anthropological study with a feminist slant.  I'd take a kidney stone the size of a bowling ball before I took her class again.  At least the stone would be more fun.
                
                   Prof Detels is demanding but caring.  She provides everything you need to succeed in her classes.  Her class sessions are filled with variety and interesting activities.
                
                   Not very nice when administering tests for other teachers...kind of grumpy.
                
                   As a History major, I had to take this class.  I hated it.  Dr. Ford is a very good technical prof but she is clearly biased towards females.  Her grading is fair however somewhat subjective.  Her paper requirement is fair but burdensome.  If she likes you, you will do well.  Get on her bad side and you will pay. 
                
                   Great teacher but this class is very challenging. If you keep up with the work you will have no problem passing the class.
                
                   If you are a history major you have to take this class. She requires a 18 page essay for this class. In addition to the proposal and historiography. She's a fair grader on her essays. You can skip class and still pass. The essay though is hard. The class, regardless of teacher, has a huge drop rate, but she does grade the essay fairly easily.
                
                   Took her for Feudal Society. Dr. Ford does seem a bit snobby but its the new yorker in her. She requires a 15 page minimum paper but grades essays fairly. Her test (Which she only has two) are part multiple choice and essay. She lets the students choose the essay topic and the percentage it counts as. Make the essay alot more percent, like alot.
                
                   I've taken 3 classes with Ford and I love her! She is very knowledgeable and always clear on what she wants. She sticks to the syllabus and doesn't get behind. If you don't come to class it will be significantly more difficult to get a good grade, because her tests are based heavily off of the lectures. Dr. Ford is NOT snobby, she is really nice
                
                   Dr. Ford was a good professor, overall. She knew her material & provided it in clear, concise lectures. She is a good teacher, however her attitude could use adjustment. Any time I had something to ask her, she would respond in a condescending manner; I never got a positive, useful answer to any question I asked her.
                
                   Snobby, condescending, but she knows her stuff.
                
                   Her quizzes are frequent and not exactly easy. Lots of reading.She has this major research paper at the end of the semester but she helps you all semester long on it. Not sure how I'll do, but I definitely think I willpass.
                
                   Great, great proff. She is a touch shy, I think, not snobby. She is from NY after all. Knows her stuff backward and forward, takes time to answer questions, allows discussion even if it deviates. Great class, would take her again
                
                   Dr. Ford Rules!! Her medieval civ. class is so interesting given it is her field of study and she studied in Europe. Take her classes!
                
                   Such a smart, articulate woman!! She knows her area of history backward and forward, but does not pretend to know stuff she doesn't. She is just one of those people who takes on too many responsibilites but is always willing to help the students!
                
                   She is very challenging. I had the most difficulty in her class.
                
                   Ford is anything but vague, each course includes  a detailed syllabus;any questions asked during class are discussed. An entire class period is devoted to what is expected on term papers. This is a very approachable professor with a fresh spin on hist.
                
                   Her lectures are pretty vague and she is overworked by admin duties. I am not sure how I feel about her.
                
                   A really great prof. Seemed a little snobby at first, but when some of the New York started to wear off she turned out to be a helpful , caring teacher that is passionate about her calling. I have had four classes with her and am looking forward to the fi
                
                   a little on the snobby side. dept. head that has more going on that she can handle
                
                   She is by far the best history teacher at Tamu, she shows a genuine interest in her students, she is very helpful, and knowledgable
                
                   Great professor, passionate, and very accessible.
                
                   This is a great, professor who is passionate about history.Ford is witty, and very interesting,also shows interest in the well being of students.
                
                   See FORD PSCi.  She is Hist not PS.
                
                   This class was a lot of work but it was so rewarding and I actually learned something. He will not give you a grade that you do not earn which does not appeal to everyone. If you are prepared to work then you will find this class very fun and you will walk away having a broader knowledge of history.
                
                   Dr. Gruver teaches college level courses; it's not wrong for him to expect you to read. He makes you read, but most of all he makes you think for yourself and ask yourself &quot;simple&quot; questions that aren't so simple. His lectures are worth reading for, because whether you're a history major or not, you'll care  because of how he relates ideas to YOU.
                
                   Best teacher I ever had.  Takes an interest in his students.  Very opinionated, very forceful in his defense of said opinions, but not rude.  Knowledge of material is superb.  Holds his students to an extremely high standard- if you work, are respectful to him and, most of all, THINK, you will find he is a wonderful professor.
                
                   Too opinionated!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He is the most unprofessional tchr I have ever had the displeasure of meeting. I had him this semester and he can be very hateful. Today, he told a girl in front of the rest of us that were taking a final that she FAILED his class. He has picked on several people this semester and likes to put people down. Cant believe I passed his class myself
                
                   He is a mjor jerk. He knows his stuff but also has a very limited opinion. Very political.....In charge of the exit tests and ha definitely has his favorites. He is unfair. One book review that I did recieved a d.... I read one of his better liked students that did not even get the right thesis and she got a B. Very rude in class and makes rude com
                
                   i never read and blew off the tests but somehow i made a D, actually i did write an awesome paper at the end of the class over some damn eagles song.
                
                   I heard Gruver was a bad teacher, but after taking him so far this semester, I understand that he is just tough.  I personally enjoy his class.
                
                   Great lecturer! Tough grader Be prepared to work and if you do you'll be fine
                
                   Awesome lectures
                
                   Hardest class I have ever taken and I have a masters.
                
                   teacher is too hard and
                
                   I agree with the poster that said that Gruver is difficult if you aren't ready to work hard. I took his class my first semester back in college after 10 years, during the summer! It was a hard class and i had to work hard, but I made an A and he was always happy to talk to me or anyone after class.
                
                   I'm sad to see so many students do not appreciate hard word! Don't you like a challenge&#63; He likes to play devil's advocate, by making you think on all levels not just from one limited opinion. He's not trying to make you feel stupid...he's getting you to open your minds! Don't take it so personal.
                
                   he is an opinionated **** yes! But he is so smart and just because he doesn't gve out A's to everybody doesn't mean he won't pass you if you disagree with him. so ignore th freshman who were too lazy to DO THE READING! and take him if you want to learn new stuff
                
                   Seems to have a chip on his shoulder--as a history major, I recommend signing up for courses with the profs who have more experience and knowledge.
                
                   Many of the negative comments being made are from whining freshmen who are frustrated at having to work for something for the first time.  He is a very good instructor with a good grasp on the material and is very helpful.  You will, however, have to work.
                
                   He is one of the most exciting history teachers at the college. Not only do you learn something, you enjoy yourself while you learn. He is intertested in the success of his students.
                
                   HIs tests are very very hard, but he really teaches. He does have a problem with telling you what your opinion will be on subjects and if you differ your grades will suffer since you can not prove otherwise well enough to convince him. I got an &quot;a&qu
                
                   this class is a really easy B if u put out some effort...it is very hard to get an A though.  If u really want an A, i would not recommend taking this class with another hard class.  60 percent of each test is essay, and he grades the essays rather hard.
                
                   He is the best teacher I have ever had a commerce.
                
                   This professor seems to be easy to begin with, but when it comes time to take his tests, he's ridiculously unfair. It's more than half essay, and he does not seem to grade by the guidelines he lays out. If you want to slide by with a &quot;B&quot; or &quot;C&quot;, EASY. If you're looking for an &quot;A&quot;, don't bother taking this class, it's not worth your effort.
                
                   Thoughtful teacher and a good lecturer lecturer.  Allows students lots of time to discuss topics.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Doesn't rely heavily on the textbook, but does assign TWO books for outside reading/writing assignments.  Really nice, fun, not too difficult.  As long as you don't mind her politics (liberal), you will like this prof.
                
                   This was one of the hardest classes I have taken at this campus, but the experience was well worth the money.  He was very helpful and understanding.  Always willing to help you study better.  I would recommend taking him at least once just to learn something new.
                
                   He is excellent.  He is very quick in lecture, so try and take notes.  He loves particpation and to know his students, so stop in his office before class and grab a cup of coffee from him and sit and chat about anything.  Keep up with the reading and be prepared to be entertained.
                
                   He is probably the best lecturer I have seen at this school. Very organized, very entertaining, and worth the money.  Come to class, take notes, and you'll be fine.
                
                   i hated that class is was so freakin hard! don't take him, he is a hard teacher and not very understanding
                
                   Very hard class, but he knows his history very well.  The specifics of the material are hard to remember, but you will learn a lot in the class.
                
                   Don't bother trying to take notes... Just try to listen during class and USE THE STUDY GUIDES.  The study guides pretty much go in the order of the text and the tests follow the same order. If you complete the study guides you will do fine on the all multiple choice tests.
                
                   He goes very fast in lectures.  Be sure to keep up with your reading, and you'll be fine.  Discussions in his class are great; it's like being in the middle of a political knock-down-drag-out.
                
                   Lectures are almost pointless to attend b/c he goes so fast.but he gives a review for the test if you define and learn the review you will do fine without reading the book. also he dosnt take attendance.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He is a very hard teacher. But if you ask for help, he is always there to help you out.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Professor Lahr is very easy going and she always has a smile.  She goes above and beyond to help you pass the class.  I am not good at History but she has helped me overtime and allows me to email her my answers ahead of time to have them checked out.  She is awesome.  I believe she is only here for one more semester so take her class while you can
                
                   A great history teacher! She at times is hard to keep up with in taking notes but if you say something she will repeat herself. She gives you the midterm and final questions ahead of time, so that you know what to study for. A lot of reading and a good amount of writing involved. She makes history pretty easy, but still makes us think about it.
                
                   Dr. Kuracina is probably the best professor I've had in the history department! He's laid back but clear on what he expects. Take notes in class. Tests are essay but come straight from the notes! Would definitely take him again!! Thank God for professors like him!!
                
                   Amazing professor! One of the best I have ever had! Well rounded greatness!  Took him in my undergraduate and graduate coursework. 
                
                   Thank god there are professors like him in the world.
                
                   After all my years at college it's about time I came across a professor that teaches with such clarity.
                
                   Dr. K is the best professor I have had in my college career so far.  He is helpful, encouraging, and his lectures are stimulating!  To do well in his class, you have to take notes and pay attention to his lectures.  It's not hard to do, his lectures are very interesting.  HIGHLY RECOMMEND Dr. K for anyone who has had a tough time in History!
                
                   Absolutely my favorite class of the semester! Dr. K was by far the best lecture teacher I've ever seen. He is radical and very engaged in his subject. You don't need the book, just take good notes! His tests are meant to make you think but are not ridiculously hard. I highly recommend him!
                
                   Dr. K is an amazing lecturer. He tells a ton of useful and funny stories, and is really good about answering questions. His exams seem difficult, but he is a really fair grader and takes into account each individual student. Probably my favorite professor!
                
                   Kuracina is one of my favorite professors at this university. He is very laid back, friendly, helpful, but above all he is obviously a VERY sharp guy. He shows genuine interest in students' work, especially at the graduate level where I am now. Highly recommended. And yes, he's hot. The intellect makes him even more attractive. ;)
                
                   Great professor!!!!  I took him as an undergraduate and now as a graduate student he is very helpful.  You can go to him for anything and he will sit there and listen to you.  You can't pick a better professor or mentor.
                
                   Excellent professor! Easy to talk to and always available to help you out. Not bad to look at either ;)
                
                   Awesome professor, very helpful. He understands that you are still a student and not an authority in the subject field. He is a stern but fair grader. On the exams he tells you what to study and if you don't then it's apparent, on the assignments, if you need advice or guided towards the right direction then he is happy to help.
                
                   Dr. McKisick is hilarious. His lectures are always engaging and he keeps the class well involved. If you show up to class every single day, there is no reason you shouldn't get an A in his class. The tests are all outlined, he tells you what will be on them. Dr. McKisick also dresses up for class every day, he takes his job serious. Definitely rec.
                
                   I took his class History 1301 and took him again in 1302 because i liked his teaching. Yes he makes you work for your grade but.. that's why we are here to work for what we want. I suck at history and i made a good grade with his help. He is blunt and sweet. Not much homework only test's and a book essay. I recommend him to my classmates.
                
                   Dr. McKisick may seem intimidating at first, but that changes. He cracks jokes at least once a lecture. He required 3 books, all which I actually used. He assigned a Reflection Paper for a novel we read, so be ready. What I admired was that he asked for our opinions to make his exams:  like formatting (multiple choice, essay, etc.) 
                
                   He is a cool guy, young, tattoos, and loves motorcycles. I thought his class was going to be very easy but it was actually fairly challenging and had multiple readings everyday; and if you don't read you will fail.
                
                   Best Hist professor I have ever had. I hate history but he made it interesting. His lectures are easy to follow, he post powerpoints online, gives great exam reviews, chances for extra credit. Love this class!
                
                   This was definitely my favorite class this semester. You can tell he knows what he's talking about, and he makes it interesting and easy to understand. Everything is right out of the text book, so it's easy to follow along with his lectures. He's always willing to give extra help, and always gave very helpful reviews for tests.
                
                   His instructions for some of his short assignments were very vague and when asked for help to make better grade on assignment he gave instructions but still made a low grade. He goes off topic a lot. Lectures are pretty note packed. Exams are open book and open note and grades on the overall of the class. Student teacher helps grades everything.
                
                   Moreno was awesome to me. During lectures he would often go off and tell random stories or ask us what we thought about what was going on in the political world. Very easy going guy. Gave two tests, which were both open note-open book (you get the questions ahead of time as well) and one 10 page paper. The key to this class is just participating.
                
                   Thorough lectures packed with information. Likes to go off on tangents and tell stories off topic. Interesting Classes. Open note exams and one decent length paper. Fair grading. 
                
                   She emails back fast and is always available in office hours. She is very sweet and fun and her class is extremely enjoyable... HOWEVER for a 1301 class I put in A LOT of work to get my A. Only if you are very determined and  expect to put in a lot of hours for tests will you do well. I am not taking her again even though I love her.
                
                   Mrs. Newton is a great teacher. She always replies to emails and is always willing to help. If you ask her a question she will defiantly help you. I would defiantly recommend her! 
                
                   She is really good at emailing back quickly, even on weekends. Sometimes she talks fast, but she is ok with repeating things.
                
                   His lecture are really long and his power points are literally what he bullet points on his syllabus. DO NOT ASK FOR EXTRA CREDIT OR HE WILL TAKE THAT CHANCE AWAY FROM THE WHOLE CLASS. He gives two topics he may use for his exams and hopefully you study for the right one on the exam. He doesn't really get into his lectures. No homework or quizzes. 
                
                   She gives a full study review of everything you will need to know for her tests, and lots of projects, and take-home-quizes, so that you can keep your grade up. I hated History 1301, but coming to her class was something I looked forward to.  She is really passionate about history, and makes it appealing.
                
                   There are rarely dull moments in her class. Her course is very easy to follow and her lectures are actually great!!! One thing is that you need to be prepared to write. Other than that, she's amazing.
                
                   I had this professor in 2000 and certainly demonstrated arrogance and immaturity. He attempted to rob me a grade and when I confronted him with scores he changed the grade. No matter what school he teaches not suited for teaching.
                
                   If you work hard, he will help you.  Most of the complaints sound like sour grapes.  If you are lazy--and most students at this school are--this is not the guy for you.  Golf club--so what. Why is that important&#63;  Of course, since he no longer is here, this is all a waste of time.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Good professor, excellent in depth knowledge of history.
                
                   the man came to class with a golf club.  very confusing and goes on tangents about things that has nothing to do with history
                
                   He is so caught up in being a Dr.  Very rude and does not care about students.  Stay away from him!
                
                   He will tell the class he is a **** and he is not kidding at all.He is the most horrible person and teacher on the face of the earth.
                
                   he's a closet football coach who hates teachers who are coaches
                
                   Way too arrogant and intimidating.  Dry as toast.
                
                   He is the hardest History professor I have ever had.  He gives a lot of essays to write and his tests are so hard.  Also, can be somewhat of a jerk
                
                   Dr. Sarantakes is a great professor.  He does know what he's talking about - even though some of his jokes aren't the best.  Doesn't matter, though. He's easy to talk to, for example, after class or in his office. His quizzes are hard!
                
                   Instructor compresses semester into 7 weeks in order to give students lots of time to work on papers. However, that means he does not cover text material at all and you ARE required to know all the minor details of the text without his covering any of it.
                
                   by far the worst history teacher I have ever had the displeasure to know
                
                   I like this guy.  He knows his stuff.  He needs to stick around.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   if you pass
                
                   No Comments
                
                   DO NOT WASTE YOUR TIME OR MONEY THHIS GUY IS A JOKE. I do think he just a GA.
                
                   Absolutely HORRIBLE teacher! I don't even think he is a &quot;professor&quot; but more like a GA! He gives horrible assignment directions, grades unfairly, gives 1hr limits for his exams with several essay type questions without any kind of prompt which makes it very difficult to complete within an hour. Worst &quot;teacher&quot; ever! DO NOT TAKE if you value sanity!
                
                   If you are not a history person take her, she makes it interesting, and I use to hate history. She's involved in her lectures and really tries to get students attention with topics we might be interested with. Not much HW and if there is she gives you a week to complete just like her tests. TAKE HER.
                
                   AMAZING! I retook His 1301 because I got a D in another teachers class. I was a little nervous about retaking but I am so glad I am! Dr. Wiecko is awesome!! She is really nice and funny and really tires to make history fun! She even dressed up as a pirate on Halloween! Lots of fun!
                
                   Dr. Wiecko is a great professor! I've taken her twice and she has been consistently good as a lecturer. Her class is interesting and her grading is really fair. Great professor!
                
                   GREAT teacher.....feedback on papers is amazing...very helpful..cares about her students...
                
                   Wieko is an amazing professor. Her syllabus looks a bit rough at first, but once you get past the initial shock of the reading, it's not that bad. She's really nice and pretty laid back. Her classroom is really inviting for discussion about the topic, and she has amazing patience when listening to people's ideas/opinions. Love her!
                
                   Really helpful, lectures can be a bit boring at times, but she tries to make it interesting
                
                   Great class. If you have a love for History, take her.  Three pragmatic essays over course material.  She provides what the essays will be before you take her exams. Just study you will be fine.  I got a 100 on one of her exams.  Simply put, watch youtube on AP US History for the time period you are discussing, you will get an A, I promise. 
                
                   The best professor on the TAMU-CC campus. She cares about her students and wants them to succeed. 3 written exams and one paper there are in class assignments everyday. Her lectures are very interesting. Take Dr. Brown if you have the chance!
                
                   Sometimes she would mention how it was "her theory" and that kind of got my attention because how am I to know if her theory is right or wrong? Overall a good teacher, but if you do not like reading I would not recommend this class.
                
                   Awesome professor who really cares about her students. She is passionate about History which makes her lectures interesting, and she includes pictures of her travels to various historical sites. The no electronics policy makes it easier to concentrate and really grasp the material. Overall a great professor!
                
                   I took 1302 at a community college and actually loved history for once in my life. Taking this class made my dislike for history come back. Lectures are unclear, she has and extremely awkward demeanor and she grades her test way to hard. Unless your really good at memorizing a lot or ACCURATE facts for multiple chapters don't take this class. :( 
                
                   awkward and moody best describes dr brown.  catch her in a bad mood & watch out.  saw her jump down the throat of one of her graders even!  as far as assignments and tests, she's good.  but dont expect any type of personable relationship or approachable, easy to talk to type.   No electronics in her class.  I do NOT recommend her at all.  Stay away
                
                   She is a great and quirky teacher. Yes, everything is essay based and yes, she is strict on phones, but she should be. I wish I would have studied more, I would have done better in the class but I'm not going to say she's a horrible teacher for my mistakes. If you just study a little every night like she says to do, you should do fine.
                
                   Good teacher would recommend. She is easy as long as you do the assignments. No problem getting a good grade.
                
                   very awkward teacher... gets frustrated when the class doesnt want to participate and can tell when nobody has read. very strict on cell phones & will call you out.. everything is essay based but shes not that hard of a grader. she outlines her lecture notes on BB..print those out, add to them during lecture, study those and you'll ace her class!
                
                   She wasnt THAT bad.. theres 3 short essay assignments, but only have to be 1-2 pg long and its your response about something in the ch that we're going over. mid term and final are also essay based. she doesnt grade very hard. print out the outline of notes she gives you on blackboard..add to them in lecture, study those and you'll ace the class
                
                   Didn't learn a thing in her class. All assignments/tests were essays and she didn't grade easy. Awkward and boring class. Don't recommend her.
                
                   Didn't learn a thing in her class. All assignments/tests were essays and she didn't grade easy. I still passed but I dreaded her class every time. Awkward and boring class. Don't recommend her.
                
                   Horrible professor. Stay at all costs. Went to class everyday and didn't learn anything. She is a "refer to the book" professor. Nothing is ever good enough for her essay's. Do not take this professor.
                
                   Super easy class! Every assignment is an essay! Shes willing to help you with your essay writing if necessary. Read the chapter, read the handouts, and print out notes! Easy A!!
                
                   he was nice but hard
                
                   I took Dr. Carrolls class in 2009, yet everything he taught me I've carried with me into other classes. He is very passionate about history and will challenge you to think on your own and make connections with the present time. If you want to learn I highly suggest you take his class. Seminar class is supposed to help with making connections.
                
                   Dr. Caroll is a great guy and i proabably would have loved this class had it not been for the seminar class that TAMUCC requires you to take along with HIST1340. the Assignemnts are not clear and little to no direction is given and the grading process is awful. If you are not a great writer DO NOT TAKE THS CLASS.
                
                   Great teacher go for him!
                
                   Interesting guy. I took this class over the summer (mistake!). He had this weirdo doing the grading. Not only was the grader weird, but he was anal and graded VERY hard. I lost 20 points off the essay section of the first test because of him. There were only two tests, which meant they counted for a LOT of the course. Unreasonably difficult.
                
                   I hate History, but I love this class!  Dr. Carter teaches with so much enthusiasm it's ridiculous!  He really brings it in a way no other history teacher ever has.
                
                   I loved having Carter for HIST 1302. The way he showed how much he cares about history and the way he helps us to understand. He uses music to incorporate what he is teaching. The test are super easy but you still learn. I will always remember what he taught me in his class! TAKE HIS CLASS!
                
                   This was my second semester of history and I absolutely loved it...Dr.Cater teaches history in a way that college students can relate to and he knows what he's talking about, he didn't teach out of the book which I also liked, his tests were good if you studied what he told you too.  Overall he is a great teacher and I enjoyed learning history!
                
                   Carter was a blast as a teacher. He was always interesting, and has a TON of passion for what he teaches. He focuses on the overarching trend of American history, which makes his class especially interesting. Great tests, too.
                
                   I thought he was a great teacher, definitely knows his stuff.
                
                   Great teacher, really sparked my interest in History
                
                   No Comments
                
                   he is an extrememly intresting professor. he goes into depth for all his lectures and his clarity is awesome.
                
                   Dr. Carter is really, really into Vietnam.  He is super passionate about what he teaches.  The pic of him on the school phonebook online does NOT do him justice.
                
                   This class was harder than I expected. I don't really like history and couldn't stay focused in class which reflected my quiz grades and probably overall grade. He is a good professor and really nice if you need help but the grading for the class is tough at times. 10 quizzes, 2 exams, &a document analysis. Pay attention and I'm sure you'll be fine
                
                   He is a fairly easy prof. His humor is funny at times, but he tends to go off on tangents about his personal life and his grand kids a lot. His L.A. History class is based entirely on the &quot;SSG&quot; Thesis and his love of it. It isn't really a history class, more of a Pol Sci class. One Test, two essays and 5 ten answer quizzes. All in all pretty easy.
                
                   I thought he was a good teacher. As long as you do your reading your good.
                
                   Did not like the class at all. The overall class had a horrible passing rate. He grades way too hard on essays. It's either his way or the highway, no thinking for yourself.
                
                   AWESOME TEACHER. He's not super easy, you have to know your stuff when it comes to the tests, but he's not hard at all. He jokes a lot and makes the class fun.
                
                   Kind of boring, tends to ramble.  Seemed to me like review from middle school education.  Be sure to read from the way we lived book, and pay attention so you can pass the quizzes.  No tests, only midterm and document analysis for final grade.
                
                   This professor loves what he does. If you don't get something he is more than willing to help you. There is a paper at the end of class but you work on it a little bit each week. If you do the easy assignments during the semester you will have no trouble at all with the paper. If you are willing to put in the effort he is willing to help you.
                
                   i hated this man. he is vile and mean. i would delay grad instead of taking him.
                
                   I took all of his Latin Classes. Was a great professor.  Great person too, always willing to explain himself and made sure everyone got it.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Very good man, and he is also very willing to help you.  Just make sure you can write a good essay for his tests
                
                   Great professor, very funny and makes class interesting. She helps explain each assignment we are given in history and breaks things down to make the material seem simple. She is very honest in her grading and if you do not attend her class you won't pass. I would highly recommend her to incoming freshman that think they will need the help.
                
                   Erin was a great Seminar professor, she always made sure you knew what the readings were about, and was very willing to help. I still go to her office every now and then and talk about how everything is going with school. She really introduced college to me when I was really scared, and helped me be better at writing.
                
                   I had Erin for seminar, and she was great! She's hilarious and was really cool  about letting us do what we thought we needed. She always helped us review for history exams in class. I highly recommend her! 
                
                   Great teacher! Very nice, helpful.
                
                   awesome teacher
                
                   When I took her class it was in a history triad-- she was VERY helpful and was straight up with everyone in the class. She gives work that will help in the long run and doesn't just give out 'busy work' attendance is graded, but the class was always entertaininginteresting, so I was hardly absent
                
                   Really good teacher; very knowledgable and intelligent. Tests are free response. Make sure you always take down your ID's and not their historical significance. Take notes. Read the chapters. There are chapter quizzes and one paper. And even extra credit! Good class. Very enjoyable and not extremely hard to make a good great.
                
                   Professor Costanzo grades his own papers, and they are all free response, so do not expect much feedback. This is understandable, but I feel I should mention that. He makes history pretty funny, by making is pretty simple. Make sure you take simple notes, and don't go on tangents.  He will go on tangents, it is just for fun. Don't write everything.
                
                   I'm not too into history but he made it  exciting and easy to understand. he has a great sense of humor and is helpful when you ask for assistance. there is a quiz and discussion every week. my only complaint is the way he grades the research paper. his grading is more strict than my English professor. would take again
                
                   One of the best professors I've ever had. Super helpful and always emails back if you have a question, really funny dude! Do all your homework (its not too much) and go to class and take notes and you'll do great
                
                   Very laid back attitude and cracks a joke every now and then. He really made history relevant to me so two thumbs up for that. Tests were hard but he gives out a review sheet before hand so you know what to study. Homework for this class was reading,  taking a short quiz, then writing a short 200-400 word response to a prompt
                
                   Great prof. I took him for 1302 in the spring and liked him enough to take him again for 1301 this summer! Quizzes every week online, but super easy! Exams and MidtermFinal are essay questions about eventsideas in history. 1-2 papers. Easy if you go to class and know the material. Gives great feedback on exams+ papers. Pretty clear in grades too.
                
                   He's honestly one of the best professors I ever had. I though history was boring before I took this class with Dr Costanzo. Definitely recommend taking his class! His tests are worth 10% for the 1st test, 15% for the next and 20% for the last so it's really helpful. 
                
                   Great teacher, loved the class but be prepared to work. 
                
                   Note taking in this class is impossible. It was really hard to follow along, considering the powerpoint slides weren't really relevant to the subject. Hated this class ENTIRELY. 
                
                   great teacher, keeps you awake by throwing around funny comments, its passable with a c  when you dont go to class alot. reviews are great. the essays are doable, prob the only down is every week mini essays thing
                
                   He's a really cool person. Show up even when you don't feel like it. His quizzes are online - weekly, a weekly discussion board online also. Really easy iou listen and take good notes. DO NOT MISS TOO MUCH CLASS.
                
                   His lectures are all the content in the tests which are essay-like, never multiple choice. So attend class and you'll pass if you take GOOD NOTES and lots of 'em, he's tough but hilarious which makes it interesting, oh - and don't get him started on "John C. Calhoun!" He doesn't mark for attendance but if you miss, you won't pass his exams. 
                
                   Lectures are long but only because there's a lot to cover. Gives a lot of extensions on work and is very understanding of circumstances. My favorite professor thus far!
                
                   The class is only boring if you don't pay attention. And you have to take your own notes, which makes time go by. It's not hard. You just have to put in your own effort.
                
                   A lot of people think he is boring but I personally found him to be very funny. If you do the work and listen you will get an A. He also gives you opportunities to re-do papers. Good professor.
                
                   He is not a very good teacher! Very boring and plain. When you write a paper he grades more on your writing skills then what the writing assignment is really about. Don't take him.
                
                   So boring. He grades like an English teacher not a History teacher. I can tell he knows a lot about the early republic of American and Urban History but not many of his students don't. He is very strict with grading, exams and work. If possibly enroll in another class.
                
                   Long Boring Lectures. Biggest problem with this Professor is, he thinks he is an English professor.  Subjective English style assignments with the grade based more on Writing skills than on the content learned.  Even grades the weekly discussion questions harshly.  Needs to understand that his students may not be at his level of education yet.
                
                   He presents the material clearly and always relates it to modern topics for complete clarity on the subject matter. He is always willing to help with any assignment and questions you have.He is an absolutly amazing teacher that engages you in a conversation rather than just a teacher giving an answer.
                
                   Mr. Dubose makes his classes simple and easy and fun to learn!. He's makes history really interesting and easy to understand. easy quizzes but expects a lot from you on his major exams !
                
                   Mr. Dubose is a great teacher. He is very dedicated and WILL help if you ask. Don't bother showing up late on a test day. Study for all his big tests because they WILL be hard and the small tests are really no-brainers.
                
                   Awesome. Awesome. Awesome. Very devoted to his class in making the material fun and easy to learn. Great personality and a fair grader. I recommend this professor to all my friends. Test can be challenging but nothing a average student cant handle.
                
                   Does a good job of making a fairly boring subject interesting.
                
                   Boring topics of discussion. Tends to invoke politics today into history without logic to back up claims. If you can handle long lectures and racial issues, then this might be your class. Other than that, I would not recommend him.
                
                   He was a really cool young guy who was excited to be there in class and help you in any way possible!
                
                   Mr. Galindo keeps it live. He's young and knows how to relate to his students. On the days he taught history in large lecture, he proved to be if not greater equal in knowledge as our history professor. Seriously TAMUCC hurry up and give this guy his own history section he has earned it. If your looking for a knowledgable UCCP teacher he's ur guy.
                
                   Mr. Galindo really cares about his students. There are a lot of activities that he does so you can get to know your seminar class. I found him extremely helpful when preparing for exams. He was always very upbeat and happy. I had a good time in his class!
                
                   You are lucky if you ever get to take Mr. G for seminar. He likes to reward effort so if you invest in his class he will invest in you. Also don't be afraid to visit his office hours he will really help you prep for the exam essays. Not saying I wouldn't have made an A in history but having him critic your essays is a great tool you should utilize.
                
                   One of the most interesting professors I've ever had. Very young but has exceptional knowledge on history. He's very charismatic and amiable so class will be fun. Don't miss a day in class cause it could be the difference between an A and a B.  However if your looking to make an A in history he will facilitate the process but you have to work hard.
                
                   David is an amazing seminar leader.  He helped to make History more interesting and easy to digest.  And, if we had any questions, he was willing and able to help us in any way possible.  If you have the opportunity to take his class, seize it.  It's well worth your time!
                
                   Absolutely amazing professor. Undoubtedly one of my favorite. She's tough, but she will make you think like no other.
                
                   Boring class, but pretty easy if you go
                
                   The classes are interesting. The testes are somewhat difficult because of the essay so be sure to prepare before the exam. The assigned reading book was awful but overall the class wasnt bad.
                
                   awesome class... exams are long essay and 20 MC...i hate history and she actually make it enjoyable...
                
                   She is a good teacher. Shes sarcastic though but personally I love it! The other day in class someone's cell phone went off and she said &quot;if it's for me, tell then I'll call them back.&quot; --or something along those lines. She makes you want to learn more about history and makes it fun!
                
                   I walked up to her one day and told her how i was lagging behind in the reading and she told me hints that ACTUALLY saved me time and effort in the reading and writting.
                
                   I think She would be the teacher to sign up for when taking history. She is very helpful if you go and ask for it and her class is not easy to where you don't learn anything but its not hard to where you fail
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Dr. Heath is an excellent teacher.  She's not boring at all...and she's funny.
                
                   She's a REALLY good teacher.
                
                   The review she gives you is the BEST and ONLY way you need to study.  Majorly helps.  Got As on all the tests, but the book review kicked my ass.  Make sure you read that one...
                
                   Heath was cool, kind of a hard ass at times.  But she was fair  and shes really smart I totoally respect her.  She kicked my ass in that class.
                
                   sucked azz.. don't take her.. take James Carter
                
                   Heath is a wonderful professor.  She gives such detail in her lectures that i find it difficult to NOT pay attention.  I admire her knowledge and enjoy her class very much.  She is to the point, no BS after the facts.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   She is an excellent teacher. She actually finds a way to make history interesting! She is also willing to help outside of class as much as she can. She has a great personality...I highly recommend her!!!
                
                   This class is challenging.  I wasn't a big fan of History, but her class actually made me like it.  She's a very good professor.  Taking GOOD notes and being present at all lectures is a must!
                
                   Very interesting for a history course. The professor makes it come alive and it is more like listening to stories of American history rather than a lecture. Very helpful too.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Extremely well-structured class with no surprises.  Everything is amazingly clear and professional.  She mentions her office hours constantly and keeps with informative and concise lectures.  Challenging, but beneficial.  Can't say enough positive things.
                
                   made history interesting couldn't have passed it without him. I actually learnd and remembered info we covered
                
                   He is the best History teacher I have ever had. He is very nice and humorous. You should be a friend of him!!!
                
                   He is an amazing professor very dedicated to his work....my best advise for those who want to take this class should take this professor!!!!!! Its a great human!!!
                
                   SO nice and helpful. He gives you all the information you need to pass and doesn't try to trick you with anything. Definitely take his class!
                
                   I actually had this instructor at a Different school but his class was the most easiest class ever!!! Passed his class with an A
                
                   Easy teacher. Its his mission to make the class as easy as possible. However, some of the test questions were kinda tricky & they're the only grades in the class. Kinda boring too. Overall, pretty good.
                
                   great professor, three of the five quiz's were just sign-in sheets where you got a 100 for coming to class.
                
                   His way of teaching is dry. Keep up with the reading! His TA grades hw assignments harshly. If you are not a history buff, this class will be difficult.
                
                   He is very enthusiastic about history. His tests are really hard and if you do not study you will fail. His TAs grade his essays pretty harshly so make sure you answer the question to the t.
                
                   Best teacher I have had so far at TAMUCC.
                
                   His in class quiz's are easy but the essays are difficult because his TAs grade harshly. His tests are pretty difficult so if you don't study you will fail.
                
                   He's the kind of teacher that you'd think should be interesting, but for some baffling reason he bores me to tears. If you can handle boredom well and are organized, this class should be a piece of cake. Procrastinators beware.
                
                   He's really nice and the work is pretty easy. Just go to class and he practically gives away As. He gives quizzes in class that you don't even have to read for and you only need 5 out of 10 questions right to get a 100. The hardest thing is probably the essays on the tests.
                
                   He's a nice guy, but the class is boring. He's kind of all over the place and his powerpoints aren't that good. His exams aren't too hard but you do have to study for them and it's 2 essays and some multiple choice or open ended. He's cool you just have to get through his lectures...
                
                   He's a very good teacher who knows his history and always has a good lecture prepared.
                
                   Lectures are easy to follow, she ensures you understand before moving on. Keep up with reading because of pop quizzes. Tests are mostly essays, she tries to make you a better writer so write clearly and have a thesis. No textbook but there were 2 books to read. Her quizzes are short answer, write plenty with lots of detail. Will take her 1302 class
                
                   Very helpful and has a lot of common sense! Go to office hours if you need anything. She is so nice and cares about her students.  You must attend lecture or you won't have notes or other material needed for the test.  All assignments are outlined on the syllabus.  Easy quizzes over 3 novels.  Would highly recommend, one of my favorite professors!!
                
                   The way she arranges things is simple, which is nice (no surprise assignments or quizzes or anything mid-semester). You must attend lecture t.
                
                   Although there are only two major tests and three quizzes if you just pay attention in lecture and in in your seminar class you will pass. She actually does care!!!
                
                   Boring lectures. Doesn't post grades. Not many assignments during the semester and only two tests, you can't afford to get a low grade on either. If you're borderline, forget about knowing if you got an AB, BC, or DF till after the semester is already over. No grades posted to bb.
                
                   Class was somewhat simple. Lecture, read 3 books, 3 quizzes over the books, 2 papers & 2 tests. Must take notes to pass tests  BEWARE: although her class is structured very simple, she gives vague feedback, instructions are not very clear, she takes forever to grade & you're required to keep track of your own grade, take this class with caution
                
                   Spoke too much during lecture, grades too hard, have favorites which are his honor students
                
                   Dr. Moore is an awesome teacher! The class was very demanding but, saying that you "hate" his class because of the essay you must submit with each exam is a cop-out. If you actually focus this class is not hard at all. Moore helps you understand everything! I swear he's an amazing professor.
                
                   Pretty good professor, he is extremely helpful and gives you all the information you need to pass his tests. His lectures are pretty engaging and he loves history. Someone who doesn't like history very much may hate his class however. Extensive studying is required to do well on tests (no multiple choice).
                
                   History is one of my worst subjects. Hated his exams because you have to write an essay and short essay answer. Only few multiple choice. He covers a lot of information. I am barely passing his class. I wouldn't take him unless you love history like he does.
                
                   He has been my favorite professor so far. It's a lot of material, but his lectures are interesting and you actually learn something. Going to class and doing the study guides really helps. I've learned  more from him than in all of my previous history classes combined. Excellent teacher.
                
                   I took HIST 1301 as a summer class. It was very intensive but the proffesor was great. His lectures were clear, but he doesnt use a textbook and he asks you to write everything he says. You need to study for the exams from your own notes (the SI helps). He wants students to participate in class.
                
                   He's a really easy prfessor to learnf from. He's not boring, and he's glad to answer everyone's questions. The exams aren't too bad, he gives you study guides and all the possible essay questions beforehand so if you prep you'll be fine.
                
                   He is very organized and knows a lot about what he's teaching. He is smart and funny :) Essay questions are killer though...
                
                   This professor was amazing; his class is very hectic at times, but learn to keep your priorities straight and you'll be amazed at how much you'll love this class. Got a 55 on my 1st test, studied behind off and earned a 94 on exam 2. Studied more on Exam 3 and got a score of a 106.5. Enough to earn a &quot;A&quot; and didn't have to take final. GREAT TEACHER
                
                   I loved this class!
                
                   As long as you read the material its easy, although the SI sessions suck, a total waste of time
                
                   This class was fun, make sure to attend every lecture, take good notes, lots of quizzes, and easy reading.
                
                   I had this professor and it was just too much. The professor makes your write essay quizes yep thats right I dont think any of the student down below mentioned that. Also all the exams are written ( no multiple choice) so I was releifed to drop his class, I felt 15 pound lighter.
                
                   WORST class I have ever taken! There is a quiz that is graded ridiculously hard almost every class. He also requires multiple books/ a substantial amount of reading. He likes to think he is the ONLY class you are taking.
                
                   This teacher was very rude to me about being absent when I was admitted to the hospital for three days. He made a bad situation even worse, when I had gone out of my way to strain myself doing everything I could. Doctors excuses and all, he couldn't care less. He was an okay teacher. Just don't take him if you &quot;plan&quot; on getting sick.
                
                   amazing!
                
                   Dr. Moore is one of the few professors who actually cares about his students, attend class, take notes on his lecture, not just powerpoint and make sure to read the reading assignments, he has about 10 quizzes so make sure to stay on top of it, complete the study guides, the tests are straightforward and mostly off of the guide, an A is achievable
                
                   Excellent Teacher.  He is very clear in his teaching and all the tests are based on his power points.  He kept History interesting and was definitely one of my favorite core classes to attend.  I would recommend him any day.
                
                   Go to class and pay attention.  Take notes on what he's saying, not just the powerpoint.  He's very fun and easy to talk to if you need help. If you do the study guides, the tests will be a breeze.  Keep up with the reading responses.  They can kick you in the ass.  Otherwise, I loved his class and him as a teacher.  Highly recommend him.
                
                   Dr. Moore is a great professor. He is really into History, and makes it really fun. His quizzes are easy mainly cus u get to take them home or use your notes so if you take good notes you'll have a 100. He posts  up what will be on his tests on webCT so you know what to study. the firs test i didnt study and got a 55 second got an 85.
                
                   If you want to pass this class, you HAVE to read. He will absolutely help you if you ask him, you just have to communicate. Even though the tests are all essay tests, they are not hard if you just do the review. The review and the test have the exact same questions so you will make an A if you prepare and are specific wyour answers (names & dates)
                
                   He post up the review for test with short answers and essay. If you study that you will get A on test but you have to include information from the book. He has a quiz every week over the reading. Two essays over two books that you must read. He expects you to try and learn from his class but at times can be rude.
                
                   Taking this course was a pain, but I got through it. All his test are essay questions. You must study and do his test review if not you will be lost. I took more time preparing and studying for this course more than my other classes. Also you must write a total of two essays on two books.  got a B. He has his moments when he appears mean.
                
                   Don't take him. None of what he goes over in class is on the tests, the tests come straight from the book. He is an extreme liberal and shoves his beliefs down your throat, even makes you read a book and write a review on liberalism. We talked more about how people felt instead of major events like the Texas Revolution and stuff like that.
                
                   He makes topics interesting and if you listen to what he says and visit him in office hours you will definitely get a good grade
                
                   The absolute best history professor I have ever had! DO not listen to anyone who says he is a bad professor because he's not. If you go to his class on time, do your homework, study hard, and GO TO HIS OFFICE HOURS HINT HINT, you will pull off an A. In the tests he expects you to be super detailed and that will definitely count in your test grade. Overall best professor ever.
                
                   Quiroz is an awesome guy, and a really good professor. You HAVE to show up and pay attention to get the full idea of what he's talking about, though. Staying home and copying down his online notes WILL NOT help. He'll tell you exactly what he wants on the exams and essays, so attend class.
                
                   Dr. Quiroz is a very good professor. You have to work hard for his class so always attend class!! That will be very helpful to do so you wont get behind. Every Friday you WILL have a test so do not come to class late on Fridays. Overall, you won't do well unless you try. Also for extra help GO TO HIS OFFICE HOURS!!
                
                   His exams are all essay questions.  You also have to read two additional books and write essays on them.  Attendance is not taken, but a must. There are quizzes every week. You'll learn a lot and typically enjoy his lectures... but be prepared to work! He is very smart and a nice guy, just too gung-ho about TX hist.
                
                   I only  recommend him for Hist majors or enthusiasts. He requires way more than he should for non-majors and for a core class. I also found his grading to be biased-when he says he wants YOUR opinion, he really wants HIS. He does, however, try to prepare you for the workload and is very passionate about what he does. He is a great person and prof
                
                   Be prepared to work your butt off in this class. Never knew Texas History could be this hard. 3 books rq, tons of reading, & a quiz almost every week.
                
                   Dr. Quiroz expects a lot of work from his students. Portfolios help overall grade, as well as quizzes. Notes are online, but explains them more thoroughly in lecture. Recommend if you are up for the challenge.
                
                   He's really scatter-brained and opinionated, but because of the way his tests are (short answer and essays), you do learn a lot.  This class definitely takes a lot of time and effort to do well, though.
                
                   Great teacher he will make you have your own thoughts. A lot of reading and studying, but it only helps you become a better student. Quizes every week,but it to help your grade. Don't procrastinate and you will do fine. He gives you the ability to revise papers if done early.
                
                   one of the best prof i've ever had the privelege to learn from.  he's very difficult but that's a good thing...means you're learning something!  his lectures are interesting and bring the history alive.  he will make you work as well you shoudld.  take his class to get your monies worth
                
                   I got a B in his class but spent more time for it than my other 2 classes combined.Rather than 1 textbook he uses a bunch of little books.He wants back just what he gives u,nothing else.Prefer not to take him again.
                
                   kinda hard class, but u will learn it
                
                   The class material was not really hard, but you had to study hard and read everything that was assigned.  He was not boring when he lectured and tried to keep everyone participating in the class.  He was great if you needed help too, all you have to do is ask.  He came to our seminar classes to talk to us and help us on a personal level with the position papers we had to write.  Not an easy A but definitely obtainable as long as you do study and try hard.
                
                   He was a great teacher but his test were pretty hard!
                
                   hes a great teacher i love his lectures. they are so awsome.
                
                   He's is hands down one of the best History Professors I have ever taken!! He has a lot of reading in his class but it's worth it. His essays can be tough but if you listen to his lectures and read, read, read you should be able to get a great grade! Just remember to set aside a lot of time for reading...
                
                   I loved Dr. Pruitt's class! He lets you take in a page of noted with you for the test to use as a cheat sheet. He's very funny and makes learning fun. If you don't pass his class, you weren't paying attention in class or didn't go in the first place.
                
                   Absolutely loved Dr. Pruitt! He definitely made things really understandable. Just go to class and listen the lecture and take notes along with his powerpoints. Real simple! He was awesome! Made going to class early in the morning bearable. Very easy going and funny! If you get the chance to have Dr. Pruitt, I suggest you take the opportunity!
                
                   Once you get a note taking process down, it's simple. I rec printing out the presentation and bringing it to class. He's pretty mellow, tells jokes, and makes it clear what he wants on essays.  If you're in a good class, he'll let you use notes on the exams. Don't miss class, you'll miss something important like extra credit!
                
                   AWESOME professor! he's really down to earth and makes lots of jokes. his lectures are done by powerpoint slides and he explains each of them very well.  for exams he sends out a study guide on blackboard and allows you to bring it to the exam ANSWERED and you can use it! if you're really struggling in the class u have some serious issues.
                
                   Very Down to earth kind of guy.  Talks like you're having a conversation with a good ol' boy, not like a super educated doctor. Keeps some humor in his lectures, and makes you feel comfortable to talk to him. He's a bit tough on essays, but gives you help where you need it and tells you what he expects.
                
                   Great professor! He is funny, helpful and will go the extra mile to help you understand. Makes learning history fun.
                
                   She is a talker and Not a listener, I am sure she is a great history teacher. However, she is not the best seminar teacher. She will talk your head off and not listen to your initial question, and won't give you a chance to talk. She can be rude, and the seminar was extremely unhelpful for the actual class attached to the seminar- Macroeconomics. 
                
                   She will sit with you until you understand it, extremely helpful, she's awesome and really sweet, take her ASAP! She knows her history...
                
                   I Hated history classes until I took Mrs. Riley's Summer 2 class. She did not assign a text book. Instead she made the class very interesting by assigning &quot;You Can't Remain Neutral On a Moving Train&quot;, and &quot;Triangle, The Fire That Changed America&quot;, Two books that put a very interesting spin on what would usually be a monotonous history class.
                
                   Brilliant, Oxford-educated, but extremely demanding.  Requires heavy documentation; purely lecture style in British fashion.  Very dogmatic so need heavy back-up for any contrary opinion.  Uses dismissals and putdowns in dry English manner, and they are not intended to be funny, because she has NO sense of humor.
                
                   Dr. Sanos is a great professor. Attendance is very important or she will deduct from your grade. If you go every day and read the assigned readings and make sure to FOOTNOTE in your essays, you will do well. She gives quizzes before each class and you are allowed to use your notes that you have taken from the readings.
                
                   Ah, Sanos. Think of French aristocracy, ready to behead you at the slightest breach of courtesy or manners.  I dreaded her & then loved her because she honestly is a great teacher.  The class is not  abnormally hard, but it is challenging & time intensive.  This does make you feel good about the success you achieve and drives you improve upon it.
                
                   Dr. Sanos will challenge you. She has daily quizzes that expect you to think critically and require in-depth reading of the texts, including quotes and page numbers. DO NOT SPEAK unless you know what you're saying or humiliation will be imminent. She is a great professor and I highly recommend her if you actually want to learn something.
                
                   Sanos is a great teacher, but expect to do A LOT of reading and TAKE NOTES! She will give a quiz at the beginning of each class about the readings for the day.She will expect exact quotes and page numbers from the readings as well. I have taken her multiple times because I actually LEARN something from her class! Prepare for discussions!
                
                   Super hard! Be ready to read and write, everyday. Class is Mandatory but you will learn alot and it is worth it to take her. If your a serious Historian, take her! She's been to school in Oxford, London and at Rutgers. Good looking woman and crazy smart. She expects alot, but she's cool.
                
                   Lots of work but worth it!!
                
                   A wonderfullly attractive women in mind body and spirit. Her style of teaching, grading, and testing is writing intensive. Be prepared to give her your best or don't take her at all. I highly recommend talking to her in her office or outside of class if you are a little intimidated by her.
                
                   Dr. Sanos is a very intense person, but she is very useful when you talk to her one on one. Her class can be overwhelming, I studied more for her class then I did for any other class so be prepared to work. Her class is so worth it, I would recommended her hands down.
                
                   I had Dr. Sanos for a class about the Enlightenment and the French Revolution at Texas A&M University-Corpus Christi.  She truly was a master of her craft, but the only problem I had with her is that her handwriting sucks--she'll put comments on graded papers that you can't read.  She's got a very cool accent, and she's very approachable too.
                
                   Professor Scallet is a great professor! I actually retained what he taught me about history! Pay attention to lectures bc thats where tests come from. The only thing that was kind of difficult were the 2 papers. Other than that, I recommend him completely. 
                
                   I recommend taking his class! Such a great professor and actually made History fun for me! As long as you come to class and study, there should be no reason to not make an A. I wish I could take him again because he was such a helpful professor. 
                
                   Scallet is by far one of the better professors I have had at TAMUCC! Very clear and thorough,creates engaging and informative lectures out of what otherwise could be considered boring material. Policies, graded assignments, and tests are very fair and easy if you attend class and take notes. Getting an A is pretty manageable. Pretty Jolly dude 
                
                   Greatest History Professor Ever! Will help if you just ask, understands if you need to miss class, just let him know ahead of time. Wish he taught all of my classes.
                
                   Absolutely loved this class! Wish I could actually re-take it. GREAT PROFESSOR! MUST TAKE HIS CLASS!!
                
                   Scallet is great! His class is the first time I was actually interested in History. He teaches in a very story-telling way and his class is really easy. I don't advice skipping his class cause the things he says show up on the test, not really things from the book.
                
                   For the first time in my life history is interesting. He is an amazing teacher that keeps the material fun to learn. He is pretty laid back and willing to help. 
                
                   She was a great professor. Aimed to help you learn material and was straight forward. She did not provide powerpoints so lectures should be paid in attention!
                
                   The class is pretty easy, just be ready to do a short reading 2-3 times a week. There were 4 or 5 extra credit opportunities during this course, and Rueda is pretty good at keeping the lectures interesting. There were only two tests and some short essays due--all relatively easy content.
                
                   Dr. Rueda assigns a reading every meeting and you have to answer a question assigned for each meeting as well. She expects too much for test in a short amount of time. She grades harshly and deducts for everything in a paper. You must attend class, read assignments, and do homework. She does give review sheets for the test and shows examples.  
                
                   Dr. Rueda usually expects a decent amount of class participation in discussions, but if you don't speak up in class it's not a big deal. She assigns daily readings, but they're not long or difficult. Basically, if you show up and listen to the lecture, you should do fine in the class. There was a lot of extra credit and her office hours are helpful
                
                   I loved Dr. Rueda's class! She assigns reading every night and in-class writing assignments, but it's really not that bad compared to most other classes I've taken. She's knows her stuff, and she's more than willing to help you if you communicate with her and do your work. There were three extra credit opportunities throughout the semester. 
                
                   if you have a choice, dont take rueda.  she's new and has no idea how to run a classroom.  figuring things out as she goes along.  i think she forgot how freshman history is and thinks she teaching a senior class.  she is really really hard.
                
                   She seems to believe she is your one and only professor. She assigns crazy amounts of reading in short amounts of time on top of everything else you take. She then gives tons of pop quizzes and or writing assignments. Honestly glad it is over and wouldn't take her again.
                
                   Her lectures are easy to listen to and interesting.  She gives outlines to the tests so if you fill them out and understand what is asked on the review you are guaranteed success on the actual test. If you go to office hours she will help out a lot. All in all a great teacher.
                
                   She should not be a professor. Absolutely terrible.
                
                   Terrible professor. DO NOT TAKE, go take this class at another university, it is worth it to avoid her.
                
                   First year teacher, rule follower.  Very nice.  Recommend going to office hours and introducing yourself.  
                
                   Teaches in a relaxed atmosphere
                
                   He's really funny. Weird comments sometimes, goes off topic usually, but very funny guy. Keeps it interesting. Likes to talk about celebrities. And Homer Simpson.
                
                   Very boring at times, but easy course to take if you concetrate well on all the book reviews and take notes, plus do the reading they are important.
                
                   great man, love his humor and he taught me a lot.  Just make sure you know the SIGNIFICANCE of the questions on the test.
                
                   Funniest professior ever. His lectures are A+++++++
                
                   Annoying jokes all day, but its an easy grade.
                
                   He's very helpful.  Just have to ask.  Always be sure to know your dates.  If not, it'll kill you on a test.
                
                   Boring, thinks he's funny.
                
                   This professor was awesome. She is so nice and even though she has an accent you can still understand her and she is ALWAYS willing to help you. Also, you will receive  quizes every week but you will cover the questions in class they are easy and just ready her study guides you will be fine she basically helps you with everything.
                
                   Quizzes every week, so if you don't read, you're screwed. Tests are essays which are based on primary source documents so you don't really have to know anything to do them.
                
                   The class consists of lecture and class work. The classwork is pretty easy, a few paragraphs here and there. She doesn't take attendance. Her tests are essays based on primary sources. The way she speaks is a little confusing, but you don't need to know anything at all to get an A. I didn't learn anything but I got an A for the essays.
                
                   Take her class if you want a TON of homework. There is a quiz every week and you HAVE to study for them or you will fail!!
                
                   Had Song for multiple classes, it's best if you do the readings. Sometimes hard to understand due to accent but very helpful. Her tests are from the readings and lectures so go to class, however I missed about 3 and still made an A. I'd take her again!
                
                   
                
                   Hes a real cool laid back guy, but gives good funny lectures. Test are easy if you study and will work with you.
                
                   Wooster delivers enjoyable and very informative lectures. His lecture style will make you enjoy the material being discussed. His way of lecturing stays the same and you will begin to notice as the semester goes on. His tests are not to difficult if you pay attention in class and take notes. Great professor and class. Highly recommend taking course
                
                   No better History professor on campus
                
                   Amazing teacher. Very helpful and understanding.
                
                   Dr. Wooster was an amazing professor, made me interested in history which made it very easy to learn. Would take again without a doubt!!!!!
                
                   I loved his course when i took it. He is a very interesting teacher, and his class is easy as long as you study and take decent notes. 
                
                   Let me just say Im being really honest here but this professor right here is the best! His class was easy an easy A, he's very clear and to the point. He really knows his stuff so it makes you interested. If I could I would take him again cause hes just that good. Dr. Wooster you're the best! 
                
                   Dr. Wooster is a great professor, and I highly recommend him! He's hilarious, and his lectures are like listening to stories. He's very knowledgeable and passionate about history (specifically the Civil War). Hever gives 3 exams a semester and as long as you do the readings and go to class, you'll pass easily. 
                
                   Dr. Robert Wooster is one of the best professors I've ever had. His lectures are interesting for everyone (even non-history majors). He always reviews from his last lecture so you know what he's talking about. His test aren't the worst, but you do have to study and take quality notes during lectures. If you have the opportunity to take him, do it. 
                
                   Funny and interesting lectures. He gave three essays including the final. Usually included an essay, but he gives out a review sheet before hand so you know what to study. Overall you get a happy vibe and he's enthusiastic about his lectures.
                
                   Dr. Wooster was the best!!! His lectures aren't terrible ti sit through; it's like he was there in that point of history and is telling his students a story!! Best decision of my life to take Wooster!! I wouldn't take any other teacher!
                
                   Absolutely fantastic.
                
                   BEST HISTORY TEACHER EVER! Will make you laugh and cry! Every lecture was better than the one before!
                
                   Professor Wooster is amazing. Not strict with test top 3 are taken. I had surgery and he suggested I skip the first test to rest. Material is very easy and straight forward if you attend class and he does give a review. Essays are graded fairly but it does depend on his grader for the semester. 
                
                   Wooster is a great teacher! One of my favorites I have taken a class with on campus. He really knows his stuff and wants to make sure you understand it too! The tests are not very hard as he outlines just what will be on it. Listen, take good notes in class, maybe hit up a few SI sessions and you should be good to go!
                
                   Great teacher! One of my favorites! He's funny and know a lot about history. Lectures weren't too bad to sit through and tests were pretty simple because he gives a review of exactly what you need to know. If you can, take his class!
                
                   Very intertaining, funny, and made the class interesting!
                
                   Dr. Wooster is very committed to history. I really hate history, but he had a way of making it funny and interesting. He really knows his stuff and expects you to know it well. His tests were a little difficult. However, he always gives reviews. Go to SI sessions and you will have an enjoyable semester. If I could I would take him again.
                
                   Wooster is an amazing professor who will help you to enjoy history like never before; His knowledge and humor are contagious.  Make sure that you come to every class (his lecture slides are not published online), read the textbook thoroughly (exams are over lecture and textbook material), and talk to him if you have any questions.  Go register now!
                
                   The best professor I have ever had! Before his class I hated history, and after it I actually enjoy listening to stuff about it. Wooster is an excellent teacher, he will help you if you are struggling, and as well he is one funny guy. His lectures are interesting, and if you really want a good grade, it's a good idea to attend the lectures.
                
                   Class was a breeze. His lectures were interesting and kept me awake even though it was a night class. Online quizes were open book open note.  Tests and finals werent bad if you go over his notes.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Monotone boring lectures, but a really nice guy. He's willing to help if you ask for it. Read the syllabus... if you ask questions from the syllabus in class he'll call you out for it. Massive curves on all tests because they're relatively hard. I had the 3 hour class and most people left midway through.
                
                   He is an amazing lecturer. He is a bit monotone but if you can get past that you will gain a new perspective in history. You must do the reading and attend all the classes. While he does not keep attendance you will fail because his tests are based on the lecture. If you have any interest in the subject talk to him after class. 
                
                   Really nice guy but three hours straight with him will make you rethink your decision making ability. He is SOOOOOOO slow. Really nice guy though.
                
                   History after WWII is a great class to take. Very interesting and interactive class. MUST DO READING. essay based exams. Show what you know.
                
                   Very nice man. Very interesting class to me. Lectures are good and very important. Test material is about half book half lecture. MUST READ THE BOOK IF YOU WANT TO PASS. He is a little monotone, but if you can get over that and show interest in the class you will succeed.
                
                   While I've listed HIST 106 as the course I am evaluating, I have taken three courses with Dr. Ryan; obviously I appreciate his non-traditional teaching style. He does require a lot of reading, but in history courses this should be expected. Also, he requires less reading than his did in previous years.
                
                   I took the Great Depression through WWII class.  The class drags on and there is a lot of reading but I did learn a lot.
                
                   All I can say is I worked really hard and got a C. Not your average C, but a 79. I pleaded and did everything to get ONE point and he still gave me a C. Don't expect him to give you anything. Other than that, it's straight forward.
                
                   He rambles about nothing during class. If you read the textbook, there is no reason to even go to class. I had the three hour class and I only went the whole time for one class. The test are common sense and require minimum studying to pass. There is around a 10 curve per test in the class.
                
                   This Prof gave me the feeling I was listening to an audiobook in class. He gives out alot of information and talks in a way a book author would write. This Prof makes sure his students read the large amounts of material through his tests, which are very curved.
                
                   I found his lectures very confusing and a lot of times when on rants. For the most part he lectures right out of the text book so you don't really have to show up for class. Read all the material for that test and you will do fine. They are difficult, but he curves. I'd only recommend him if you don't mind reading A LOT of material. (A LOT!)
                
                   Great for an easy A, but not so great if you really want to learn something.  I learned after the first test that I didn't need to study (or even go to class).  My existing knowledge of American history and Ryan's tremendous curves were enough to make an A.
                
                   A LOT of reading but really interesting! Really nice guy too! Very Democratic if that means anything lol
                
                   He is definitely a very intelligent man, but he doesn't seem to really care about the students as much as other professors. He has a very boring voice which made me fall asleep a lot. He also expects you to read a ridiculous amount of boring material and his tests are very hard. He did not curve much when I took his class. I would not recommend him
                
                   he was very interesting. he does curve a lot, but as long as you show up, listen, and take notes it is easy.  we read bury my heart at wounded knee which is a great book.
                
                   He is a very good teacher. If you are willing to read and want to learn take him. The test are only hard if you dont attend class or take notes.
                
                   He is a very intelligent man. If you go to class everyday read the chapters several times and read the outside reading you will do fine. The outside reading assignments are very long and boring. Its like reading the history channel.
                
                   learned a lot. exams were hard but he does curve
                
                   This guy is extremely intelligent but doesn't talk over you. He really gets into his lessons and will always answer your questions. His tests are tough so you have to go to class every day or you will be screwed. He assigns a bunch of reading too that's kinda boring, but you get through it. Overall this guy is a great Prof and very smart.
                
                   Good guy bad professor, test way too hard.
                
                   Honestly, this class is easy if you make time for it and not put assignments off until the last second. I procrastinate A LOT for this class but I still have a 98. Midterm and final are very similar and he gives you a study guide on what's going to be on them about a month into the class. You also only have to read one novel but make sure you read.
                
                   He gives ALOT of work! this class was harder than my English class! if you are going to take him, be prepared to have papers due every week, and work every day after class. he lurks on your twitter so make sure you have a different one only for his class! he does give many opportunities but even then it is extremely hard to even get a B!
                
                   Remember in high school when they tried to prepare you for college by teaching you how to take fast notes for a professor who just stands in the front of the class and lectures. This is that class. My advice is take good notes (very important), attend every class, pay attention to his lectures, and summarize your notes.  Challenging class. 
                
                   Everyone is correct about his test. They are hard,but he does warn you on day one that they are. His lectures are amazing and the reading are relevant to the class (just a lot of them). I learned more on Naval Sea Power  and tactics in one semester from him than 4 years in the Navy.
                
                   Got told,the first day i wouldnt make it due to being a freshman. After the first test he chewed everyone out for "having a freshman score higher then you" he seems to also look down on any collage not a&m. His tests are rough. I missed 3 questons and got a 76 due to him randomly removing point c ah cause it wasnt the answer he wanted.
                
                   He's a great professor to sit with and chat, one of the most interesting and opinionated you'll meet! Ask him how to study for his tests.  They are very long and very trying.
                
                   He is a good prson, bt not the best at public speaking.
                
                   I had him for 105 and 106, I thought he was hard for 105 but i also didn't pay attention in class. 2nd semester i told him id make an A, and i did with 56 pages of notes. His tests aren't hard if you take good notes and read outside reading. He cares about his students and is interesting. My fav prof. Now I love history. Attendance is rewarded!
                
                   Very difficult class, if he says it in a lecture even once, it will be on the test. The quizzes over his book are online, and somewhat difficult. The people who say he's impossible are the ones who didn't show up. Study hard. Its college. You'll do just fine and learn a lot. Solid instructor. I recommend him.
                
                   Everyone who wanted an easy A hated this class. His lectures were great but on top of them you have to stay on top of the outside reading and online quizzes. He'll give the class a big curve at the end of the semester because his tests are hard. I loved his class because it finally made history interesting.
                
                   not a very good teacher, what he covers in his lectures are far from what is on the test, he has an ego 1/2 the size of Texas. & the only use for book is for quizzes every 2 weeks. Honestly you would have a better shot looking up info on Wikipedia about the outlines of his &quot;lectures&quot;
                
                   Gives questions on obscure facts from lecture material. Disallows use of all electronic devices in class, insisting old fashion methods, and then assigns mandatory weekly online quizzes. Condescending, talking down to everyone in class, who he assumes are all freshmen. Has annoying phrases which he uses every class such as &quot;rendezvous with destiny&quot;
                
                   People are such whiners. When I graduated high school, this is the difficulty I expected, having taken AP classes. His tests are about as hard as an AP test, but passable if you are good at taking notes, studying, and have good attendance. I left his class wanting to minor in history. He makes things so interesting. Loved him.
                
                   His test are really hard, I hear he takes them himself and even fails sometimes. He thinks he is entertaining but he is NOT, but I do him him credit for trying. I would not recommend him AT ALL!!!!
                
                   Having gone through my undergrad, and currently going through grad school, I can say that this was one of the most interesting classes I have ever taken.  You have to be very attentive and take very meticulous notes, but a study partner make a world of difference.  All in all, you learn a LOT.
                
                   Sure the professor is nice, I agree with all the previous comments about that, but I the tests were extremely frustrating because he purposefully make them difficult so you will fail. He gives a huge curve afterwards so it even outs I just wish i could make a B on at least one of his tests :/
                
                   I took Willett for 105 and Ryan for 106.  I much preferred Willett's class.  He held my interest and I learned a lot more than I did in Ryan's class.
                
                   He is a great professor, his tests are hard and long, but as long as you go to class and listen to the lectures you will do great. He requires you to read a lot, the novels are for the tests, then the other book is used for the quiz's every week. He curves the grade to at least a C average for the class. I recommend him, only history class I liked!
                
                   Dr. Willett is an AMAZING professor, probably one of the best at TAMUG.  I've always hated history, but I enjoyed all of his lectures.  You'll learn things from him that you'll never learn anywhere else; he goes into great detail with his lectures.  His tests are difficult, but if you take good notes and study, you'll do just fine.
                
                   I took this class over the summer and I really enjoyed it.  This is Willett specialty.  The tests are a bit long and you really have to use your notes more than the book it you want to pass the class.  The book is used ONLY for quizes.   Get good notes, get with some friends and you should learn more than China is going to take us out.
                
                   IT'S ALL A BIG STORY. YOU WILL HAVE FUN IN HIS CLASS AND YOU NEED TO DO ALOT OF READING ON YOUR OWN. LOTS OF DATES AND EVENTS BUT HE IS WILLING TO HELP! AWSOME GUY!
                
                   I liked this class because he made it interesting.  He requires a ton of outside reading and his tests are hard.  He does curve though and you can get and A or B as long as you do the work and prepare for the tests.  1st history class I ever enjoyed.
                
                   Assigns 4 books. 2 essay quizzes on BB, 2 formal essays, midterm, and final. Gives lots of options on midterm and final. She's not an easy A but she's very cool and funny. She sometimes sat criss cross on the table haha. Helped when you needed it and explained very well. If you go to lectures and take notes and read the books, you will easily pass
                
                   Good teacher but very hard class. I would only recommend this class to people who's major is history, other than that I wouldn't recommend it. She assigns too many books and she demands too much for a basic course.
                
                   Took her for history 1302, she assigned us like 4 books for the semester, they are cheap and interesting books to read. Class attendance is a must, notes are written everyday. She makes history very interesting but she is not an easy A.
                
                   think twice before you take a higher level class with this professor. She is too demanding and insist on her writing style
                
                   Get ready to write. 3 out of class essays and 2 tests + final . Each test has 20m/c questions with an essay. Study class notes and study guide and you will get A.
                
                   Very nice professor to take for History. Helpful and easy going. Tests are multiple choice with a short essay.
                
                   Good teacher, and very helpful and approachable. Her class is mostly lecture, but you must do outside essays. The tests are pretty hard and attendence is key if you want to pass this class. Not a blow off class by any means. As a plus she makes things interesting!
                
                   She was great. I had her my spring of my freshman year. The class is all lecture, like most, but u do outside reading and essays as well. She is so nice and she makes the subject interesting. I did not go to SI sessions but still got an A
                
                   No Comments
                
                   grrrrrrreat!
                
                   If you go to class and attend the SI sessions you will pass the class with at least a C.  I got a B and I usually fail history classes.
                
                   She's so young I thought she was a teachers assistant!  She is one little hottie especially when she's pregnant!  Just kidding, Dr. Baker!  Thanks for being such a great teacher. I learned alot.
                
                   She was a new professor to TAMUK so I wasn't to sure if I wanted to take her class. However her class was amazing and she's very understanding!  She only has 2 test being her mid term and finally which are simple if you complete the review. Quizzes are short , simple and to the point ! Go to class and you'll surely pass ! 
                
                   I've never found history all that interesting, but his passion for the subject made it really interesting. Just read and try to understand the material. You'll have quizzes for pretty much each chapter of the book, and you'll have two blue book tests that aren't too bad at all if you understood what you read. Overall, great professor
                
                   This is a great History 1301 professor. You will enjoy his lectures, but best of all is that he is willing to help you get a good grade if you are willing to study and read.
                
                   Easy-going. No book required. Majority of his class is lecture, note-taking, and class discussions. He's straight forward about material you must learn which are just the notes on the board and from his lecture. Doesn't require memorization of dates. Tests are easy, made only from material(notes) he has reviewed. Take notes and you should do great!
                
                   His tests are crazy tough. There were only 4 so you only have 4 chances to get a good grade. Taking notes is easy if you go to class, he gives you an outline. He also gives you like 5 or 6 articles to read, sometimes 30 pages long. He'll ask you about some of the articles in the test. Tests are confusing, he's also rude sometimes!
                
                   He doesnt help students. His tests are hard because he cares about the tiny bit of detail. Tests are too hard for G.E. course.  Take someone else. You have been warned. 
                
                   You show up, write some notes and pay attention, and then you pass. There's no textbook, he goes off of what he outlines, and makes lecture easy. No dates to remember (some people find this the hardest). Gives an extra credit chance, DO IT! Take Dr. Davis, and get an B+ to A+.
                
                   The class is interesting, but he moves really fast. Keep your pen and paper ready to write, suggest giving FULL attention to lectures and write down points to help remember them Do not try and write down every little piece of info.  Tests are multiple choice, yet slightly tricky, he'll teach you how to take his tests.
                
                   Do not take Davis! His tests are super difficult and there is absolutely no way to get an A in this class! All the studying in the world will not help you. You've been warned.
                
                   he isnt very clear with his notes & you only take 4 tests two regular and the other two are your midterm and final. fyi he will give you this random pop quiz (not actual pop quiz) asking the name of the president of the school and his full name. goodluck if you decide to take this class
                
                   I lost my Scholarship, because of him, I dont recommend him, Him ,and Butterworth (Physics) are the worst professors in TAMUK. In all my life I never made less than a B -, and I ended up with a D!.
                
                   The class was okay. He only gives you 4 test. You MUST take good notes and study them thoroughly.  Pray before every test.
                
                   Doesn't work with students!!!
                
                   This Professor is very hard, taking notes is a MUST. But he moves on super fast you cant keep up with the notes.This is one of the worst professors ever.Also I find him a bit Offensive.
                
                   Test are easy, you dont use a text book.
                
                   Must attend class, tests are very hard. He makes class interesting but you have to take good notes to do well. By the end of the class I figured out how he tests and did well on last test at least.
                
                   Intimidating teacher. His tests very on difficulty but if you study notes you will be some what ok since some questions may trick you. Main problem I had with him was his essays. He grades harder than an English teacher!
                
                   I really enjoyed his class. He is a great speaker. He makes everything sound interesting and he is funny at times. Everything that he gives as notes is all the test. Just study and you'll do good.
                
                   Awesome class and awesome prof! He actually got me to switch my major and everything. I loved his class and it was the easiest I've taken yet.
                
                   Dr. Davis is intimidating!  He is rude too, but I will admit that taking his class made me work harder to achieve that good grade!  I wouldn't recommend him though...
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He is a very good professor who puts in a lot of passion when teaching history. His tests are straight from his notes and mostly common sense. If you know the topic, then you will know the answers on the test. Dr. Davis' class is very fun, you wont regret
                
                   I took this course for dual credit my junior year and it was not a stressful course, but the lectures prepared me for staying awake in class. I like that she assigns actual books instead text book reading.
                
                   She is a great instructor and crystal clear in her lectures. She is pretty funny and makes the learning interesting. It isn't a class you will pass if you don't try though. If you don't mind reading sometimes and a lot of hand writing  notes you'll be fine. She does give quizzes but they are only 2 questions each and always about the last lecture.
                
                   Everything is based on powerpoint notes, and the terms she gives to study (from notes). Only three exams, multiple choice and an essay. Must read books she assigns to pass. A looot of extra credit.
                
                   She has an attitude problem and does not know what she is talking about. Reads directly from the notes with out going in depth
                
                   Took his online course, he was difficult to get a hold of at times and because of that,  he let us off the hook. His tests are tough, but he tells you exactly what to study for. Just read and be fairly elaborate on your essay questions and you'll be fine.
                
                   take this class online easy A if you work in groups.  Study hard for test flunks everyone first test so You will, up your game.  Copy and paste if you have to, I did it the hard way.
                
                   I took his class online and he was kind of hard because it was a lot of reading and the quizzes were kind of hard. I ended up with a B in the class while taking 21 hours but I would suggest that if you take him online that you have for his class because he expects a lot.
                
                   He is an ok teacker but he's not very clear in what he talks about.
                
                   Mr. Hailey is great. He uses Webct in all of his classes which I love.This is the second class i've taken with him, and I wish I could take more. His class is not an easy A, but it is not boring either.
                
                   Hes nice but jumps around in topic and isnt very considerate
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Professor Hailey is a great teacher.  His class was not boring, thought it wasn't an easy A either.  You do have to read and study, but this is college what do you expect&#63;&#63;
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Strict yes, but if you cant be a serious student then this class will be difficult. I learned more from this guy then I did from all my teachers put together in high school
                
                   he is full of him self, you must attend because the lectures have a lot of info you need for test.
                
                   He is a great professor! Just took him for a summer class and really enjoyed everything he had to talk about. So glad im done with history though! i better have gotten an A in the class haha. Good Luck to all taking him in future semesters. oh dont text or forget a pencil because he will make you leave lmao. for realz
                
                   He is a very good speaker, keeps it interesting. If you want to pass the quizzes you have to pay attention in class because they're mainly on his lectures. If you want to pass his exams you have to read the book and study lecture notes. Other than that he was my favorite teacher this semester.
                
                   I've always hated HISTORY!  Dr. Tuller converted me into a history buff!!!  His story-telling technique crossed me over to reading non-fiction.  I loved his class. Excellent lectured.  Study and you'll pass.. I made an A!
                
                   teaches very well and he is not boring at all...kind of a tough essay grader...overall great professor!
                
                   He was a great teacher, he really knew his stuff. he grades pretty fairly and in my opinion the study guides sucked cause it basically told you to study everything. it was an easy class if you read and took great notes to study. i passed it with a B =)
                
                   awesome dude. grading is very fair. do you work and your readings and you will be set. he's pretty cool once you get to know him.
                
                   Dr. tuller is an awesome teacher. He makes you want to learn all about history. He is funny although attendence is mandatory because his tests come from the lectures but he is very understanding but you have to show him that you are working very hard.
                
                   Awesome professor! He gives good lectures and you will learn.  You have to read the book in order to pass the exams but if you put effort and time in his class you will pass with a high grade
                
                   Actually makes History interesting, and not a snooze fest.
                
                   His class is so boring zzz, he is so strict and angry, although he knows a lot, so if u want to learn, sleepy and study heavy, this is the class. Attendance is mandatory and difficult exams.
                
                   IT ALWAYS LOOKS ANGRY, AND HIS CLASS IS SO BORING
                
                   Great lectures, you actually learn in this class. Be sure to study the textbooks carefully, insane questions are asked on the test, it is impossible to b.s. If you like easy As, don't take this class.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   This wasn't an easy class by any means.  The test had VERY specific questions.  Also, if lecturing for the entire class time puts you to sleep, DON'T take him!  There are also a few of side papers to write that you REALLY have to **** your way through.  I dreaded going to this class!
                
                   Enjoyed class lots!! Dr.Tuller's class was the best one I had this semester. Lots drop after first test, but if you stick it out, you'll do well. Class is in lecture form so take good notes, study them, and when test comes, you should do well. Essays for tests are on lecture. Never read the text book or the additional book and got A. Easy and fun!!
                
                   He's a great teacher, but hard grader.
                
                   This class is awesome.  I am one of those people that loves to hear gossip, and Tuller makes everything seem like gossip.  Its awesome!!! in this class you learn a lot--his tests are a little rough, but you'll get a hang of it.
                
                   I LOVED YOUR CLASS DR TULLER....i pulled my first college A : )
                
                   He has a good sense of humor and is really a great teacher! Expect to take lots of notes and be a good listener because he won't bottle feed you. He puts jokes on his tests and is genuinely a happy person.
                
                   Nice professor. Tests are almost entirely based on the notes. He explains well and also takes attendance every day. No assignments, just 4 tests. He drops the lowest test grade.. Nice guy and will help you out with anything.
                
                   Professor Aguirre is clear with his instructions and the work load is 4 essays with three exams. Do not be intimidated by this because he gives opportunities to receive extra credit by turning in essays early and completing exams early. YES! You read it right, you complete the exams online! He responds the next day to e-mails. TAKE HIM ONLINE!!
                
                   This class was great. He answered emails quickly and gave us everything we needed in order to get an A. Work is not too time consuming, just get it done on time. Overall great professor.
                
                   I took this class online and loved it. Professor Aguirre's instructions are very clear and the workload is very managable. He responds quickly to questions via email and is always available to help. Easy class, would gladly take him again.
                
                   Awesome professor!
                
                   I took him for a Texas History online class and he was very helpful. He provides study guides for each exam and requires essays too but overall the class was pretty easy. Take him you wont regret it : ).
                
                   Dr. Wagy is an excellent teacher. History is my worst subject, but I made and A in his class and I go out of my way to take him. He is definitely one of the best teachers at Texas A&M and he will go out of his way to help you as long as you just ask!
                
                   I've had Professor Wagy for European History, Asian History, History of Vietnam War through Narrative Film, and Cultural History of Texas. His lectures and notes are outstanding. He cares about his students and takes time to ensure they understand what is expected. He should be a required experience, period. I go out of my way to take his courses.
                
                   I changed my major to History after taking one of his classes. He is my favorite professor of all time. Take his class, take them all, he is great!
                
                   Awesome teacher. Awesome.
                
                   My favorite professor.  I absolutely loved his classes. He was very informative.  He loves his subject matter. He is very kind.
                
                   Dr Wagy is fun. His lectures are colorful and informative. Plus... no dates!
                
                   This class was boring! I had always loved TX history before this. I think a lot of the fault was with the book--which he changed after I had him. I would like to take him for a different class just to see, because everyone told me he was terrific. But, I graduate soon and don't need any extra courses!!
                
                   The best teacher I ever had, at an level. I got 100% on each section of the ExCET that his classes covered. He was tough, but his lectures are fantastic and he is thorough in detailing what will be on the tests.
                
                   IF YOU LOVE HISTORY, TAKE WAGY; IF YOU JUST NEED TO PASS A HISTORY CLASS AND NOT REALLY INTERESTED IN THE SUBJECT, TAKE WINN. WAGY IS VERY PASSIONATE IN HIS LECTURES, WILL LOOK AT HISTORY IN A DIFFERENT MANNER AFTER ONE OF HIS CLASSES; MAKES YOU THINK
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Great class, used text and additional references. Must do the reading to pass the class! Seemed knowledgeable and helpful.
                
                   Syllabus is pretty self explanatory. Takes a while to answer emails. Other than that once he does, gets straight to the point.
                
                   Dr. Bush is a fantastic instructor and I'd definitely take him again, if I had the chance.  He is very professional and respectful. 
                
                   Dr. Bush was a good professor. Lectures were long and at times boring. He does work with you if you ask. He's the Dept head so doesn't put up with alot of BS. Quizzes every week over a chapter, 2 papers over 2 books, no midterm, and the final. His grading on the papers can be brutal, and essay on final as well overall Good! must attend class
                
                   Cool guy, nice.  Sometimes funny.  Interesting material, but presented in an uninspiring and unstimulating way.  Quizzes can be tricky, and paper and test grading can be brutal.  Not overly hard, but not very easy either.  If you can't hang in this class, maybe college isn't your thing?  He is helpful if you ask for it.
                
                   This is a hybrid class.  Lecture once a week, quizzes and discussions online, textbook readings+ 2 books which = 2 essays, final exam.  Dr. Bush gives critical and sincere  feedback on the essays.  That is why he is the professor and not the student. His lectures are a bit of a snoozer sometimes, but overall this class is good.
                
                   This professor comes off as a know it all. What ever you do, try not to bring the class alive by offering more detail to his lectures because he'll shoot you down. I wasn't a real proponent of this professor because of his attitude. He has favorite students so keep an open mind if you don't build a relationship with him.
                
                   Dr. Bush imparts lots of knowledge.  Lots of work in his class, but its not tremendously difficult, and there is a method to his madness with the assignments.  Show up, read what you need to, and do the work, you'll be fine.  I'd take him again.
                
                   The tests will be about his lectures and reading assignments.
                
                   Nice guy, approachable.  Treats students fairly and with respect.  Needs to improve getting grades back when promised.
                
                   3 major grades are all essay. Midterm (in class essay), 6-9 page essay and final (in class essay). Usually assigns 3 books. Lots of reading but no tests over reading, just discussion.
                
                   Great class, all the information you learn is interesting. The class is simple, with one big assignment that is five paper longs. Fun and interesting class take her.
                
                   Non-traditional subjects - minorities, women, and frontier sexuality is the focus.  I thought it was going to be a "gang up on the white man" class, but it wasn't as all.  Awesome prof! Open to contrary views. Class is fairly easy, but you do need to attend.  Those that washed-out are the ones who stopped coming to class.  Take her!
                
                   Lots of easy reading and class discussion.  Your "major" project is a paper all of 3 pages.  Strict about attendance and electronic devices.
                
                   One of the best history professors at the university. There is a lot of group work and class participation. Her exams are set in written response and multiple choice.
                
                   students teach the class with presentations every class, she is rude and belittling to her students (she reads other students papers in class as &quot;bad examples&quot;) would not recommend.
                
                   Galan is an amazing teacher. His class lectures are very interesting and informative. He is clear on expectations for class discussions and assignments. It was interesting to learn about Texas and people who have contributed to the history of it. He is a very passionate and caring man who is extremely helpful and wants to see students succeed.
                
                   Dr. Galan is amazing . I took TX History @ a community college & it was boring. Dr. Galan's lectures are funny, entertaining, and very informative. He is very passionate about his field & more than willing to help you if you are struggling. I always want to go to class because it is so interesting. He is very fair & understanding. Highly recommend!
                
                   Good teacher!
                
                   Took TX Hist. online. Weekly writing assignments, read the textbook and every few weeks there was a quiz. One paper on a book of your choosing.  Well organized and straight forward.
                
                   Two papers, two tests and a final. The tests are really straight forward. She gives a study guide, just go back over the Powerpoint lectures. She goes over the weekly readings in class. She does grade a bit tough on the papers, but is pretty forgiving. She's always there to answer questions and help you if you ask for it. Would take her again. 
                
                   I hate history and this teacher didn't help with that. The discussions were fairly easy. The reading was boring for me I honestly skimmed everything. Her test were 50 questions and confusing to me. I don't know if it was because of her or the subject. I got a B and that surprised me. The paper was 6 pages and the book we read was boring as well.
                
                   She was awesome, I took class online! One discussion a week, one paper, 3 tests & a final!  Tests based off power points to the tee !!! She always offered office hours if needed help, Would 100% recommend her!
                
                   TX Hist online. Was a great class, you'll need to do a discussion over a topic she posts every week. She post question on Monday due Sunday night. 2 papers grading is tough, midterm and final exams are straight from power points. Pretty easy if you read the material. Hardest part are the papers. She will work with you if you just ask. Overall great
                
                   Dr. Porter is an exceptional history professor - very knowledgeable & always willing to help her students. This was an online course, but she made her office hours known for those who needed in person assistance. I highly recommend her.
                
                   Fairly easy class.  Dr. Porter is very helpful if you have trouble with the material.  I can't say I'm a fan of her lecture style - informal Q&A of the class over readings, but she is smokin' nuclear hot.
                
                   Please take this professor!!! She is an awesome teacher and you will learn so much, and she is willing to work with you as much as possible.
                
                   She is teaching this class online.  She is very throrough and clear about what is expected of her students.  I wish I would have taken her during the year to meet her everyday.  I definately would take any class she teaches.
                
                   She is a real good professor.  I would recommend her any time.  She is just an all round good professor.
                
                   Not so easy but the assignments are meaningful and you will leave the class with new knowledge
                
                   He is a really good teacher.  No books lots of note taking.  Individual class assignment that are real easy to do and one test the final which is open notes, so take notes and you should pass.
                
                   He is a good person, knows his history very well. but as he lectures will get off topic.  Very helpful and likes to talk alot.  The test are easy b/c he will give you the info. all you need to do is study.
                
                   Show up do the reading and online discussion you will do great.
                
                   BE PREPARED TO READ! mandatory readings every night & he asks you questions about them in class, be prepared! Dr. Westermann is a very tough grader but he is also fair. He gives you TONS of feedback on your essays. also opportunity to turn it in early, have him make corrections and resubmit. had him for 2 classes this semester & would do it again!
                
                   Dr. Westermann is a fantastic instructor and really knows his material. His class was a "hybrid-course" that consisted of  two papers (4-6 pages) and two tests (midterm and final). The tests were hard if you didn't study and if you read the material for essays, you're good. He will call on people randomly in lecture, so be prepared! 
                
                   Great teacher. I have 116 college credits and have never learned more from a class. However, his tests and papers are extremely hard. If you can pull down an A in his class that is truly an achievement.However it did help me write better papers, would take him again only cause his tests and papers are so hard. Great besides that. Nice guy too.
                
                   Stay on top of readings. Take notes beyond what is on the ppt. Answer all questions on essay requirements & read full text. Dr. Westermann is brilliant & incredibly passionate about the courses he teaches. He's eager for his students to learn & he's always willing to help.
                
                   Read the chapters! The first ten minutes of class are dedicated to discussing this material and he WILL call on you. Don't over think the essays, just be sure to answer the FULL prompt and make your point intelligently and clearly. He's an excellent professor who is respectful of his students and teaches in an engaging fashion. Take him!!
                
                   Dr. Westermann is super-smart, but doesn't make you feel dumb.  Willing to answer questions and helpful if you need it.  Not real easy, but he's FAIR, professional, and kind.  Engages the class in a non-threatening and inviting way.  You need to be ready to get called upon and express yourself clearly and intelligently
                
                   Westermann will probably be one of the best history professors you  will ever have if you give him a chance to be your teacher. He's absolutely brilliant in lecture and calls on every students in class to engage the class in the lecture. He gives small quizzes, requires a few short essays. Avoid using fallacies in your paper. Take him he's good!
                
                   Great professor with professional style, yet fun and challenging. Best professor I've had because of his dynamic teaching style which fuels off of the students; he gets everyone involved in a comfortable, inviting way. Being interested in the subject is key. He is top-quality and has lectured in Germany as well. An honor to have as a professor
                
                   Dr. Westerman is one of the BEST instructors that I,ve ever encountered. Attendance is important and being prepared with assigned readings before class will help in your participation in discussion. Don't try to hide or be unnoticed in class, it won't help because you WILL be called upon. Take a class with Dr. W to improve in ALL other classes.
                
                   Light textbook reading which isn't really tested on.  2-3 books to read with 3-4 page essays due.  Your graded papers will look like someone slaughtered a pig on them, but its mostly pointers to improve you paper.  Tests are short answer and essay, but you're given a full study guide of what to expect.  Try not to miss class, and PARTICPATE!
                
                   Difficulty is due to the subject matter, not due to the prof.  If you're expecting anyalsis of battles, this isn't the class for you - its a mixture of history, sociology, philosophy, and a little physics thrown in there.  Three minor papers, one major comprehensive paper.  No tests.  Rewarding but challenging subject.
                
                   Excellent professor, but challenging.  Not an easy class; tough but fair.  If History is not your thing, you may have problems.  Attendance is not mandatory, but highly suggested for success.  Professor is very knowledgeable and lectures are interesting.
                
                   Two tests, essay format.  They can be difficult.  Two book essays at around 3 pages each.  These are fairly easy.  Dr. Westermann makes History interesting, and relevent.
                
                   He is really knowledgeable about the Holocaust.  He speaks German so he is able to translate a lot of the propaganda.  If you want an easy A this Professor is not for you but if you want to learn in a fair environment take him!!!!
                
                   Teaches without imposing a religious or political agenda; fair and balanced.  Treats students fairly and with respect.
                
                   Very Professional, Very knowledgable on topic.Does not teach with a biased outlook like most college instructers.
                
                   Early Mod. European Hist.:  1 &quot;textbook&quot; and 2 other books for essays.  Two test - midterm and final, essay format.  Attendance not required, but participation is 15% of your grade.  Gives a study gude before tests - use it!  Don't miss class if you can help it.  Neither easy nor difficult - you must work & show up for your grade.
                
                   Grading was late on weekly assignments. The course was 20th Century U.S. History and we did not get out of the 1950's. Disappointing class.
                
                   Dr. Broom is an EXCELLENT teacher. Keep up with the weekly discussions and you will pass with flying colors. He will quickly answer your questions and help you with ANYTHING you need thats within his ability. TAKE HIM!
                
                   Dr. Nicher is a great professor. He is very clear and makes sure everyone in class understands the assigned work. He is very organized and helpful. 
                
                   I've taken him for numerous classes and they are almost always the same, discussion boards every week and at least one paper at the end of the semester. His lectures are never that long and only meet once a week. The best thing about him is that he always emails back, usually within the same day. Overall pretty good teacher.
                
                   This was class was very easy. Only a short paper due every week after watching a film. Very nice and helpful teacher.
                
                   Great teacher! Have taken him 3 times, got an A every time, and will take him twice more before I graduate. Do the discussions complete with comments, use good quotes, and you will get an A. Email him and he will respond almost immediatly. Would recomend to anyone needing a history course.
                
                   Had him for a couple classes and they are usually pretty easy. Just expect a ton of reading and be prepare to lead class discussion. There also usually a paper at the end. He's pretty laid back and will help you if you need it, but it takes him forever to email back, at least a few days or more. Otherwise, he's pretty good.
                
                   The guy is a good lecturer and bends over backwards to help you. The hardest part of the class is the readings and the two book reviews.  Overall, I learned a great deal about military history.  If you attend class and do the readings, you will do well.  
                
                   She was pretty confusing to listen to for the lecture, but you could go to the books assigned to pass tests.
                
                   Dr. Wranosky is the best! She is very challenging and expects a lot from you, but she is always so helpful and encouraging. I am not a history major, but she offered a new perspective of History and allowed me to appreciate it more than I have before. Her lectures are very interesting. If you are willing to work hard, TAKE HER!
                
                   Dr, Wranosky is a master of her craft.  Exceptional educator.  If you show up every day and do the work you will receive an A.  By far one my favorite profs and one that I have tremendous respect for.  Excellent.   
                
                   Dr. Wranosky is great. She pushes us to think hard and do well & doesn't baby us. A lot of students hate that, but I like that there were multiple "right" answers to her essays. It's about process & evidence, not reading the prof's mind. Also, her knowledge of info can be intimidating, but she is so nice it isn't for long. Take.a.class.with.her!
                
                   A lot of the posts about Wranosky say that she is always behind on grading papers and such, which is completely true. However, she makes up for it in class. Wranosky never has a boring lecture, answers EVERY question that is asked, and enjoys interaction and discussion in class. I've taken a number of classes with her and have always loved them.
                
                   This is the first time I have taken a class (Race & Education) with Prof. Wranosky & I can only say that she has been terrible at her job. She failed to return exam/test grades in a reasonable amount of time, didn't answer all questions asked, & managed to fall behind quite significantly in lecture. Avoid her, if possible.
                
                   Wranosky is one--if not the most--popular prof in the department. She always has students in her office meeting about research or other stuff.  Her classes are fun and interesting. She works to get students to think so she does not just give out answers. There is a lot, repeat, a lot of writing in her classes so be prepared.
                
                   Wranosky makes history interesting. Her powerpoints averagely organized except she skipped around a lot and lost her place. Her major was focused on public opinion in history which gives a very interesting viewpoint. Her tests were hard. You have to prepare in advance and make sure to take meticulous notes with specific dates+locations to pass.
                
                   I would not recomend her for anybody.  She was behind on her grading and expected that we read her comments the day its due, and behind as in since the first days of class.  How were we suppose to improve?
                
                   This professor speaks well; however, she is very unorganized and unclear about assinments and expectations. She often says she will post information for students online but will wait till the last possible minute to do so. Exams are essay style and require hours of hard work and practice writing.
                
                   Awesome teacher! Makes you actually want to come to class. :)
                
                   I hate history, but loved this class.  Exam Review sheet given up front (weeks before exam) and the stories she tells are pretty interesting.  Hint: Go to class, study the exam review as soon as you get it, ask for help and you will do good.
                
                   This was the most interesting person I've ever had for a professor and was very likable. However, he taught the class as if you had grown up in England and totally understood their government system so it was hard to keep up during most lectures. Reading is important.
                
                   Great Professor. Very entertaining. Take good notes.  He really cares about his students and wants you to do well. But he won't just hand you an A. I definitely recommend his class.
                
                   Great Professor! Maintains friendly, professional classroom atmosphere. Great sense of humor and a person who knows how to get down to business. To do well in class attendance is required and know the reading assignments. Two exams (both written essays. He is crystal clear about what to expect and the selection of text books were excellent. A++
                
                   Good prof. Make sure to know the readings. Attendance policy. 2 tests. Just know the material and the tests will be easy. Enjoyable class.
                
                   Two tests, period.  No curve (supposedly).  Tests are essay and may be graded by a TA.  Midterm was graded overly harshly by the TA to the point that I would not have passed even if I had made a 100 on the final (made an 88) - got a curve after all - final grad was a C.  Make sure you read all assigned readings.
                
                   He is hillarious!  I really like his lectures because they are interesting and he always tries to add in some jokes, funny stories from his life, and other stuff like that.  I would love to take another class with him.  You have to be ready to study for his tests or you won't get a good grade in the class.  He tends to like essay tests.
                
                   I'm pretty sure I have my first test with him tomorrow...  It's four-thirty in the morning and I'm panicking.  Too much damn reading and information.  Rambling lectures (yea, kind of entertaining, but what's the point&#63;).
                
                   good.
                
                   Dr. Adams is entertaining, wore designer suits during summer sessions, and would sprinkle in some personal stories throughout his lectures.  He loves his car if I remember correctly.  Bottom line: he's enjoyable and smart, and good sarcastic sense of humor!
                
                   Prof. Adams is extremely entertaining and obviously loves what he does.  Ask him about his car.
                
                   A very good professor. Very knowledgeable about his subject, and a good lecturer. his tests aren't that bad IF you study for them
                
                   Amazingly well dressed.
                
                   I took several classes from him, YEARS ago (1993-ish)  I saw no one had rated him, so I decided to.  He is a great prof who knows his subject matter and is willing to help his students.
                
                   I've had Dr Jones for many classes, online and in class. For undergrad and masters classes. He rocks. Masters class discussions are extremely informative. I highly recommend his Hitler and Stalin class. COME PREPARED.
                
                   Have had this prof for numerous classes. Each class is set up the same: two tests, a paper, and maybe a discussion board question. Overall, his is a very helpful teacher and knows alot about history.
                
                   The margin of error is small for this class.  It is all online which makes it doubly boring to just read from the text, answer a couple of DB questions and then have to read TWO more books about the exact same subject and write two 3-page book reviews about them.  Then the only other grades are a midterm and final and your db's. Not recommended.
                
                   Expect to read the book & use the jsor internet site to compare two long articles which is the hardest part of the class. Tests are fairly staight forward needing to have read the book for a couple questions, the majority of which are covered in the lecture
                
                   I took Military Hist of the US with Dr. Jones and I enjoyed the course. His lectures can ramble a bit and our class got a bit behind schedule as a result. There are only 3 grades which makes the margin for error small, and the two exams are challenging. However, he is extremely helpful if you ask and is very knowledgeable. Good professor/class.
                
                   Have taken a number of courses with Dr. B. Be prepared to do a lot of writing, but the courses are never really too hard. Very helpful. One of the better teachers here.
                
                   I took History of the Trans-Mississippi West with Dr. Bunkowski and while the course has a largish amount of work, she was very helpful and flexible. The class was not easy, but not really hard--moderate difficulty. She grades fairly and is not too stringent. If you talk to her, she will help you with anything! Great professor.
                
                   The Ancient and Classical Western World.  You have 2 assignments per week and a power point lecture. A power point museum assignment and the final.  Plenty of work.  This is a summer course.  It's pretty easy.  She also gives extra credit work.  It is also very well organized.  Really enjoy her lectures.
                
                   Weekly writing assignments, one major paper.  She's pretty brutal on grading papers, but easy-going and fun in class.  Be prepared for lots of writing assignments and taking lots of notes.
                
                   Cool, laid-back prof, but she covers EVERYTHING in the period.  Lots of notetaking = 3-4 classes of notes.  LOTS of writing.
                
                   I had the worst experience in college with Dr. Martinez.  Her knowledge on the subject is not in question, but her treatment of students.  Rude & belittling, she would set goals and requirements, then arbitrarily change them at a whim. Changed the syllabus without warning.  I felt a bond with other students like those who survive a common tragedy.
                
                   If you do not have to take a course Dr. Martinez is teaching, I suggest you do not.  Just don't do it.  You've been warned.
                
                   Professor Martinez was very inconsistent with her grading. I received grades from high As to low Bs and even a few Cs on my written papers. When I asked for clarification to improve my work on future assignments, I received incomprehensible or vague criticism, which did not help me. I feel with a more competent teacher, I would've earned an A.
                
                   The reading load is = to about 2 classes.  The writing assignments are about = to 2-4 classes.  Quiz questions are open-ended and vague.  You may have a correct answer, but not the one she's thinking of - have to be a mind-reader to know what she wants.  Changes the syllabus without warning.  Very difficult prof.
                
                   Would not recommend taking this professor.  Very unfair on grading any written assignments. Not clear. Feedback on papers gives you nothing to improve your next paper.
                
                   Very difficult, not helpful not understanding. Papers are ridiculously hard to pass, quiz questions are not clear.
                
                   Teacher is very hard and expects you to write thesis papers on what you read.
                
                   I took this class online. She is really hard, also excepts you to know alot about history. Does not give extra credit.
                
                   Doesn't speak loud enough for the people 3 rows back to hear, and is incapable of using technology such as a microphone. Reads off of a power point all period which is full of generalities, then makes the test about the most minute details in the book
                
                   Worst class I have ever had. Jumps from subject to subject, spoke so much about Santa Ana felt like it was a spanish history class. No homework other than meaningless group presentations. Lectures the entire class about nothing in particular. Easy&#63; Yes. Learn anythinh&#63; NO!!
                
                   I thought he was a very good teacher. It was very hard to hear him b/c the stupid portable a/c was too loud. The most important thing to do in his class on the easy test is to answer the question completely he does not want to read a book he just wants the questions answered.
                
                   I enjoyed Dr. D, she loved her work and knows her stuff, BUT if you want to make a good grade, don't miss class. She skips around in the book, and taking good notes can be difficult. My biggest problem is the tests are a midterm and a final, it is a LOT of info to remember for each test.
                
                   If you can, pleas avoid her!..I love history and I hated that class!...really, really, really boring..hard to me to stay awake!...lessons did not go with the book!..AVOID!
                
                   Dr. De la Trinidad clearly loves the subject she teaches and cares about her students. The only problem is that she doesn't do a very good job of managing the classroom and is easily distracted. If you want an A in her class, it will require some effort outside at home. This isn't a class where you can just show up and expect to pass.
                
                   
                
                   Awesome teacher and cares about his students. Take him Dr. Rodriguez is a  great professor and the only way you won't pass is if you skip his class. Interesting and cool guy. I totally recommend him. 
                
                   You have to be a lazy dumbass to fail his class.As long as you do the work and read the book and go to the test review day, you will be good. He is great! He cares about his students and he is funny :)
                
                   Great professor! Readings are essential. Study guides are given and are identical to the exam. He gives a total of three exams. He also gives extra credit! There's no way you can fail. Just pay attention.
                
                   AWESOME! Take his class you won't regret it. If you read the few pages he assigns then you will pass. Don't try to BS his tests, cause you wont get a good grade. He is very helful and loves what he does and it shows. Plus he is cute! there is no reason you shouldn't get an A! TAKE HIS CLASS YOU WON'T REGRET IT!
                
                   Awesome class. Really engages students.  Worth every class I attended. his lectures are very interesting and really makes think. Very liberal but never offensive and very respectful. No reason to ever make lower than an A.  Study guides are written to the testand essay questions are given prior to the test. Worth taking and class is worth attending
                
                   Really engages the class, makes you think outside the box.
                
                   Best history professor! He cares about his students and encourages them. Attendance isn't necessarily mandatory, but he will tell which day you have to be there. There is no reason to fail his tests. He gives reviews & possible essay questions over the book. You must read the book he assigns to pass tests! No reason not to get an A!
                
                   Dr. Rodriguez is a fantastic professor. He makes everything very interesting and memorable. He is super funny, and there is never a dull moment in class.
                
                   Great professor! I love how he interacts with the class. I highly recommend this professor. There is no doubt you will have fun!
                
                   Great professor! really easy just show up to class pay attention go over the reviews and its impossible to fail. class is fun a lot of class discussions.
                
                   The easiest professor ever!!! You will learn and it is fun! Easy A!!
                
                   He is outstanding professor very interactive and gives extra credit work so no reason to fail. Attendance isn't mandatory, but i consider going to class because every lecture he gives is useful and not boring at all. I get bored easily about history, but seem to pay attention in his class. READ THOSE BOOKS :)) Great job Dr. Rodriguez.. Keep it up:)
                
                   Such an amazing professor. He knows his stuff. Easy to realte too. He uses examples that his students can relate to. You need to read the books in order to pass. And he gives many chances to get extra credit. Attendance is not mandatory but he does give extra credit for going. & his tests are easy. TAKE HIM AND YOU WILL ACTUALLY ENJOY HISORY!!!!
                
                   Best teacher ever.. I recommend to everyone. Very easy to get an A, just come to class, and read the book required for the exams.
                
                   he very good a prof. as much as i wont have loved to take history if i had my way, loved going to his lectures because i knew it was going fun. tell me that you slept in an history class and i will tell you, u didn't go to the right one or that something is wrong with you if you did in his class. exams are easy if you do your part. very great Prof!
                
                   He is easy.Cares about the success of his students. Understanding. If you go the day before the test he will review what will be on it. Just to read the assigned books because he requires to write short essays on the test but lets you know what it  will be about ahead of time. Does not take attendance but gives extra credit often for going.
                
                   Probably the most sincere professor I have ever met. He really cares about the success of each of his students and really enjoys teaching the subject, it shows. His tests are fairly easy, if you pay attention to his lectures & power points. Very ngaging instruction; I highly recommend that you get involved and participate. TAKE HIS CLASS IF YOU CAN
                
                   Awesome professor. He is probably the best you will ever have, ever. If you get the chance take him!
                
                   I love this proffesor he engages the class with different topics that relate with the class. We might end up getting side tracked with other topics but I don't recall a moment in which i havent came in his class. I'm taking his 1301 class and I'm ready to hear his funny but interesting comments
                
                   Honestly is the best professor you will ever have! cares about each and every student and wether or not they succeed and will do anything to make sure that you make a good grade in the class. Class is extremely easy as long as you do what he says and read the novels, which arent bad at all. Really wish all my professors were like Dr. Rodriguez
                
                   very sweet and nice woman! Her testsgrading is fair and somewhat easy. You will have to write essays on the books she assigns to read, but they are pretty interesting. She sometimes gives participation points after the class, those really help! 
                
                   Took this class about the Holocaust great class Dr. Melendy very knowledge about this class very glad I took it and recommended.
                
                   Dr. Melendy is extremely knowledgeable, helpful and approachable. She gives out mostly essay tests and book reviews, both of which I think she grades fairly. Much of the material for tests is from her lectures, and they are always interesting. I learned a lot about World History because of her, and would recommend.
                
                   Dr. Melendy is one of my favorite professors!! She is very understanding and actually makes history fun of anyone! I would definitely recommend her for History 1302 or for any class!!!
                
                   She is amazing!!! She makes me want to change my major to History! I'd sign up for any class that she teaches!! I &lt;3 Dr. Melendy!!
                
                   very good teacher, but her tests are tricky and the way she grades is a little tough
                
                   She's one of the best History teachers I've ever had.  She made the class very exciting, and I actually looked foward to writting a paper for the required reading.  I must also add; her voice would keep your attention, and it would be pretty hard to fall asleep with her lecturing.  She really knows how to teach.  I wish more highschool teachers were like her.
                
                   I &lt;3 Dr. Melendy. She is kind, and wants the best for her students. CLear instruction and all-around nice person. The kind of person that I would be friends with.
                
                   easy. fast. DO IT!!
                
                   she's the best teacher ever!  way cool and hot!
                
                   SHE'S AWESOME! I'm even taking her next semester! NO ESSAYS! She gives 16 homework assignments. Very easy. If you do all your homework, and pass your tests there is no reason why you should fail. I would recommend her to anyone. She's funny, great at explaining, and really knows her stuff. 
                
                   Took the online summer class, because it was easier for me. No Essays!  Just 2-11 questions, with one to three sentences each!  Posted on class discussion, and required to comment on a fellow students discussion. Easy! Reviews for the tests were awesome. She gives GREAT feedback!
                
                   Dr. McComb is an amazing teacher! I took this course online and she is very consistent in staying involved in discussions, commenting back, and better explaining what was in the chapter. Some of her discussions and questions make you think more than others but only because she seems to really care about everyone truly understanding the readings.
                
                   She was aw awesome!!! She is super informative and very funny. You're going to want to show up to her class, but she'll work with you if you have to miss. The weekly readingswritings were not extensive but just right amount. She offers extra credit as well. I definitely recommend her!!!
                
                   Erinn is a great professor hands down. Lol however she's still figuring out what kind of homework she prefers to hand out. But that doesn't matter. She's very good at what she does in class. 
                
                   Dr. McComb is a great history teacher!  She knows her history so don't try to pull a fast one on her.  There are three written assignments and all other grades come from discussions. If you do the work, you will make an A.
                
                   I love her class! she is great teacher in history ... It give you motivation. She makes the class fun. And the class you just have to put your knowledge and she will help you in all possible ways. TAKE HERRR !!!
                
                   As long as you show up to class minimal reading is involved and the quizzes and tests aren't difficult. She also gives extra credit opportunities. She knows her stuff and is easy to understand, and she is always willing to work with you if you have a problem.  Overall, a great professor who actually manages to make history interesting.
                
                   Run do not walk to sign up for any class Dr. McComb teaches. Her classes are not a breeze but if you put in your effort Dr. McComb gives you her 100% effort for you to learn. She uses the perfect combination of information technology material; in class power point,blackboard study guides etc. It was a delight to attend her class.
                
                   Professor McComb, is possibly the most enjoyable during lecture. She is very helpful and encourages you to learn the material. She teaches by power point and offers quizzes and tests instead of tests. She is easy and funny, and is communicative towards her students.
                
                   I love this class! Yes, history at 8 in the morning is usually not considered exciting but professor McComb makes it fun. She has a very witty sense of humor that keeps the subject matter for becoming boring. I would recommend her to anyone and I signed up to have her for the second half of American history next semester.
                
                   Dr. Knight's Texas History is a rite of passage! He's fun and funny! But, he grades objectively, so know your stuff!
                
                   Lots of work; but he is clear, funny and understanding.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Nice guy, extra credit is a major plus. Has study guide for tests- so reading is helpful, or at least having the book to track answers. Got an A!
                
                   Easy enough professor and provides plenty if ways to get extra credit but drones on way too much about interracial sex.
                
                   Great teacher, gives review for each test, assigns extra credit for those that interested, enjoyed taking his class.
                
                   This class was easy. Attendance was mandatory but he never really noticed that I was never there. You have to read and go to the test days. He gives sample questions for tests which is a plus. He talks alot and shows boring moves but all you have to do is retain the information. Also he gives EXTRA CREDIT!
                
                   Really honest guy. No BS. Great teacher. I made an A in his class. He's very clear and honest when he teaches and he only teaches what you need to know.
                
                   One of the best I have ever experienced.  Would not have attempted going further but for the mentoring.
                
                   He believes that it's your grade and your money so attendance is your decision. Tests are 90% over outside reading the lecture is just over the basic history stuff.Reading for a test is about 3 chapters of 15-20 pages a piece. Very good class for people who are good at history and like to sleep late.
                
                   He made history very entertaining and added interesting informations aside from the book.
                
                   This guy is so funny, and his class is so easy. There is a lot of reading but it is not that bad.
                
                   My first Prof ever!!!  Took class 20 years ago - Summer of 83.  Great guy easy to understand yet lots of reading.  Very much on the intellectual side and very much ahead of his time.
                
                   at the beginning his class was very boring...and it still is..all we do is take boring notes...its not a  very hard class..but i will tell you..its alot of reading..the only grades in class are from your tests..ALWAYS KEEP UP ON THE READINGS!
                
                   Lots of reading. The good thing is all the tests are multiple choice, no essays or anything... but those are the only grades you have. The questions are pretty hard and make sure to take lots of notes. He's VERY opinionated but he's kinda funny sometimes.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Thanks for the extra credit essay/test     HOWEVER, I don't think I've ever read so much for a test
                
                   Great professor! Tries to make jokes and lightens the mood :) you learn so much throughout each class. attendance is important for notes. His quizzes aren't difficult unless you don't read the chapters they are on. Overall great teacher and great class :)
                
                   great teacher you learn so much!!!and be ready to apply what you learn!!!you EARN your grade nothing is given to you!!!
                
                   He's a great professor. If you think youre going to get an easy A don't even bother taking him. I hate history but he made me like it.
                
                   Only Take If You Are Serious About History.
                
                   Well you actually have to earn your grade which i usually dont like, but Houf is interesting and is actually a cool guy so i didn't mind too much. But it wasnt easy passing.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   His class takes a lot of effort, but he makes his class interesting so it is not that bad. Plus he is funny too.
                
                   Nice guy, very helpful.  Comes off as a tough guy, but he's not.  If you want to LEARN history, he's your man.  If you want an easy &quot;A&quot; take someone else!
                
                   he's too tall and it hurts my neck to look at him.  His IQ is as high as his height.
                
                   Good Professor. He teaches by lecture with notes on a powerpoint behind him. For an Honors class, his only grades are all essays though, but he doesn't grade them too hard.
                
                   Super easy class! Notes help alot for tests and the essay question for the test is almost always the same as the review question he gives the week before in class. Study the notes and you'll be fine for the multiple choice!!
                
                   Pretty good Professor. He only takes attendance on Fridays so BE THERE FRIDAYS. Other than that he's pretty clear and to the point.
                
                   Good professor a little boring but with a little bit of work you will get an easy A with him.  He only takes attendance on friday and his test are easy
                
                   Greeenspan is a really good professor. He does have essay tests combined with multiple choice, which seem hard but he does not grade as hard as he says he does. This guy will make you laugh quite often with his imitations of presidents. He also only takes roll on one class day per week like mine was always Friday.
                
                   The easiest class I've taken in college so far. There were 3 multiple choice/ true or false tests with less than 50 questions each. Two 2-3 page essays and a final 5 page essay, but as long as you turn something in for it you will pass. She told me that whatever grade I earned at the end of the semester would be bumped up a whole letter grade.
                
                   Halfway through the semester you will have no grades and honestly no understanding of Texas politics. You will end up taking 1 test and never getting the grade back and therefore not have any idea of whether you are passing or drastically failing. Does not teach. Does not explain. Hard class because you have no idea what to do or how you are doing.
                
                   Not a terrible but definitely not a great teacher. Class is based off of just articles and John Stewart. No definite source of information, meaning no textbook to help you understand, yet she expects you to know material for the exams. Also very bad at returning grades so you really don't know what grade you're getting 'til end of semester.
                
                   Teaching quality was poor. Tests were confusing. Discussions were boring. Usually messed up grades  and took a few weeks before you got the correct one. Not the best professor.
                
                   Took evening class for 3 hours. Lectures long and sort of interesting. Information from lecture is vitle for doing well in the course since he only had 2 exams. Had to read one book during and compare to movie and used another as a source of evidence for questions asked in class. Great professor, friendly and cares.
                
                   I had him for a night class and he gave out a few homework assignments. They were pretty easy. The only tests he ever gave were the midterm and the final. Pretty easy teacher.
                
                   I took an evening class. Lectured for 3 hours straight.
                
                   great professor he makes history interesting and makes you get involved i had a great time in his class. Hardly ever gives assignments and there are only two test so take notes during his lectures because then you will be SOL for the exams other than that he reviews with you and you will be fine.
                
                   One of the best teacher's I've ever had. Great professor always knew his info, not to mention he was really attractive. Intelligent man, when I had him he only had multiple choice tests. Take good notes and read the text pages he tells you to read.
                
                   this professor is freaking hard! never gives multiply choice exams! only essays! i don't recommend if you don't like to write.
                
                   A great, intelligent, kind professor! Class is lecture driven, so show up to class & take good notes. Final & midterm is all essay, so you really need to study. If you like writing, the tests will probably be easier. We had to write 2 book reviews, & create a powerpoint about any topic in world hist. to 1500, but no presenting it out loud.Take him!
                
                   Loved his class, made it so interesting.
                
                   Ive taken two classes from ferguson, and he is one of my two favorite teachers. His classes are really interesting, the only problem is his tests are hard! If you dont enjoy writing, DO NOT TAKE HIS CLASS! I made an 86+ on every paper and ended up with c's in both classes. So if you're willing to put alot of effort into his class then take it.
                
                   THIS CLASS WAS ONE OF MY FAVORITES.  HE GAVE CURVES ON ALL THE TESTS ONLY IF HE SAW THAT YOU ATTEND CLASS REGULARLY AND ACTUALLY PAID ATTENTION IN CLASS.  I NEVER LIKED HISTORY BUT HE MADE IT FUN TO GO TO CLASS.  I WOULD RECOMMEND HIM TO ANYONE WHO NEEDS TO TAKE HISTORY.  THERE IS NOT A BETTER HISTORY TEACHER AT TAMUK.
                
                   He was a good professor ... just take notes in class and the test will be easy and do all the journals because they will realy help your grade! I made an A in the class without much studying.
                
                   Ferguson became one of my favorite professors, and I'm not even a liberal arts major. His lectures are fun an interesting and 90-95% of the tests come directly from the lecture, so don't miss class.  Besides 3 tests the only assignment is online journals which do take a while but you only need to do 5 all semester. Take him if you get the chance.
                
                   highly knowledgable, willing to entertain new, coherant ideas
                
                   the reason I became a history major. smart. funny. always willing to talk. the best.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Very interesting synthesis of knowledge.
                
                   I like the way he used media to help clarify many historical events.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Cool guy!  I highly recommend him!
                
                   great profs. just listen to lectures and you will get 100 on the quizzes and study the quizzes they are your midterm and final
                
                   He was very helpful. Professor Sanchez was not there to fail you, he would say  that many times in the semester. I would advise you to take it on a voting year, because there is extra credit of about 30 points. If you didn't get at least a B in the class you were putting in no effort. I missed one question on the final.
                
                   You will have weekly homework and everything he says in lecture is on the test.
                
                   Lawhon was the man! He has a passion for what he does. Probably the best professor at TAMUG. Gives 4 total test (easy) and homework you turn in once a week. I absolutely hate history and he made it interesting. Would recommend anyone to take his class.
                
                   I LOVE HIM! He was truly one of my favorite professors, I wish I could take him again! He seems very intimidating but he cares for his students. I went to his office when I couldn't pick up my test average and that was essential to my grade going up. He is very helpful, don't be afraid to see him in his office. 
                
                   he gives you the key terms that are used in all the tests just study then and you should make an A. He made history fun to learn and easy to stay engaged in the subject. 
                
                   so much passion for his work, he enjoys teaching us and interacting with his students at the lectures, he does take attendance periodically. the tests all feature a study guide in the syllabus. dont buy america i still havent even opened it.
                
                   He is amazing. Take him. You won't regret it. I hate history with a passion, and I love it. Like, whatttt? It's tough to make an A if you don't study. Everything he tests you on is in the syllabus that he hands out at the beginning of class. Don't buy "America," it's useless. Buy the $90 one and do your assignments from those.
                
                   He is opinionated but a really good teacher. You HAVE TO READ!! if you read and pay attention in class its super easy. He gives you study guides and everything is in booklecture.  have made high grades on his tests no problem and i'm terrible with history.
                
                   Honestly, he is the most passionate and amazing professor I have ever had.
                
                   If you don't get an A in this class you need to leave college. Go to lecture he is very interesting, and his tests are so easy...basically handed to you in the syllabus. Doesn't make you remember any dates. Perfect for people who hate history. Awesome professor!
                
                   He is an AMAZING professor. he loves history and he truly makes you love it as much as him. He's always around campus so he's really easy to find and ask questions. He has hilarious stories and gives you a key before each test. do the homework, easy 100's. read the book though, cause he expects you to know the background material.
                
                   GO TO CLASS. If you go to class and listen it's almost a guaranteed A.
                
                   Best prof ever!
                
                   An amazing professor, go to class!!
                
                   BEST PROFESSOR EVER! I recommend going to class and he has reviews before each test which helps, he loves the subject he teaches which makes you more interested in it too. One of the best  professors that I have ever have. Didn't you one of the books ever
                
                   Probably the best professor I've ever had.  He engages the students and keeps what can be a boring subject interesting.  He is a super nice guy, funny, and teaches history in a way that makes it seem like he is telling a story.
                
                   very passionate and knowledgeable teacher. his style of teaching is entertaining. take notes according to the term sheets in class, easy A
                
                   Best professor I ever had! Made my freshman year a little easier! As long as you go to class and study the terms he gives you it's an easy A. Also make sure you complete the weekly book sheets. Easy 10 points
                
                   The best professor I've ever had in college. Easy to listen to and gives great lectures. Just look over the review sheet for each test and its an easy A. Highly recomended
                
                   AMAZING PROF! love him! Hate history but he made it fun!
                
                   Best teacher ever
                
                   Challenging but pleasant experience. She knows her stuff when it comes to history and will make you come to appreciate history. She provides exam reviews and as long as you complete and study them, you will pass her class like I did with an A+. Be prepared to write a lot, as she doesn't post her lectures online. Take her, you will be glad you did.
                
                   great professor! Just attend class daily,participate in discussions, read the assigned chapters, and study everything on the study guide for the test and you will be fine. However, she doesn't upload her powerpoints so you have do do a lot of writing, and the tests include writing essays. but possible essay prompts are given on the study guide.
                
                   Great teacher if you attend class. She gives you the test in her reviews. If you do the reviews and show up to class you should get an A. She is kinda anal on texting and talking and will deduct points though
                
                   Very boring.  Monotone.  Reads slides during whole class period.  Does not make it interesting to learn.  He sounded like it was going to be interesting the first day of class, but not in the least. He does identification terms for his tests.
                
                   1st of all to that top comment: this is why ur in college and not elementary; you should be able to catch what she says and know how to apply it to your readings. ALOT of professors don't pull out the textbook in class!! She has a great character, and she's very open minded to any side, including her students!
                
                   Took both Hist. 1301 & 1302 and her class was a breeze.
                
                   In my opinion she is a HORABLE teacher. She NEVER teaches, if she does she uses videos that dont even apply to the subject. It doesnt chalenge me at all, it is like being told to read a book and take quizes and come to class to learn nothing. WHY DID I EVEN PAY FOR HER CLASS&#63;!&#63;!&#63;!&#63;!&#63;! Such a waist of money! DONT TAKE HER CLASS
                
                   One of the best professors on campus.  She is very entertaining and keeps the class rolling.  Made a difficult subject seem easy and I enjoyed it very much.  Play by the rules and you will do great in this class
                
                   I am currently taking her history 2 class in the summer and so far I am really enjoying it. She talks about history in a way you understand it. Her in-class discussions are fun, you get to talk about a current topic. Quizzes and comprehensive final is online and you get to use book and notes, they're timed though. Only 1 research assignment.
                
                   Took both 1301 and 1302 with her and would take more with her again! Her classes are the reason I am a History minor, she is very lenient & responds quickly to emails. When doing reading responses, it is important to give GREAT detail on each point she is asking for; in turn you will receive a high grade. There is no way you can fail if you write! 
                
                   Dr. Robinson is amazing! She is very clear when giving lectures, and allows you to take detailed notes that will help you out with exams (which are pretty difficult). She only has 3 exams, and you have 1 homework assignment due once a week that is EXTREMELY easy. Taking notes and doing the homework assignments are the only requirements for passing!
                
                   She was a good teacher, very very nice. Although I really didn't enjoy her "short answer reading assignments" due every sunday (25% of grade). The 300 word short answer due every sunday was what brought my grade down. Takes attendance randomly(once a week I think) for 10% of your grade. Her tests are in class essays but she DOES NOT grade hard.
                
                   WEEKLY ASSIGNMENTSREADING RESPONSES.  TESTS THAT ARE 100% ESSAY WITH A FEW EXTRA CREDIT MULTIPLE CHOICE.  ONLY TWO TESTS BEFORE FINAL + THE WEEKLY ASSIGNMENT, SO THERE AREN'T MANY GRADES. YOU HAVE TO GO TO CLASS, SHE DOESNT POST ANY NOTES OR POWERPOINTS ONLINE. SHE GIVES A STUDY GUIDE BUT IT DOESNT HELP. I WOULD NOT TAKE HER CLASS AGAIN. 
                
                   she is a very helpful and friendly professor. She help me a lot with my struggle in history. She give out a lot of assignment but it is easy if you follow her requirement (All intent quote). There is a high chance to get A in her class if you know how to ask for her help and follow her instruction. She is nice and extremely easy to.
                
                   Have to do weekly responses each for three points.  She is very unclear about what she wants out of these responses.  As long as you do well on the test this class should be at least an easy "C".  Take history at Del Mar it is a lot more interesting and easier.
                
                   Dr. Robinson helped me tremendously. I got in a car accident during an exam day and didn't get to finish the entire exam, and she graded it relative to what I finished and it helped me pass. On top of that, she is a good teacher and goes through the subjects clearly and carefully.
                
                   Do not Take his class!!!!!
                
                   Nicest man ever. He goes at a slow enough pace for you to catch important facts. Tests arent &quot;easy&quot; but the class is overall interesting because of what he talks about.
                
                   Stickler for attendence, but still an easy class.  All you gotta do is read and I promise he wont throw anything crazy your way on the test.  The essays are easy as long as you know the information and can put it in a logical format.  Multiple choice parts were straight from his lectures and from the book.  He was a really nice guy too, you could ask him for help and he would go out of his way to help you.  He wanted everyone to make A's in his class.
                
                   He's a great professor! Attendance is a must in his class! He was very personable with everyone and made it a point to remember my name. He'd see me around and say &quot;Hello&quot;. He's a sweet caring man, he will help you if you help yourself.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   I had him for both Hist 1301 and Hist 1302 and he is a good professor. His classes consist of lectures only and his quizzes and tests come straight from the lecture notes and the book. Not an easy class but he is still a good professor.
                
                   Had to read 3 books sometimes multiple books at once. She is way to prideful in her Latino heritage she planned a lot of her class around it like the Chicano moment(pointless). Over all show up to class and read your book so you can write about it. If you don't you probably won't pass
                
                   She requires three books which are to be read outside of the class. Once you finish the book, your exams are an essay which is written in a blue book answering her exam prompt, which she gives in advance. The class is fairly easy, and the seminar/english professors graded everything. I would recommend her, but she can be fairly mean. 
                
                   Really great professor and  a class that people that aren't history majors will do fine in. The test weren't bad as long as you study and she gives a list of vocab topics for each test that are really helpful just look over that and you'll most likely get around an A or B on each test. 
                
                   Dr. Munoz's class is difficult in that the content is boring but her lectures are informative and she gives you want is gonna be on the test prior to the test. Easy A if you go to class because she gives quiz points based on attendance and also if you pay attention!
                
                   Easy A but bored out of my mind during her lectures. She repeats the same thing for 30 min. But she gives you the test 3 weeks in advance to study, its an essay test. If you don't care for history and just want the grade take her class
                
                   She is alright, but to be perfectly honest, her essay tests are ridiculous. She demands every scrap of irrelevant information on the topic. That's really more memorization than actually understanding the text.
                
                   If you invest in her class, she'll invest in you
                
                   she lectures more than needed for her tests. youll do fine with the review alone if you know where to look in the book. although her lectures arent entirely necessary they are interesting and she plays history channel movies every now and then. best part.
                
                   Dr. Munoz was a good and easy teacher. She took attendance by having quizzes once a week but all you had to do was answer the questions to your best knowledge and as long as you wrote something it was fine. The only difficult thing about this class was the tests. She had us learn 50 terms and chose only 10 to put on the test and we define 4 of them
                
                   Took for Mexican American History. Harder than it needed to be, too much reading. Rewards slackers by letting them pass with a c if they fail to do their assignments.
                
                   She is an AMAZING professor, she is very helpful, and encourages participation without applying too much pressure. She emphasizes more of the social history of the events not so much dates and boring facts. You'll learn alot and if you didn't like history before, you'll love it after.
                
                   She is very friendly and cares about how you perform in her class. Her quizzes are very easy. You do have to read several novels. She talks very quiet but uses powerpoints. Her notes are sometimes confusing solely because they are straight facts. Tests only on lectures.
                
                   Loved this prof. Textbooks necessary. You get to use notes on quizzes. Tests are a bit more challenging - part MC and part essay. She gives you the essay topics beforehand though. Catered to different learning styles and used ppt. Would recommend!
                
                   She's really nice and helpful, and the tests weren't too bad, but they had essays...
                
                   Verity is a very good professor; she goes out of her way to find extra material to make the lectures more interesting and she also has a very fun and lively attitude.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   I had Verity for both semesters of freshman seminar. She's awesome and makes the class interesting and exciting.  I learned a lot from her!
                
                   VERITY FREAKIN ROCKS. NUFF SAID! &quot;The meter guys group!&quot;
                
                   This lady is awesome and extremely sweet...she will take time to help you and make sure you understand what is going on...I advise you ask for her...!
                
                   Verity is a great UCCP instructor. From what I've heard she is the best one out there.  She's very informative and if you just listen you'll get an A. She's helpful and always cheery-O! She's the best, sign up for her, you wont regret it!
                
                   She's British and sorta hard to understand but shes a great asset to the 1st year learning community and will make a great history teacher someday.
                
                   LOVED Marquez! Best professor out there! She get's what us students go through and is there for us no matter what!
                
                   Shes freaking amazing teacher, had for one semester in my triad and instantly became my favorite teacher! She helps you out so much. She is very approachable. If your struggling in your lecture she will try her best to help you. 
                
                   Take her class! She is the best history professor at TAMUCC by far. Not many grades and you read 707 pages from two chapter books, but she cares for her students and will help you succeed.
                
                   Professor Marquez is excellent! She considers herself a social historian so the class is taught differently then anything I've ever experienced. I needed to take two semesters of US History and sadly I could only take one with her. She is definitely a great professor to learn from. Make sure to take her class!
                
                   I had her over last summer and was perfect. I got high C just for attending to the class. my essay was really bad the she helped me to improve it. however, I didn't read the book to write my essay. she is good person overall.
                
                   Professor Jin is awesome.  He makes lectures interesting and up to date. Attendance is mandatory because we have daily quizzes. I definitely would take him again.
                
                   If you want a A go to office hours, he likes seeing students trying.
                
                   Would not recommend for summer unless it's going to be your only class.
                
                   Great Professor cares about students and offers good feedback. I wish more discussion in class amongst students but some students just either did not read material or care. I really liked this course and covered many things I wanted to know about China.  I would take this professor again. 
                
                   Great teacher. I would take him every semester if I could. He jokes here and there to make the class more interesting. Very down to earth and is willing to help you out if you are having trouble.
                
                   Took HIST 1301 one Mr. Golwas and he was WONDERFUL! He made history interesting! Test are extremely easy! Just print out/take notes and you're golden. I rarely went to class and never got less than a 95 on a test. He's really funny too!
                
                   He is awesome; you would never guess he was seventy; curses like a sailor but grades fair, and is approachable anytime after class.  I hope to take him for part one, and am keeping an A in the course.
                
                   Awesome teacher!!!!! I had him for History 1301 my sophomore year and his tests are easy! He cuts right to the chase... My class was supposed to meet from 7-9 one day a week but we're usually out of there within an hour. He gives extra credit opportunities. He's funny and just interesting to listen to. I would take him again for another class.
                
                   Taking his class was like listening to my grandpa explain the history of Texas.  My grandpa told the best stories.  He's a really stand-up fella.
                
                   This course does require a lot of studying and preparing for his exams. If there is an SI, definitely attend the sessions after receiving the study guide. I got a D on the first exam, a B- on the second exam, but he must have graded leniently for the final because I got an A+. You can tell he loves what he teaches though as he is very enthusiastic.
                
                   one of my favorite professors here. Is very passionate about history and is interesting to listen to. My class was at 9 in the morning and I actually stayed awake during it. Tests are short essays and are easy if you study. writing papers in his class are long and not fun but theres only 3 to write. Overall a great teacher!
                
                   He's a good professor, sticks to his powerpoints well, and gives a study guide. Attendance is really important, although not mandatory. The only problem I have is that he moves really fast and has some parts of his powerpoints that don't really have anything to do with the subject matter.
                
                   Exams are all short answer, go to class and take notes and you'll do great!
                
                   Blanke is really easy make sure you go to class and take good notes he elaborates on the notes that are already posted on his site. Good for studying for exams, the only thing is be prepared to know a lot of terms because he only picks a few to put on exam! other than that easy class!
                
                   Dr. Blanke was awesome! Class was a breeze did not open my book once. And he is such a great teacher...if you visit during office hours he will give you helpful hints on the test!
                
                   Great professor. Class wasn't the easiest but if you go to class and pay attention its not to bad. Test were kinda of difficult, he used alot of terms and only picks a couple on the test and ofcourse no one knew which ones were on the test, essays are also a HUGE part of it. attendence isnt mand. but it helps alot if you go.
                
                   had for history capstone. Actually, it was easy. Just meet with him three times and he will give you an A, if you take up his suggestions about your paper. Thanks Blanke
                
                   I had him for Capstone, cant think of any professor id rather have for that hell class. hes great, really helpful, just stay on top of deadlines and you'll have most of ur paper done by the end.
                
                   While he does tend to talk and go through the course very fast, he makes history so exciting, & he is a very nice man. The homework is easy & set in place the 1st day of class, so no surprises. Just pay attention to the course and if you need to, take notes. What else can you ask for&#63; I hope to take him again! He also has long hair & is super hot!
                
                   He talks fast but is a good teacher. He likes when students visits because he knows that you want to pass his class!
                
                   He is very into what he does so it is nice to see someone who enjoys what they are doing. He talks kinda fast so there aren't many pauses through the lecture. But the tests weren't very hard as long as you pay attention.
                
                   Fall 2006 - He is a really fun, down to earth prof that really enjoys what he does. He loves to play music and really makes you think about history. I'm not a real big fan of history but he made it interesting! His tests are difficult b/c they are all essay. He give 4 short answer on terms and 1 essay. He also give 3 papers due throught the sem.
                
                   Awesome! It's not an easy class, but he loves what he does so much that it's contagious. Fun class. Loved it!
                
                   HOT.
                
                   Another prof who think's he's teaching a grad course.  A little too advanced and demanding, but nothing you shouldn't be able to handle if you study and attend every class.
                
                   he really knows his stuff! 10% of your grade is just for being there his tests come STRIAGHT from the study guide, they are 8 identifications and 2 essay and you choose 4/8 id's to write about basically significance of what the word is like WW1 and how it came about, the essay you pick 1 to write about so it is all written plus theres 3 other paper
                
                   This man truly loves what he teaches, especially when WWII is concerned. His tests are difficult, but the studying is well worth it. Great, great class.
                
                   Very easy going and fun. Definitely take notes and/or use your book and you'll do fine. Offers fun extra credit! I'm taking him for 1302 without  doubt.
                
                   This guy is the best History/Pol Sci professor ever. I took 4 classes with him and wished he taught in my major - he's that good. He feeds off the energy of the class though, so talk to/interact with him and the semester will be much more enjoyable. Shady&#63;&#63; I definitely didn't see that, but he's not overly friendly to slackers.
                
                   Pretty good teacher.  The way he talks and teaches makes you laugh alot, and he substitutes words for curse words which is always funny.  Kind of shady when you get to know him though.  If you have to miss his class for sports he talks down to you.
                
                   Great Teacher! He definitely tries to help. Attendance not mandatory, but you won't pass his tests without being there. He basically tells you some of what will be on the test during each class. Attend class and you will make a &quot;B&quot; or better. Read the book and attend class and you'll definitely make an &quot;A&quot;.
                
                   I should have gotten a B in his class but he did not like me said I failed his finial because I did not put enough Infomion in my short Answers. It is short answer you dont need alot of infomion.
                
                   He talks very fast ,But he will back up if you ask.He is very witty and tries to make the class fun.  Will give every opportunity to pass his class, but you still have to work for your grade.  Just don't get caught talking or texting on your phone during class!  He will twist off.
                
                   Dr Smith is very knowledgeable about what he is lecturing on. He gives weekly quizzes so make sure you do your reading. If you pay attention in class and take notes, you will do just fine. Would take him again.
                
                   Weekly quizzes. Literally the hardest history class I have ever taken, although not the hardest professor. He does give good lectures. His grading policy and term paper is long and hard.
                
                   After hearing the 411 on Smith I was worried about taking his classes but after attending them I was confused. He is a great lecturer, Tells you exactly what his expectations are with very clear instruction and his lectures are always interesting. 
                
                   Dr. Smith is a maser of his craft.  If you enjoy history and enjoy early America, then this is the prof for you.  Reading is essential, so just do it.  Pop quizzes are expected.  He is very helpful and will shepherd you through the paper writing process.  
                
                   He's not a bad guy. Be prepared to buy the books and read them. 
                
                   This class isn't that bad! As long as you do your readings, and speak a little during class you'll pass this class. Now if you don't read, then yeah you will fail! Dr. Smith is a great teacher, and knows his History! I really enjoyed having a teacher that actually knew what they were talking about. His discussing's were very interesting!
                
                   He is tough, but as long as you do the reading, and speak up in class, you'll be okay.  He's happy to help you if you go to see him and ask for it.
                
                   If you are not a historian, I advise DO NOT TAKE HIM! Hardest class I've ever taken.
                
                   Just do the work and don't be stupid and you'll be fine. I have a feeling the other raters are just disgruntled on the work required (lazy bums).
                
                   The best thing about his class is that is tests are all online
                
                   PLease do not take history class with this teacher the class is very hard to pass and the test are hard
                
                   Dr. Smith is not a professor for the common slacker. You must be passionate about your grade to get his attention.  Yes he is a very difficult professor and expects greatness from you, but is by far not a monster. his lectures are enjoyable and his tests are all online. I enjoyed him as a professor and would recommend him to a hard working student
                
                   HE IS BY FAR THE WORSE PROFESSOR I EVER HAD IN MY LIFE, FIND ANOTHER!!
                
                   DON'T TAKE HIS CLASS FIND ANOTHER. HE DOESN'T TEACH ANYTHING AND EXPECTS A LOT. TESTS ARE VERY HARD, YOU ARE NOT SUPPOSED TO PASS
                
                   DO NOT TAKE CLASSES W/ HIM. His class is made for you NOT to pass. DO NOT take class w/ him. It's confusing, overwhelms you w/ material, tests are every other week and aside for the huge amount of stuff are VERY difficult. JUST AWFUL!!
                
                   People who say that Dr. Smith is hard and that he doesn't grade fairly probably didn't put forth effort in his class. I've taken him for a few classes, and he has always been great and helpful. Sometimes I can see how people might see him as mean, but  he is a great professor and he is extremely knowledgeable about his field.
                
                   Does not prepare you for exams, none of the questions are directly addressed in class.
                
                   The worst professor that I have ever had! DON'T TAKE HIS CLASS!!
                
                   Don't take his class! He is full of himself, grades harshly,and never leaves feedback.
                
                   His grading policy is absolutely ridiculous! I bust my tail in this class. I have always been a straight A student and have a low C in this class. He gives no feedback to tell you what you can do better and you never know how to prepare for exams.
                
                   He's one of the best teachers I've ever had. He was accessible to EVERYONE after class, despite whoever said he wasn't said. He's very interested in the subject he teaches. He's a great lecturer, but doesn't follow the book. So make sure you go to class and do whatever assignments he gives you.
                
                   This is the rudest and most partial teacher I have ever met. He always talked to the blonde girls after class and had meetings with them outside of class but was not accessible AT ALL to anyone else. He was extremely disrespectful to students and other teachers. I would advise you NOT to take his class
                
                   As long as you go to class and take notes on his lectures, you will ace his class.  He is very helpful when he knows you are making an effort.  Gives reviews for tests. Doesn't really go with textbook just is own lectures so attendence is very crucial to your grade.
                
                   interesting lectures, but jumps around a lot.  if you don't do the reading you will be lost.  assignments time consuming and vague, half the time things are assigned and not collected, lots of work done for nothing.  lots of students miss class and it doesn't seem to matter.  she seems pretty easy on grading
                
                   mostly the lectures were interesting but not on topic.  half of the quiz grades were dropped.  The essay exam was difficult to understand and graded very hard  This class required a lot of at home time spent on busy work
                
                   very boring, but she will help you out.  she gave our class a 26 point curve on one test
                
                   Do not take this woman! As a history major her classes are so easy and she does not teach anything at all that is not spelled out in the books that she chose fot the class. More often than not the class &quot;discussions&quot; are her going off on random tangents and her venting her opinion about random stuff
                
                   She is hilarious!! She made history very fun and interesting. She puts a unique spin on things. Her tests are not hard IF you study. She grades her essays very hard though. Overall, it was a fun class and she was a fun teacher.
                
                   Ms. Miller is a great teacher, very easy and easy to understand. I took her for 121 and had to take her again , because I liked her so much.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Awesome teacher, very clear and precise. She wasn't too harsh on grading as long as you put forth the effort. Always offered people help and I would definitely recommend to everyone.
                
                   Gave me (and everyone else) a &quot;C&quot; and took off to Indiana with no cares. (of course this is Commerce)
                
                   This course sucked. No sense of facts and was completely useless.
                
                   Land is a good teacher as soon as you can get past the eye blinking. Very clear and concise in teaching, just read the books, and the tests are exactly as he spells them out. Good guy all around
                
                   He will make you read and write a lot, but he knows his stuff.  If you take all your essays to him to review before you turn them in, you will get an A every time.
                
                   Dr. Land is not an extremely difficult professor. If you like to wtite a lot, this is the professor for you. Test are ALL essay. and he will read every word. Very discussion oriented classes. Made History bearable for a semester...
                
                   Dr. Land is an excellent teacher.  While at first he may appear tough, if you will just try and stick it out, it will work out.  I agree with previous ratings that he teaches a tough course and students have a tough time with that.
                
                   great teacher, very helpful. loves to see you pass
                
                   clear and concise.  very helpful.  made the class interesting-even something I didn't care about one teensy weency bit.
                
                   This professor is a good all around professor.  He has to suffer because he teaches a hard class, and students at TAMU-C don't know how to react to that.  He has mad skills.
                
                   sucks--horible--mean---words that come to mind when you think of Land.
                
                   This class isn't difficult. You have one test and one paper. It's not interesting though.
                
                   Very quickly lost the attention of her students, tended to lose track of thought or drone on. The written exams are graded harshley, all exams are multiple questions to be answered in essay format. Recieved little-to-no help and failed to give feedback. Contact outside of the classroom was nonexistent. I would not recommend her to anyone whatsoever
                
                   I would never take a class or any class by her again. She is very hard to follow and doesn't explain things well. She does not give clear instructions or clear feedback.
                
                   She's good and know what she is doing.
                
                   Every student I met that does not like her are all lazy and stupid. Sorry, but its true. She is clear and all. If you don't care for the area you are studying, you wont be too interested. Do the work and don't write garbage for her assignments (majority of this school writes garbage anyway).
                
                   Hard teacher.
                
                   I love history, but her class made me hate it. Very hard to understand. She should be teaching Russian history (Her Phd) not American.
                
                   I hate this teacher. She's ridiculous. Reading the book and then reading three other books and writing papers on all of them while trying to keep up with her robot lectures and crazy exams. She gives you a LONG list of names, dates, events and just study them all even though she'll ask you about less than half. AVOID!
                
                   She's not entirely unpleasant and seems to know what she's talking about. BUT, her tests and prep for the tests are below minimum and are nearly no help at all. Not to mention the essays are graded harshly!
                
                   This teacher does not know her stuff and so she reads from notes the whole time. Very monotone. Doesn't take attendance after first 15 days so attendance isn't mandatory except on the days you have quizzes. Essays get graded harshly. Don't take her if possible.
                
                   This teacher is very boring and does not keep the attention of her students. She uses her GA often and the GA is often times very rude.
                
                   He's a great teacher study for the essay on the test and you'll get an A. The only thing to know is that we had a take home quiz over one of the books make sure you do it and do it right.
                
                   He was a great professor, this was my first year of college and I am glad that I had him! We do powerpoint everyday but he makes them into a story almost, we watch videos, and his tests are very easy! 
                
                   You will just take notes the whole class, but he's interactive and you'll usually end up leaving his class early. Funny and very charming, I love history  so it came really easy to me especially since he's a great teacher! 
                
                   He's actually a Graduate assistant. Class is fairly easy. He's down to earth, and tells it how it is. Releases class once hes done with lecture so like 20 min classes.
                
                   Mr. Hinz is a fun cool professor. He makes history very interesting. All the students enjoy hearing him teach.  
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Dr Baker is straightforward and to the point on the first day of class and gives you the essential to pass.
                
                   I took two African History courses with Dr. Yarak. He really sparked my interest in the subject. He does have strong political opinions and will get frustrated if his course is not taken seriously. His lectures were interesting, and if you do the reading you can get a decent grade. Overall, a very good professor in my opinion.
                
                   good lecturer that sparks the interest of his students in Africa.  Textbooks are essential Read ahead some and Yarek;s class is easier to relate to.
                
                   I was impressed with Dr. Yarak.  If you keep up with your req. reading you will do fine.  If you show him you are willing and trying he will respect you and for the arrogant comments...I took two classes of his, and there was no arrogance, rather intelligence!
                
                   Yarak has an arrogant demeanor and has little time to smile because to him, everything is so serious--there's a Republican in the White House!  He tends to buy into what most academics regard as bogus conspiracy theories.  He needs to lighten up and stop taking himself so seriously.  What a yahoo!
                
                   I took an 200 level African history class with him.  He was hard but a great prof.  Don't slack and you will do fine.  Ask him about his travel abroad as a junior in high school.
                
                   Great professor.  If you work hard, do your reading, and are not lazy he will work with you.  I took several classes with him and wish I could take more.
                
                   Boring lecturer. Lots of people fall asleep in his class and he doesn't seem to realize why. Very arrogant, doesn't like to hear student opinions that contradict his own.
                
                   Great Prof
                
                   He is amazing and loves George Washington.
                
                   he s a pretty good prof n if u keep going to class regularly u can easily get a A or B....can be very sarcastic at times
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Very helpful
                
                   Easy. Just take notes in class, do the assigned paper which is more like a summary, and you can receive an A. I received a B without putting to much effort in to it. Great Prof.
                
                   This is a must-take teacher if you want an easy A in the low history courses.  Attendance is not mandatory, but it counts for extra credit. He doesn't give quizzes, but he assigns a paper and three tests. This is my second time taking him and I expect another A. He's pretty friendly, and he gives you plenty of notice. Just be sure to COME to class!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Starks was awesome. I'm taking him again for 106! He gives 4 multiple choice tests that all carry the same weight. Attendance counts for 10% of your grade but you're given 2 free absences. He doesn't post his notes or lectures, but gives study guides that are straight from the textbook. Sometimes gets off topic but overall is a great professor!
                
                   He's a great professor. He knows what he's talking about and he loves what he's talking about. His lectures can get a little long, but there's no homework and there aren't many chapters to read. Reading the chapter fills you in on everything he lectures about, but class attendance is mandatory. It's an interesting class and an easy A.
                
                   Definitely take him if you can! He gives a study guide for all of his tests that if you fill out, you should get an A. I hate history so I found the lectures boring and I just used the book, but a lot of people seemed to enjoy them. He is funny and extremely nice! 
                
                   I love history to begin with but Dr. Starks made it 10X better. All the test questions come straight from his lecture and he makes the material fun and interesting. If you're a sports fan like me, you'll love his many basketball and football jokes and stories and how he relates them to history. Will for sure take his 106 class next semester. 
                
                   Best history teacher I've ever had in my whole life. His lectures are amazing. To get an A, just take the study guide that he gives you for each exam and fill it out during the lectures and you're good. Textbook not really needed. Just listen to the lecture and use Google. Funny guy with somewhat funny jokes and cool life stories. Loves football.
                
                   his tests are pretty much straight from lecture--easy A...he does require you to read the 3 books in the class and write an essay over one- but the essay is like limited to 500-600 words (like a page, double-spaced)--young so he makes class fun! Def. would take him!
                
                   Professor Rouleau is the BEST prof I've had at A&M. He is really passionate about what he is talking about and he made history really interesting by lecturing from a different perspective. I would take any class he offered. I enjoyed going to his class and if you get the opportunity take him! 
                
                   Professor Rouleau was THE best professor I have had at A&M so far. Being a liker of history to begin with, his lectures showed his excitement and passion and tests were mainly based off lectures. There are 2-3 papers but not much reading and as long as you are willing to go to class and participate in debates, you should definitely take it. 
                
                   TAKE THIS CLASS. Easiest class at A&M as long as you go to class and take good notes. Even if you HATE history, THIS CLASS IS SO EASY. Seriously, Dr. Rouleau is a phenomenal speaker and will HELP THE INFORMATION STICK! I studied for his CUMULATIVE final for about an hour and made a high A. I hate history. That should speak for itself. 
                
                   LOVED him! made me actually enjoy history! pretty easy a. no textbook but assigns 3 books and have to write paper over 2. test are pretty straightforward if you go to class and take good notes. two tests and a cumulative final. also participation grade for weekly discussion groups. attendance not mandatory for lecture but is for dg. take his class!
                
                   Professor Rouleau genuinely cares about his students. His lectures are very entertaining and his tests are fair. He presents history in a way that will make you re-think about all that you have learned in previous history classes, and outwardly displays his passion for history. Highly recommend!
                
                   Professor Rouleau will be one of the best professors you ever have. He is the kind of professor that wakes up in the morning wanting to teach. Rouleau is hilarious and my favorite professor. 
                
                   Professor Rouleau is literally the best professor I've ever had, his lectures are amazing and he's so entertaining. I would recommend him to anyone because he is also very passionate about his courses, the tests are easy if you go to class and take notes. You won't even want to skip lectures because he makes them that fun and interesting. 
                
                   Absolutely LOVED this class! I actually enjoyed going to class because of this Professor. He is very informative and has a passion for teaching. There are 2 exams which are straight forward. You must go to the lectures to get the information you need for the test, but if you take good notes then you will be sure to pass.
                
                   One of the most enthusiastic professors I've had so far and by far one of my favorites! Also a pretty class to get an A in as long as you go to lectures & take decent notes.
                
                   Awesome professor! Super passionate about his teaching. However, if you're a visual learner, avoid his class. He mostly just stands and talks with a few pictures on the board. Two exams, four quizzes, one paper, and a final with extra credit. Really quick to email back too.
                
                   IF HIS SECTION IS AVAILABLE TAKE IT!!  He is actually the first instructor to keep me interested about history.  If you're having problems feel free to go to his office hours where he is very helpful.  His enthusiasm about what he teaches makes you want to come back.  As long as you take notes you'll be fine.
                
                   Professor Rouleau is one of the most engaging profs I've had at Texas A&M. Class felt more like a discussion than a lecture. His method of presenting the material is extremely passionate and entertaining. He's also extremely nice and caring. Fair essay grader. I had him in his first semester as a prof so he can only be better. Also Dat Beard!
                
                   TAKE THIS CLASS!! He is such an enthusiastic professor and his class is actually enjoyable. His class is a breeze if you just try a little. Don't have a text book and you really don't really have to read the other silly books. Just sparknotes them. TAKE HIM!
                
                   Even though I'm the only one so far, believe me TAKE IT! Great professor, is as knowledgeable as he is enthusiastic about history. DREAM course received a 98, NO TEXTBOOK, test are all MC, you don't have to read the outside readings to get 100%s on the online quizzes (sparknotes), only studying for tests is notes, one paper85 3 tests: 96, 100, 103.
                
                   Great prof for 105! He gives three tests, true or false, all non-cumulative and there are two book essays. His lectures are clear and are exactly what goes on the test. He wants to make the class as easy as possible for his students.
                
                   Resch is easy! There are 3 true/false tests that he gives you reviews for. The reviews have the exact questions on them. The final isn't cumulative. There are three papers that he gives you questions that you have to answer to write. His TA grades the papers and will help you if you can't answer the questions. He makes jokes occasionally. 
                
                   His class is super easy as long as you show up. I would come to class, sign in, and fall asleep. He gives you a study guide for each test that is pretty much the same as the test and all the answers for it are on quizlet.  I probably only took notes for the first three classes and stared sleeping in class after that point and I still made an A.
                
                   Take this prof for 105. Yes he's sorta boring but it's incredibly easy. He takes attendance and he will fail you if you don't come to class. You only have to do two book reports (he gives you prompt questions, super easy) and do the tests. They are 50 T/F questions and he gives you them before hand to memorize. He rewords them a bit but it's EASY. 
                
                   Easy class just sleep during his mandatory lectures and pass the easy quizzes and book reports.
                
                   Attendance is mandatory in order for you to pass. He doesn't use any visual aid and just lectures straight through. As long as you take notes throughout the entire class, the time will go by fast. You will not pass the class if you don't take notes because his take home exams come straight through your notes. Easily passable if you put in effort.
                
                   Very long-winded and hard-to-follow lectures. He was also pretty unhelpful whenever I would go to his office hours for help.  He also seems to have Marxist and anti-religion streaks, so be forewarned if that isn't your thing.
                
                   His test are based around 3 papers, which he grades pretty harshly. His lectures are extremely long and boring, he doesn't use any visual aids and it's extremely easy to lose sense of what he's saying on lecture. Extremely hard to follow. I tried going to his office hours for help but he was extremely unhelpful, he expects you to already understand
                
                   This prof gives LONG BORING lectures. I have never fallen asleep in a lecture in my life until I came to this class. However, this wasn't too bad of a class since he gave out reviews and the exams were TF. He isn't a tough grader and gives a take home final. DO NOT buy the textbook. 
                
                   I rarely went to class and made a C.  It is not too bad, you just have to study and know your stuff for the exams.
                
                   Only 5 grades in the class, so you have to make them matter. For the 3 tests, he gives you about 10 pages of TF questions and each test is 50 TF from that packet. You know the review - you know the test, easy money. Also assigns 2 book reviews. I never read the book and just googled the prompts - got 2 high B's. Easy A.
                
                   His tests are truefalse. He gives you about 100 questions and then chooses 50 to test you over. Must take notes during lecture because thats what he bases all the questions on. Attendance isn't mandatory, but it definitely helps to go to class. 3 tests total, including the final, plus 2 book reports. You have to study and really work.
                
                   Would not recommend! Lectures consist of him talking the entire time with no PowerPoints or any visual aid. His tests are 50 questions TF directly from what he said in class. If you did not catch a minor detail, you better hope the person next to you did. I went to his office hours, and he refused to help me. DO NOT TAKE HIM!!
                
                   He knows what he is talking about, but can not communicate it to the students at all. The tests are 50 questions, true/false, and based off his lecture entirely which is confusing in the first place. I never used the textbook, but there are assigned readings, and reports due. 5 grades, 20% each, would not recommend at all.
                
                   His tests are pretty hard because they consist of 50 true/false questions. They based almost entirely off his lectures which are incredibly boring. Would not recommend.
                
                   Prof. Resch takes his job seriously. He expects you to show up and pay attention every class. He wants you to get full value from the class. Tests are take home but intensive. He is very knowledgeable and helpful. Most think he is hard but if you do the reading and attend class then you will do well. Would recommend.
                
                   Overall, it's an interesting class, but it's requires a lot of reading. I definitely learned a lot from her and I would take her again. She's very helpful and she gives extra credit every week. 
                
                   She was very interesting and easy to talk to if you took the time. She is tough, and you have to know the content for tests.
                
                   Lectures are long, be prepared to study a lot for the tests. Overall, she is a good prof, just slightly boring sometimes. 
                
                   Very nice professor! she was always willing to go above and beyond to help the students and she graded papers fair. no exams for this class but a research paper. overall very easy and enjoyable class!
                
                   When I took this class he gave the option to take the final, and I think this was because he dropped the lowest test grade. So if you don't do so hot on the first test (like I didn't) then you get the chance to drop it. Quizzes every 2 weeks or so, easy though. If you can get a hold of his older tests that will help a lot!
                
                   I really enjoyed the class. Professor Pogue is amazing!
                
                   Professor Pogue is a good professor who brings history to life.  I'm not a history major but I enjoyed attending class and learning about American history.  The tests are not bad and the paper assignment is very fair.  I recommended this class to my friends.
                
                   Overall, not a difficult class and passed with an A. The lectures can be long and boring at times (especially on Friday's) but just take specific notes, even notes on stupid stuff stuff you think he's just rambling about. At times, Pogue could be very sarcastic and almost rude to students during in class discussion though. Random attendance taken.
                
                   actually a pretty good prof! His lectures get kind of long towards the end of the semester, but they're interesting and he does a good job of keeping the class engaged. Tests are tough because of the "both A & C" or "both A&B" answers, but if you read over notes you should be good. Tests are based entirely off lectures, so go to class! 
                
                   i enjoyed Pogue, I actually looked forward to his class. Take notes, notes and more notes because his lectures are the test. The essay he assigns, he grades himself and he seems to have graded leniently and gives feedback. Sometimes the tests can get trickey because of the answer choices being "both A and C" or "both Band C"Would take again!
                
                   Mr. Pogue is a great lecturer. He is passionate about the subject. He stays on topic pretty well. He lectures very quickly. He puts the main idea he is discussing on the slide show, but not any notes, so be prepared to actively listen and take notes from his word, not the presentation. I would recommend reading the chapter before the lecture.
                
                   Really liked this class, and I'm not a history person at all! Easy for a history, but still expect to study hard. A is definitely attainable. 4 quizzes, and 4 tests including the final but he takes best 3 of 4 so final is optional. Don't need the textbook. He gives key terms on ecampus which is super nice.
                
                   AN AMAZING PROF!!! If you are good at listening & learning, this class is a breeze. His tests & quizzes are all based on lecture. Type fast/take good notes & read them  an A. I found his lectures to be very entertaining and made me EAGER to learn History. He gives four tests & drops one, so the final is optional! Wish he taught HIST 106 too. 
                
                   Nothing is too tough, everything is doable with effort.  He speaks very quickly, so I took my Mac to class.  I would highly recommend taking notes in M-Word, but not mandatory.  He gives key terms.  Just do your studying (I read over my notebook at least 2 times before quiztest) and you will get an Easy B or maybe an A depending on student.  
                
                   He was not very interesting during lecture, but at least he tried. In his office hours its almost like he doesn't want to be there more than you. Albeit, he will mitigate any confusion you might have.
                
                   Lectures are the exams, so take pretty good notes. You don't need to read the textbook. 3 tests, 4 quizzes, and 1 paper. All are super easy if you pay attention and take notes. Go to class! He's extremely approachable and wants his students to do well. 
                
                   Take Pogue for history 105!! The first 2 quizzes and the first test had tricky answer choices because they were mostly a and c or a and b, etc. He did ask us how he could improve the class and he took those answer choices away. Test and quizzes come straight from the lecture, don't really need the text book. Be prepared to take a lot of notes
                
                   He's bae. Tricky questions on the exams. He talks really fast during lecture and his test questions are all from his lecture so don't miss his class
                
                   Took best 3 of 4 tests including the final, so that was optional. Tests multiple choice and truefalse. One 2-3 page paper over one of two assigned books. Four quizzes throughout the semester. The textbook is interesting.
                
                   His lectures are super fast, so you better pay close attention. Taking notes on the computer is much recommended. Writing what he says is just too slow. Go to his office hours if you need help. Doesn't put the powerpoints online. He does take questions from previous testsquizzes and put them on the final. 
                
                   Great Class! Easy A if you go to class. Most of the test questions come from his lectures so pay attention!
                
                   In the beginning, wasn't sure if I liked him, but I learned to love this class! Really easy, picks the best three out of four test grades, four quizzes and an easily graded paper. Don't need to read the textbook or the two assigned novels. His tests and quizzes are easy if you show up to class and pay attention, just review your notes beforehand.
                
                   He's amazing. Great professor. Only had to write one paper, and I feel like he gave me a generous grade on it. He's super cute and funny. Also, he's young and current. He likes to take time for class discussion. His lectures are pretty thorough, but if you want something more in depth then you can read the book. His syllabus is helpful. Overall, A+
                
                   He knows how to engage an entire class of 300 students super well. He lets us discuss pertinent matters openly and share our opinions. He's super helpful during office hours. I brought in a paper for him to read over before turning it in to save my grade. Going to class is essential. It's so easy to get behind. He lectures very fast!!!!
                
                   Please do not take this class. No textbook, just lecture, so if you miss even half of class you're behind. There are around 6 or 7 different books you need to read to do well on the tests and papers. His lecture slides are just pictures, so it's easy to get names/dates wrong. Attendance is mandatory, and if you miss, you drop  a letter.
                
                   He's a total babe, but his class is very hard. He is a great lecturer and keeps class interesting, but the reading required is insane. Also if you skip class you get so behind and there is really no coming back from that.
                
                   He is a good prof but wouldn't be my first choice there is soooo much reading material for the amount of application of it. But his lectures arent scattered and there is clear grading criteria.
                
                   He is the worst professor I have ever taken in my life. I am currently failing and I have never failed anything before. READ THE BOOKS! The books are about 15-20% of the tests, which are all cumulative. There are two essays as well but if you don't put a coversheet on it he will give you a 60 and not even read it. He doesn't curve anything. 
                
                   Great professor! He is very passionate about history and his lectures are very interesting. Tests were fairly easy if you listen in class, the books are usually no more than 15% of his tests so you can still get a B without reading. I read half the books and went to class every time and got an A pretty easily
                
                   This was one of my favorite classes/professors. His lectures are interesting, and the exams are easy if you take decent notes and read the assigned books.
                
                   Lectures were interesting and tests were farely easy
                
                   the guy is cool.. but that class sucks!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Kind of freaky tall, but totally not boring. I just wish he taught more topics normal people care about. I mean - the Caribean&#63; Needs to stop going on about archives.
                
                   Difficult to understand bc accent. Tells dirty jokes. Never really teaches anything. Misses half of classes & when shes there she assigns activities & leaves. Exams are impossible, neither section had 1 passing grade on any exam & they were barely curved. Says projects are big deal but grades easy on it. Min papers are stupid. Total Waste of time!
                
                   Amazing professor. He has almost weekly clicker quizzes, but if you go to class and kinda pay attention, they're super easy. No tests at all. The essay at the end of the year was a little tough though. Overall, he is a super nice guy who is very intelligent and makes class fun and easy! Would definitely take him again!
                
                   The class was a lot of fun but the essay at the end of the semester is kinda scary
                
                   Great Prof. Very engaging and has great stories and anecdotes. Study notes for almost daily quizzes. Gives great extra credit. If you he sees your initiative, you will get an A.
                
                   This past semester I took American Military History class with Prof. Linn and by far it is my favorite class this semester. I never was much of a history buff before this class but my interest has been spiked. There is a lot of reading for his classes, but most of the novels are interesting. This is a class I looked forward to every day.
                
                   This class is easy to make an A in if you attend class and take notes. The best part is that there are no papers to write. The test questions are very straight forward, so all you need is a basic understanding. Only down side is, there is a weekly online reading quiz each week. They cover about 60-90 pages, but you can take with other students.
                
                   Really cool prof, also really helpful if you have any problems/questions. Attending lecture is pretty much mandatory because he does not use or offer a textbook in his class. He tries to get a lot into his lectures so they can be quick. There are outside readings assigned each week along with an online quiz each week over the readings.
                
                   Honestly, I hate history, but Lenihan is probably the most passionate professor out there. He does assign reading, but they are mostly short primary documents. He is very insightful and extremely passionate about the subject. Attendance is mandatory, and if you attend class and take good notes (he gives note outlines), you don't need the textbook.
                
                   Lenihan is a great professor! His lectures are interesting and he's passionate about what he teaches. Your grade comes from 3 exams and 1 paper. Exams are straight forward, he tests you over the EXACT things that he talks about in class so take GOOD NOTES and READ all of your readings and you're guaranteed to pass. Tests are fairly easy if you read
                
                   I've never been that interested in history, but that changed this semester. The way that he communicates how history happened makes it all so easy to comprehend. He can be hard to understand at times, but it's not a huge deal. I actually learned a lot in his history class. Would definitely take 106 with him if he taught it. 
                
                   Not a terrible class, he's a good teacher, but I found it terribly hard to understand what he was saying majority of the classes. And with the tests being pretty much only over lecture notes, that didn't go over too well for me. Has his TA do grading/office hours.I would probably have chosen a diff prof, but not awful if forced to take this class. 
                
                   Very harsh grader. Tests are half MC, half essay. He grades the essay portion as if you are expected to be an expert on the information tested. Learned in the class, but would not recommend to someone else for a simple upper level history credit. 
                
                   Lenihan speaks very passionately and is excited about what hes talking about, however someone times the topics can be very boring to us. I didn't really read the textbook and did pretty well if I just paid attention in lecture. Read the other assignments he gives you though because they will be a big part of the test.
                
                   Sometimes the lectures get kind of boring. If you miss a lecture, you can always read the textbook. The textbook has really helped me get a good grade. He asks for participation to discuss outside reading material. It is mandatory to buy the CD-ROM and the assigned books for class because they are on the test but he doesn't cover it in lecture.
                
                   Class is completely discussion based. Participation is necessary or the class is kinda awkward. Discussion is over various readings that aren't too lengthy, but require extreme concentration. Slightly difficult tests. He is brilliant though, I've actually learned from him. 
                
                   Great professor with interesting lectures. Lectures are where you are going to get all of your information for the test so its not wise to skip any classes. The tests aren't too challenging although if you don't attend class or do the readings required you most likely won't pass. 
                
                   Attendance is absolutely mandatory if you care about your grade. His lectures are extremely clear and he does not ask you to memorize really specific datesevents in history; he gives a very general overview of almost everything. Great prof and decently easy class. He assigns two papers but they arent hard. 
                
                   Fairly interesting class. Test questions come from lecture and readings but were not difficult. He takes attendance in lecture and recitation and if you miss enough times it drops you a letter grade. He speaks clearly enough but sometimes speaks quickly and will not allow his lectures to be recorded. Overall good professor though!
                
                   Class was overall interesting but he doesn't cure at the end of the year even when much needed. However you can replace 10% of your lowest exam grade with your discussion grade.
                
                   Great professor! I would highly recommend him to anyone taking history. As long as you read the assigned reading each week, it isn't difficult. There are no quizzes, only a mixture of discussion and lecture. He's easy to understand and makes his lectures/discussions interesting. :)
                
                   really have to take notes and read the book. the tests are more on ideas than dates and people. make sure you go to class.
                
                   He is a good professor. We have discussion groups outside of regular lecture and that is very useful as well. Attendance is mandatory but he's usually entertaining and you can pick up on a lot of information if you just listen (without reading). really nice guy :]
                
                   I really enjoyed this class and found it pretty easy. Not a whole lot of work to do outside of class with the exception of some minor reading and then summarizing that reading. lectures are interesting and he does a good job of keeping me engaged. No textbook required so MUST go to lectures to pass. Overall, Id love to take another class with him.
                
                   His lectures are vary in length. I took him during a summer session and he lectured on the first day. He has some good jokes. He assigns long books and expects you to write a paper on it. He grades harshly on papers and the exam if you aren't clear.  
                
                   He is entirely lecture based and he does have attendance checks in the tests but if you go you won't have any problems. He makes lectures interesting, he types up an outline before class starts so you can have some organization for your notes. He makes funny jokes and tells funny stories and he calls out the kids who show up only on test days.
                
                   Took Professor Howell's online course at AMU/APUS.  Very helpful.  Assignments were clear.  Fast grader.  Would definitely recommend him!
                
                   He's pretty relaxed other than the first test being hard the following test were take home and boosted your grade, you also get participation grades for showing up, so the more days you miss the lower your participation grade is.
                
                   He does lots of group participation with the chapters to help you understand the chapters better. The first Test given was hard, but the rest were take home to make up for it and they were fairly easy, just time consuming.  I would definetly recommend this Proffesor.
                
                   His mlnatone voic, long lectures, and unineresting way of teaching makes it diff. to stay awake in class. Stay away from Howell. Tests are all esay based. Although he does give you a review.
                
                   She grades hard, makes exams very tricky, and online reading quizzes are not easy. she is straight lecture. no extra  credit. not helpful if you miss class for a university excused absence.
                
                   Discussion sections on the reading&#63;&#63;
                
                   No Comments
                
                   treats the 300+ student class like highschool-no reading, talking, sleeping.  VERY hard tests, easy papers.  NO CURVE!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   OMG! she is one of the hardest teachers i ever had... shes really hyper... she talks alot and fast so its hard to take notes, usually skips around in what shes teaching. her exams are hell and there are no study guides. and she LOVES maps
                
                   This is the hardest hist teacher at A&M, doesn't believe in multiple choice
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Very responsive.  A wonderful professor, challenging but fair.
                
                   Foote loves her job and has mastered teaching this curriculum. At first I was very discouraged because the grading is very rough and all assignments (although there aren't many) required a lot of preparation. But she is an interesting lecturer, nice person, and she wants you to succeed as long as you put in the work.
                
                   Dr. Foote is passionate about what she teaches and very intriguing in her lectures. Extremely kind & relatable, making her students want to do well for her. Not the easiest A (she has the TA grade hard) but if you put in effort you can do well. This class taught me how to study & write and I developed habits I'll take with me throughout college.
                
                   Dr. Foote changed my whole perspective on college in general. She is passionate about what she does and will teach you how to be a student, and a scholar. Lectures are presented in a passionate way and she is always open outside of class. She wants you to succeed.
                
                   Dr. Foote is a really great professor but don't take her if you want an easy A. There is only a midterm and a final and they are completely written out which is difficult to prepare for. I worked really hard for this class but still made a C because of the assignments. Her class sparked my interest for history, but brought down my GPA.
                
                   She is so passionate! I loved going to her lectures just to hear her. She is funny and engaging. I took her class my first semester freshman year and her expectations for writing assignments were higher than I expected, but if you make a half-ass effort studying and go to class, which is not hard, an A is achievable.
                
                   You can tell she really cares about history and that makes her lectures interesting and enjoyable. The information is entirely lecture based so if you don't go to class, you will fail the class. Her tests are essay based and she grades fairly difficult (I got points off for not capitalizing a word) but they're not impossible if you study.
                
                   I worked my butt off in this class and I still made a C. I really enjoyed lectures because she is so inspiring and loves her job but when it comes to grading don't get your hopes up. There is no curve at anytime, no extra credit and her tests are crap to study for because you have to know everything for a short test that isn't even multiple choice.
                
                   Her class is essay based, with essay quizzes and tests. If you study you will get the A. She is a dynamic speaker and teaches history is terms of stories not dates. There was no date memorizing or time lines, I highly recommend her! She loves what she's doing and makes you love it too!
                
                   It's very obvious that she absolutely loves history, and loves teaching it just as much. She doesn't put her notes online so you have to either take them yourself or have a friend send them to you. I never got bored in her class and if I had to take History 106 I would definitely take Foote again!
                
                   Dr. Foote is so passionate about history which makes her lectures really interesting. She is a story teller so the class isn't about boring history because she is energetic! She has 1 assignment, 1 quiz and 1 test for each half semester. (So two of each total) I would have to say the one bad thing is she doesn't post lectures online so go to class!
                
                   Her lectures are very interesting! She knows her stuff and is excited about history. She assigned three books, gave reading quizzes, and made two writing assignments. The only tests were the midterm and the final. Her TA did the grading and was  tough. She would take points off on the writing assignments and exams and not give a good reason why.
                
                   Dr. Foote's class was a great start for getting used to the difficulty of college classes. If you go to all of the lectures, take good notes, and study hard the tests will make you happy. If you read all the books and actually take away the important information from them the quizzes will be easy as well. Not a walk in the park but very manageable.
                
                   Dr. Foote's lectures are great and easy to understand, she has an obvious passion for history so she makes it interesting. Only downfall to this class is you have to go and take good notes, and read several books for quizzes. She's one of the best professors I've ever had as far as actual teaching abilities go, I'd definitely take her again.
                
                   Dr. Foote makes history very interesting by including fun stories and explaining things with details that make them make more sense. Since there is no textbook, attendance is crucial but it is not a boring class at all. Her grading is tough, but doable. I feel like I have actually learned and retained what she taught our class. She rocks!
                
                   I loved her lectures, she gets really into it. 
                
                   She loves her subject, so her lectures are very engaging. Her passion for history is infectious and I started her class not enjoying history and now I love it. She balances out her tests with a few quizzes and assignments, but those are both easy and she tells you exactly what will be asked on them.
                
                   Hands down best professor. 
                
                   with this man, you will want to change your major to History. that's all i can say.  I was impressed
                
                   Amazing and intelligent professor!!! His class was easy and then in the end, you still remember everything! He really cares about his students and is very helpful. By far the best teacher I have taken at HCC. Its an easy A IF you come to class and take notes- class was never let out early and yet the class time flew by!
                
                   Professor Esparza is a great teacher, seriously. I took him for Houston community college (central) for summer classes and he is the best. He will go throughly with all sections, no book required. His notes are clear all powerpoint and videos! He is awesome Seriously! Take him!My grade was a 95
                
                   Dr. Esparza will become your new best friend. You have to go to class because it is the only way to get an A. Class ALWAYS gets out early so it's not a big deal. He is funny, energetic and knows his stuff. Take him if you can and you will get an A. Just pay attention, take notes, and don't read the book. I never opened it and got an A in his class
                
                   EXTREMELY EASY COURSE. Go to class, because his lectures are his test. Don't bother reading the textbooks, we didn't ever use them. His motto is &quot;study smarter, not harder&quot;. We also had take-home book quizzes that we were allowed to work on together. Easiest class i've had to date at TAMU, but you have to go to class to get the lecture notes.
                
                   Great Teacher, Gives great grades for what you put into it. Very Very smart and interesting. Take himif you have a chance, you won't regret it.
                
                   
                
                   Not an easy class, but she'll help you get a good grade.
                
                   I meant to say she is very helpful!!
                
                   I meant to rate her high on helpfulness!!
                
                   Taken my last semester, this is the only real/serious college class i feel like i've taken.  Dr. Dror is very passionate and knowledgeable and expects her students to read, participate, and have opinions.  Be prepared for a lot of reading and essay quizzes and exams.
                
                   
                
                   Awesome Prof. Really good at explaining the material and he makes it interesting. The catch;  he talks fast and I mean FAST.  He also doesn't post his notes until the day before the test(if at all) so if you miss information  (and you will.  Even if you are typing you won't keep up) you have no choice but to cram the night before the exam.  
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   You have to actually work for this class. He is very helpful if you go to office hours which you really should. He's very specific with what he wants but doesn't communicate it well. Don't take his class if you aren't prepared to read and study.   Make the effort and he will reward you.
                
                   Long lectures but he kept it interesting by relating the class back to different songs that he would play each day at the beginning of the lessons. His quizzes were fairly easy but if you did bad on any assignment, it's hard to recover as there was only two quizzes, two writing assignments (which you have the option to redo for a 75) and the final.
                
                   I struggled with the quizzes and one of the two essays he gives. I made low C's on the quizzes, and he gives an option for a rewrite if you fail the essay. Second essay I got an A. Overall, good class, ended up getting a B on the final. Not a lot of work, and the lectures are helpful to listen. It's even better to read the material!
                
                   Takes attendance, very long and boring lectures. Teaching Assistants walk around and monitor class to make sure students are on task. I felt like the class would never end.
                
                   This class definitely makes you work for it, but not impossible. You HAVE to go to class and take notes, but his tests aren't very detail specific, he wants you to see the bigger picture. He knows what he is talking about and tries to make the subject as interesting as possible. I missed the final and he even let me make it up, really helpful.
                
                   While Professor Buenger is a really nice guy and very helpful, his lectures are extremely long and not very organized. He is very repetitive and a lot of the time he talks in circles. The tests contain multiple choice questions and matching. Attendance is required. There are two tests, two papers, and a final. 
                
                   Only had 2 quizzes, 2 writing assignments, and a final. Very tough if you don't study and go to class. It was my biggest class and it took attendance. Four mandatory books and a textbook were required. Lectures were very long and boring and hard to stay awake in. I wouldn't recommend this class if it is not required for your major. 
                
                   Don't get me wrong, he's very nice and willing to help; but, he talks in a monotone. Lectures are verrrry long and boring. Make sure you understand what he wants from the precis, and also expect a lot of all of the above questions on the quizzes. If there's one thing I liked, it's that the quizzes weren't all dates & facts, a lot was common sense.
                
                   Quite a bit of reading is involved plus two essays. The quizzes are very easy if you understand the concepts discussed in the lecture. Buenger knows his stuff well and is very passionate. Important stuff is repeated over and over. Attendance is mandatory and the TA's will come after you if your phone is out. Overall though, very enjoyable class.
                
                   The lectures are not bad overall, but they can be tough to pay attention to. He skips forward and then goes back which can make it hard to figure out what you are talking about. He is a really nice professor and will help you if you ask. Attendance is also mandatory and roll it taken by the TAs before class.
                
                   I highly enjoyed this class! It isn't easy by any means, but if you take his advice you will be fine! TAKE LOTS OF NOTES because his lectures are the tests!  If you zone out it will show on your grade. He knows his stuff and is really passionate about the subject which makes the class enjoyable! Great class if you're willing to work! 
                
                   Its important to do really well on the papers because the tests are pretty tricky. However, he is willing to lead you on the right path if you ask for help. 
                
                   Amazing Professor! You don' even really need to read the textbook if you listen to the lectures. Tests are super easy and the class is always fun! SERIOUSLY take him if you get the chance 
                
                   Buenger's lectures are like mini speeches, he's well informed and everything he talks about is interesting. He's the nicest old man you'll ever meet. He'll sit and talk to you about your life and your grades if you go to office hours. I didnt read a page of the textbook and got an A in the class. The only thing is that there arent many assignments.
                
                   He is a very sweet, hilarious old man but his lectures are very organized.  Be prepared to take a lot of notes but if you stay on top of your reading and attend lectures, you will do fine.  He also curves at the end of the semester.
                
                   I honestly loved Dr. Buenger. He is very tough when grading papers but if you go to class and take good notes you will do fine. Listen to the things he repeats in different lectures, know the timelines and attending class is a MUST. His lectures are very interesting and he is a very respectable and funny guy. I would gladly take him again. 
                
                   Super nice to the students! He makes the tests exactly like his lectures, if you don't go to class then youll fail. I missed the final and he let me make it up even though it was my fault I missed it. Still made a B+. I enjoyed his class and I hate history!
                
                   Super nice to the students! He makes the tests exactly like his lectures, if you don't go to class then youll fail. I missed the final and he let me make it up even though it was my fault I missed it. Still made a B+
                
                   One of our nation's foremost experts on it's history.  His books are read at other Universitys.  Is he an arrogant ass&#63;  Yes.  Does he know his stuff&#63;  Yes.  If you can't defend your position, go back to Blinndergarten.  It's a world class research institution, not kindergarten.  Welcome to the big leagues.
                
                   Did not allow for disagreement from his position.  If the student disagreed with his thesis, the student could expect to be attacked in front of the class.
                
                   The first exam I studied very hard for and thought I did well and did not. The test format was not clear as to what the questions were really asking. Interesting class but he is too difficult of a grader.
                
                   He's amazing as well as being incredibly engaging. First time I've loved learning about history!
                
                   LOVED his class. Has review sessions for all the tests which are very helpful. No homework. 3 tests, 1 paper. Takes attendance everyday, but you should come because his tests are mostly based off lecture, and his lectures are funny and interesting. If you attend all the lectures you get extra credit. He's fair, kind, & makes lectures interesting.
                
                   Dr. Brooks is amazing. He really loves U.S. history and is a really good professor. Attendence is mandatory but he gives some credit always showing up. Makes the lectures interesting and always wants to start student discussions. The book is only needed for key terms. Test are all multiple choice. Easy A if you put the effort.
                
                   Lectures were really boring, and the TA did all of the grading. He said the textbook was mandatory but we never used it, and the test questions were worded crazy. Attendance is mandatory
                
                   have to go to class, attendance policy drops your letter grade after you miss 2 classes, if you don't miss more than 2 he gives 3 bonus points on final.  Lectures are long but interesting, one essay that is graded pretty fairly and 3 tests that aren't too hard, very funny 
                
                   Dr. Brooks is an awesome professor, lectures are a bit long, doesn't use any visual aid just talks the whole time but makes it interesting. 2 tests plus the final (not cumulative) assigns a paper but is very clear cut on what he wants, attendance is a must you drop a letter grade if you don't go. Overall great professor, would definitely take again
                
                   Dr. Brooks is awesome. His lectures can be a little long, but they make up 70% of the test material so go to class. He takes attendance, but you're rewarded for showing up to class at the end of the semester. Theres an essay, but you get to pick which reading you would like to do it over, so thats nice. Pretty funny guy, would take his class again.
                
                   Lecture based exams with very little percentage of textbook. Must read three novels from those you pick the one to write an essay about.  Brooks shows true passion for history. He is a funny man. Lectures can get pretty long, but they're interesting. Take notes quickly for he moves on fast. I highly recommend him. He takes attendance.
                
                   Tests are 70% lecture material. Must go to class, but they are interesting. Brooks makes history interesting.  Must take notes quickly-he talks quickly Great man
                
                   Tests are 70% based on lectures, but the lectures are pretty entertaining and easy to understand. Attendance is mandatory, if you have more than 2 unexcused absences he drops your grade some and if you have 2 unexcused absences or less he gives you extra points on your overall grade. Tests are average difficulty
                
                   One of my favorite professors at A&M. Attendance is part of your grade, so you have to go to class. He tells you up front that the exams are 70% lecture, 30% textbook. You only have to write 1 essay for the class and you have 3 book options to write it over. He doesn't use any powerpoints, just lectures. He's a brilliant professor. Loved his class 
                
                   Excellent teacher, knew the content extremely well and lectured it very effectively and efficiently. Always kept the class intrigued. Knew the content amazingly well. His tests did happen to be pretty challenging though. Great guy and very personal, kept the class entertained and had a good sense of humor.
                
                   Overall Brooks was a good prof. Tests are straight from lectures, 50 questions, 30 multiple choice & 20 T/F. He takes attendance and if you miss more than 2 classes you drop a letter grade. Lectures were good and he kept me interested in what he was saying.
                
                   Very long lectures and the tests are a bit little hard, but overall ok. He does sometimes make time for review sessions so you have to take advantage of that. Only 3 tests and 1 essay that you can choose from 3 readings
                
                   Dr. Brooks doesn't use a powerpoint which worried me at first but he is great at making class like on big story! He keeps it interesting and is super passionate about what he does which everyone respects. He will help you if you need it willingly! 
                
                   The tests are worded weird. It is more of application than memorizing dates. You don't have to read the book, just make sure to do the vocabulary in the book. 
                
                   Brooks is so amazing. His lectures are so well structured and he's very passionate about the subject and wants his students to succeed. Follow the outlines he sends out and use those to study!!!  Attendance is mandatory. At the end of the semester I ended with a 88 but because I only missed 2 classes I was able to argue my case and he gave me an A!
                
                   tests are 70% lecture based, 30% vocal from the books. he is very interested in history but his lectures can get very boring. Tests are 30 MC, 20 TF. never made above a 75 on his tests. one paper which is graded pretty fairly (I got an 85 and did it the night before). He emails an outline to the lecture the night before, USE IT 
                
                   I was not interested in History before his class, I was concerned that I would not do well in the class because he doesn't use powerpoints but I was wrong! He makes the class interesting and he is passionate about it which makes him that much better! I recommend this class! 
                
                   I took him for Western Civ.  Probably the hottest prof I've ever had.  I enjoyed the reading.
                
                   Very knowledgeable in her field. Schedules off days throughout the semester. Requires readings that she will provide through e-learning and you have to print them out and answer a short little paper on them and turn them in online where you basically get a completion grade. All exams are essay, she gives you the prompts before hand to study.
                
                   I really enjoyed his lectures and they were really easy and interesting especially when I really don't like history. His class is a MUST!!!!
                
                   Best prof ever.  Lectures are interesting and entertaining--lots of jokes and stores but always with a relevant point.  Shows how history is relevant to today.  Definitely take his class.
                
                   He made me love History
                
                   He is the best     easy A if u cared about reading
                
                   Great prof!!!
                
                   Awesome! Bonus questions are damn easy.
                
                   fabulous
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   He's very funny and entertaining. Keeps your interest on a boring subject.
                
                   Best hist professor eu
                
                   This professor is amazing if you enjoy a class where you can sit back and relax, then read the book later to do well on the tests. This guy is absolutely addicted to mountain dew, and it isn't rare to see him down 1-2 a class. Awesome prof, it really is funny seeing him so tweaked on caffeine. Would recommend!
                
                   He does talk from beginning to end but if you take notes and STUDY THEM you will be fine. I bombed the first test but for the second test I just studied my notes (focus on the outline he gives in class) and got an A. There are a few questions on the test from the book but they aren't random details-it's the important stuff.
                
                   Knows his stuff, but far too tough.take notes , cuz he focuses on them during exams.But good luck with that cuz he just talks talks and talks... and talks, beginning to end.
                
                   Okay....So....this professor does not breath. You think i'm kidding but...he doesn't. He will talk, talk, talk, talk, talk, talk, talk, (take a sip of soda), talk, talk, talk, talk, ect; This is basically how it is. He does NOT give a study guide at all. I have attended every single class thus far and still fill absolutely clueless. DO NOT TAKE!!!!
                
                   Very engaging in lecture, class was easy. Show up and take notes.
                
                   Assigns minimal homework, aside from a bit of reading. Just go to class and pay attention and you'll do fine.
                
                   Lectures are pretty confusing, he talks really fast using Spanish terminology and doesn't give you time to figure out what he's saying. Gives you notes and study guide but they aren't very helpful. Not the best professor, but there could definitely be worse.
                
                   Stands at the front and rambles and is very unorganized in his lectures. The outlines don't match what he says in class and the study guides don't match either of them. Even after studying, I would walk in and not know the majority of the test. The tests are primarily true and false. I would avoid if possible, but not terrible if you can't avoid. 
                
                   The professor seriously rambles in lecture. He seems like a nice guy, but organization is not his friend. He also takes a while to get grades up, like at least a couple weeks. Luckily he does give pretty good study guides and quite a bit of extra credit.
                
                   His lectures are hard to understand and really hard to follow. About 70 TrueFalse questions and maybe 10 multiple choice. I studied a ton for every test and took good notes (from what I could take out of the lecture). If you just need the credit and aren't looking to do much work I would take him, especially if you have a busy semester.  
                
                   Professor Alonzo is incredibly passionate about Texas and its history. Some find it difficult at times to listen to his lectures, but his enthusiasm and love for Texas is outstanding. Wants to know his students. Very nice man, you should definitely take him if the opportunity presents itself.  
                
                   I didn't enjoy this class at all! He basically stands at the front of the class and rambles. He wrote one of the required texts and there are multiple spelling/grammatical errors. Dr.Alonzo and his book are hard to follow. If it wasn't for his study guides I wouldn't have passed the class.
                
                   Good professor, really enjoys teaching Texas history, final exam is not cumulative. Hardest part of the class is he just stands at the front and lectures, no power points. Read your textbook it WILL help on the tests and quizzes
                
                   Excellent professor, always helpful, eager to address student questions, offered extra-credit opportunities on tests/quizzes
                
                   Awful. :( Really difficult to follow, really unclear about what is relevent to the exams. Ease your class schedule of a lot of stress and pick a different prof.
                
                   One of the worst history professors I've ever had. He is entirely incomprehensible, and talked about &quot;The Valley&quot; area of Texas the entire class. We had to buy his own book as well as two others. His tests were easy (we were given reviews), but I learned nothing from this class and would never take this teacher again.
                
                   He's test are long and there is alot of T/F...he gives alot of extra credit opportunitis...just read all chapters and ask questions. He cares about the students...and wants you to do good...
                
                   No Comments
                
                   His tests are ridiculously hard. I would study at the library for hours and not know a question on the test!
                
                   His tests consist of about 25 multiple choice questions and 50 True/False. He usually offers bonus questions on both tests and quizzes
                
                   You will read!!! During lectures you will write the whole class, but Anderson keeps it interesting. Your discussion leader does all of the grading so become close! Prepare for midterm and final with them early. After lecture, if you have any questions or comments talk to him. He signed a copy of his book for me! Very cool guy, favorite professor.
                
                   Professor Anderson is a pretty decent professor. I enjoyed his class but he does not help you out at all. He is also not very personable. He tries to make class funny, but doesn't always succeed. Your discussion leader is who is going to help you the most. You read a lot of books and there are only two tests. I never really knew that my grade was.
                
                   Anderson gives amazing lectures, although he may shove his opinions down your throats every once in a while. There is only a midterm and a final, which is scary. Make sure you read the material for your discussion group, that helps. Lowkey, he shows pictures of himself serving in Vietnam and he was kinda hot. Difficult class but not too bad.
                
                   Anderson is rude and he does not want anything to do with the students. The thing I enjoyed about this class was the discussion group. My discussion leader was super helpful. The discussion leaders do all the grading so better to get on their good side. Lectures can be boring but Anderson can also be interesting. Sometimes shows his own pictures.
                
                   If you don't go to class, you won't pass the class. There's only 2 tests, both of which are 70% essay and are based off his lectures. Also, he's rude and doesn't care about his students. He refuses to answer any questions and will instead send you to your discussion leader.
                
                   Lots of books to read throughout the semester. The book quizzes are super easy though and you take them in your discussion group. He grades the essay portion of his tests very hard- you have to include every detail he wants or else you're doomed. Your discussion leader will become your best friend! 
                
                   the kind of professor who imposes his political views on you (steer clear Reaganites), extremely tough grader to the point of madness. Relies heavily on the essay portion of the test (70 points), if you do not get every single point that he wants be prepared to lose major credit. More strict grading than I had previously encountered.
                
                   While his class is very difficult, he is the most enjoyable prof I have ever taken. His lectures are interesting, and he is very passionate about the material. He begins every class with a joke, and works jokes into the lectures. Despite my low grade, I would recommend him for anybody. This class was a joy to bomb.
                
                   Dr. Anderson does not give extra credit or curve tests. There are 3 tests (multiple choice) and 1 paper. He is liberally biased to the point of frustration. Attendance is mandatory. He assigns 6 books to read, 2 for each test, and 3 of the 6 are written by him. By estimate, his tests are 70-80% name based. I would not recommend this professor. 
                
                   interesting lectures and interesting required reading books, if you go and sit in the front ( he takes attendance) you will not have any problem in this class
                
                   His "Wooooow"s during lecture will keep you awake during the lecture. Very knowledgeable in his area and portrays it in a good way. Despite my low grade, I did learn a lot and that's good enough for me.
                
                   Two exams-not cumulative. 30% multiple choice, 70% essay (you write on one of 2 given prompts). Discussion sections have quizzes every week on the reading which increases in length as you go. At one point, you're reading over 100 pages in a week. I made an A but had to work. You NEED to study and go to class. If you do, an A is very attainable. 
                
                   BEST professor I have yet to take a course from! I am so happy I took him my first year, he is inspirational, funny, interesting, and his books aren't bad at all (a few are 'eh') but he will make it do-able. Take good notes, you'll get an A if you review before. Tests are fairly easy.  TAKE THIS PROFESSOR. You'll love him.
                
                   Professor is incredibly smart and has some interesting stories. Sometimes his lectures move so fast that you dont even know what hes talking about. for example we went over all of world war 2 in one lecture. The tests which there are only two during the class require a very deep understanding of the topic to write the essay.
                
                   Tons of reading and weekly quizzes that were really hard even if you took notes over the reading sections. 2 tests- midterm and final that were 70% essay based 
                
                   Your grade consists of quizzes over weekly readings (mostly his books), extra points for participating in the weekly discussion, a midterm, and a final. The midterm and final are both 70% essay and 30% 15 multiple choice questions that cover half a semester of lectures, which are not posted online. Go to class! He's also VERY liberal. 
                
                   I absolutely love Dr. Anderson's class. In the beginning of lectures he shows slide shows of his adventures around the world and tells cheesy but funny jokes. I wish I could take the class again. Gives the best lectures imaginable.. so good that I went not cause I had to but because I wanted too. He is EXTREMELY credible and you WILL learn a lot!
                
                   He thinks he's hilarious and he can be. He tends to lean toward the dirty side of jokes at times and is VERY liberal. Sit in the front cause his voice volume varies and sometimes it's hard to hear. READ THE BOOKS. THEY ARE AWFUL BUT READ THEM. Study as you go. Just trust me. And pray. A lot. 
                
                   He lectures for the full length of time. You can tell he is passionate about it, but he is a little crazy and hard to understand. It is hard to tell where he is going.
                
                   Very hard to study for his tests - focused on small details from the books he required us to read (mostly written by him).  Should not have been a hard class, but with only 300 points and no clear material to study - you have to work!  Did not enjoy his style of teaching or the class in general.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Dr. Addis was VERY clear with his assignments. He outlined his discussions in a way that allowed the listener to follow along with ease. I took this class in summer school, so the classes were an hour and a half long but only seemed like a very short amount of time. I recommend taking  his coures.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   fun, interesting class with slides, great teacher, definitely recommend
                
                   Not helpful at all. Class wasn't mandatory but she didn't make it worthwhile if you went. She expected in class essays to be 6 pages long with a 20 question multiple choice in 50 minutes. I don't recommend unless you're a quick, great writer and can do well with heavily weighted essay exams.
                
                   best History professor I've ever had.  Took both entry level history courses with him and made A's.  Sit in the front, ask questions and pay attention.  He is a very open and approachable teacher and even now, as a graduating senior, he still sees me in halls and stops to talk to me.
                
                   Awesome professor...his tests are difficult, all essay and short answer questions, but he makes sure you learn what you need to. Very helpful and very smart. I would definitely take another class with him!
                
                   Watchout for assignments even on short weeks!
                
                   He is a fine teacher.  But his view of history is provincial and narrow.  If you want a broader perspective, check out other instructors in the department.
                
                   Essay tests and papers are the tough part, but actually having him there to assist you is nice. He's open, warm and intelligent. Causes you to think about things and question your own fundamental ideas. He's really challenging and engaging! Worth the tution.
                
                   Can we clone him&#63;&#63;&#63;  He's the best teacher in the world... I was beginning to rethink my history major until I had him make it interesting again.
                
                   This professor deserves better than a 4. something. Excelent teacher, would take his classes again.
                
                   Great!
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Class was the hardest I've taken online, and I have taken plenty. Tons of reading and the quizzes are limited to a short amount of time and questions are hard. Homework was easy and she gives extra credit. If you put the time and effort you will pass.
                
                   Amazing Professor! Wish he still taught as well!
                
                   Wish he still taught!
                
                   Japanese language class: Ozeki sensee is a great guy to teach this class! He uses immersion very well and makes the class a riot! There is a ton of situational humor presented! Great Great Great !!!!! Hope he never leaves!!
                
                   She does not give hvery many lectures and does not use PowerPoint slides. Also, pretty vague on assignments.
                
                   She was understanding with students and was always will to help you to ensure that you pass the class and will curve to meet final grade expectations
                
                   Great teacher. Interesting subject. She really knows her stuff. Have taken many classes from her and would take more. She can get a little off track but class is fun and you always learn something.
                
                   The lectures are too hard to follow and she does have favorites.  I had a lot of high hopes in this class and it was fun, but hard at times. She is so beautiful and so smart, I wouldn't mind taking another class with her
                
                   Great fun and beautiful professor.  She is very elegant and very smart.
                
                   While she can be all over the place with her lectures, she is very interesting and made the class almost seem fun!! Stay on her good side and get to know her; it really helps.
                
                   Would not take again, rude from a personal stand point.  She is also not helpful and tends to play favorites.  I had high hopes for this class as I liked the subject matter and the course description.
                
                   Dr. Clark is a very interesting professor. While her lectures are all over the place and you can easily become confused just by paying attention, her class is also fairly easy if you put in the work. If you put an effort into learning the material, you will do well. If you get to know her, you'll appreciate her more.
                
                   I have a new appreciation for the world after this class.  Online assignments are clear, and bonus points generous.
                
                   Well versed in her knowledge. She is a FUNNY Prof. She has so many stories that make you want to learn what she's teaching. Don't be afraid to get to know her.
                
                   very smart, tries to keep things interesting. some of her class projects are very long and involved, but keep up with the reading and do your best on the assignments and you'll be fine!
                
                   Time wasting projects that benefited no one.
                
                   great teacher i learned more in her class than any other
                
                   Tedious homework and projects but good professor.
                
                   Clark designed this course to be needlessly difficult. Endless chapters of reading PLUS three epic book reviews followed by a few semi-easy map quizzes. You will get NO study guides for the tests and the quizzes are impossibly challenging. This is a SOPHOMORE level course, but expect to put in graduate level work if you wish to be successful. 
                
                   What a wonderful teacher! Professional enough to teach, yet down to earth enough to connect with you. I had him for Japanese and for several history courses. Really knows his stuff. It was a privilege to learn from him.
                
                   Only lecture, no reviewing, tough grading on essay questions
                
                   A solid professor who knows his stuff. He appreciates dissent, and I like that about him.  He is a great adviser and cares very much about his students' future success. Also good for a laugh now and then.
                
                   cares about students, excellent lecturer, as long as you come to class and take good notes his tests really are not that bad
                
                   very interesting... get in on his good side
                
                   Lots of notes, Hard essay questions
                
                   Excellent teacher.  He knows his material, he lectures well, and his assignments are interesting.  Anyone with an interest in East Asian history will love his classes, and people without an interest in East Asian history may gain one.
                
                   Dr. Clark will go very far out of his way to help anyone! Great professor. His lectures are amazing! He manages to keep the class interested and aware. Book Response Essays are a wonderful teaching tool, discussions are great! Wonderful environment and great professor! AWESOME!!
                
                   Dr. Clark is probably one of the best professors that I have had at WT. While at first glance the courses may seem rather intimidating, they really aren't that difficult and he makes each class period fun. I enjoy the lectures and his dry humor.
                
                   I was part of his pilot Japanese Language class and it quickly turned into my favorite class, I enjoyed it everyday and he didn't mind if you interrupted to make a joke or to ask for clarification. He is also one of the few politicos in academia you will meet who does not punish you for having the audacity to disagree with him.
                
                   No Comments
                
                   Pilot Japanese Language course. Dr. Clark is a great guy to jump start this program. He knows what he is talking about not simply by study but he lived in Japan as well. EXTREMELY helpful. He will do anything to help anyone. This class was very hard, but very very worth the time and effort. Good sense of humor, fun to learn from. Great guy!!!
                
                   Dr. Clark is an amazing professor and a great person willing to help anyone with anything. This class was  not only fun but very challenging. As long as you stay with his classes and prove that you are trying, he will do anything for you! Dr. is by far the best rated professor I have EVER studied with. Take his classes if you enjoy Asian studies.
                
                   Likes to say his classes are old school.  He makes you read, write and analyze texts--and all this about China and India.  Difficult for introductory-level.  However, when you complete the class, you will have achieved something special.
                
                   Demanding professor.  Knows his stuff.  Requires you to know it to.  A bit scary at first--not him--but the subject matter.
                
                   Dr. Clark seems like he would be just as happy lecturing to a bunch of empty desks. I, too, enjoyed his dry sense of humor, but was too scared to laugh. I was impressed with his depth of subject knowledge, but felt like he thought he was too good for WT.
                
                   Doesn't seem to care about his students like the rest of the department. I got an A in the class with little problem, but he certainly didn't impress me with his knowledge, he came off as arrogant talking about his travels instead of interegrating the stories into the class material.
                
                   Outstanding teacher.  Organized and thorough lectures, stimulating class discussions, challenging but interesting coursework.  Very well-traveled and educated professor with a dry sense of humor. A++
                